Missouri, session 2026, SB889.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 21.851, 32.088, 67.5125, 86.353,
99.1205, 100.260, 103.003, 103.005, 103.047, 103.083, 103.089,
103.095, 103.141, 103.175, 103.178, 104.352, 105.721, 130.034,
135.204, 135.276, 135.277, 135.279, 135.281, 135.283, 135.313,
135.530, 135.545, 135.546, 135.680, 135.682, 135.710, 135.766,
135.800, 135.980, 136.450, 142.1000, 143.173, 143.732,
143.1008, 143.1009, 143.1013, 143.1014, 143.1017, 143.1027,
143.1100, 148.370, 160.261, 160.405, 161.825, 161.1055,
167.225, 167.950, 171.034, 172.287, 173.196, 173.236, 173.680,
173.2510, 178.697, 184.350, 184.351, 184.352, 184.353, 184.355,
184.357, 184.359, 184.362, 184.384, 190.450, 191.211, 191.425,
191.828, 191.831, 191.950, 191.1075, 191.1080, 191.1085,


192.926, 199.020, 208.244, 208.471, 208.482, 208.627, 210.154,
210.1030, 215.263, 217.147, 217.151, 227.817, 252.300, 252.303,
252.306, 252.309, 252.312, 252.315, 252.318, 252.321, 252.324,
252.327, 252.330, 252.333, 260.900, 260.905, 260.910, 260.915,
260.920, 260.925, 260.930, 260.935, 260.940, 260.945, 260.950,
260.955, 260.960, 260.965, 301.140, 301.190, 301.213, 301.562,
313.270, 319.140, 320.092, 320.093, 332.304, 332.305, 334.153,
334.1135, 338.320, 354.215, 374.007, 375.330, 375.355, 375.380,
375.480, 376.170, 376.180, 376.190, 376.210, 376.220, 376.230,
376.240, 376.250, 376.260, 376.270, 376.309, 376.752, 377.005,
377.010, 377.020, 377.030, 377.040, 377.050, 377.060, 377.070,
377.080, 377.090, 377.100, 377.120, 377.150, 377.160, 377.170,
377.180, 377.190, 377.199, 377.200, 377.210, 377.220, 377.230,
377.240, 377.250, 377.260, 377.270, 377.280, 377.290, 377.300,
377.310, 377.320, 377.330, 377.340, 377.350, 377.360, 377.370,
377.380, 377.400, 377.420, 377.430, 377.450, 377.460, 379.205,
379.210, 379.215, 379.220, 379.225, 379.230, 379.235, 379.240,
379.245, 379.250, 379.255, 379.257, 379.260, 379.263, 379.265,
379.270, 379.275, 379.290, 379.295, 379.300, 379.316, 379.670,
379.700, 379.720, 379.1310, 382.070, 393.1072, 394.120,
414.407, 454.433, 454.470, 454.490, 454.849, 476.1000, 488.426,
559.117, 595.202, 620.570, 620.1020, 620.1910, 620.2020,
620.2100, 620.2600, 630.717, 633.420, and 640.030, RSMo, and
section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no. 1606, ninety-ninth
general assembly, second regular session, and section 167.910
as enacted by house bill no. 1415, ninety-ninth general
assembly, second regular session, are repealed and fifty-eight
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
86.353, 100.260, 103.003, 103.005, 103.047, 103.083, 103.089,
103.095, 103.141, 104.352, 105.721, 130.034, 135.204, 135.530,
135.800, 148.370, 160.261, 160.405, 167.225, 167.950, 173.2510,
178.697, 184.350, 184.351, 184.352, 184.353, 184.355, 184.357,
184.359, 184.362, 191.211, 191.828, 191.831, 208.244, 208.471,


217.151, 301.140, 301.190, 301.562, 313.270, 320.092, 375.330,
376.309, 379.316, 379.670, 379.720, 379.1310, 382.070, 394.120,
414.407, 454.433, 454.470, 454.490, 488.426, 620.570, 620.1020,
620.2020, and 630.717, to read as follows:
86.353. The right of any person to a benefit, any
other right accrued or accruing to any person under the
provisions of sections 86.200 to 86.366 and the moneys
created pursuant to sections 86.200 to 86.366 are not
subject to execution, garnishment, attachment or any other
process whatsoever and are unassignable except as in
sections 86.200 to 86.366 specifically provided.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section shall
prevent the board of trustees from honoring the terms of a
court order requiring the retirement system to pay all or
any portion of the retirement benefit otherwise payable to a
retired or disabled member to a third party to satisfy the
member's obligation to pay child support or maintenance.
Any relief association created pursuant to section 86.500
shall be exempt from the tax imposed by sections 143.011 to
[143.1013] 143.1006.
100.260. 1. There are hereby created four special
funds, to be known as the "Industrial Development and
Reserve Fund", the "Industrial Development Guarantee Fund",
the "Export Finance Fund", and the "Jobs Now Fund", into
which the following may be deposited as and when received
and designated for deposit in one of such funds:
(1) Any moneys appropriated by the general assembly
for use by the board in carrying out the powers set forth in
sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(2) Any moneys made available through the issuance of
revenue bonds under the provisions of sections 100.250 to
100.295;


(3) Any moneys received from grants or which are
given, donated, or contributed to the fund from any source;
(4) Any moneys received in repayment of loans or from
application fees, reserve participation fees, guarantee fees
and premium payments as provided for under sections 100.250
to 100.297;
(5) Any moneys received as interest on deposits or as
income on approved investments of the fund;
(6) Any moneys obtained from the issuance of revenue
bonds or notes by the board;
(7) Any moneys that were in the industrial development
fund authorized by this section, the economic development
reserve authorized by section 620.215, or the industrial
revenue bond guarantee fund authorized by section 620.240,
respectively, as of September 28, 1985; and
(8) Any moneys obtained from any other available
source.
2. The development and reserve fund, the guarantee
fund, the jobs now fund, and the export finance fund shall
be administered by the board as provided in sections 100.250
to 100.297. Separate accounts may be created within the
development and reserve fund and the guarantee fund for
moneys specifically appropriated, donated or otherwise
received for industrial development purposes. The board may
also create such other separate accounts within any of such
funds as deemed necessary or appropriate by the board to
carry out the duties and purposes of sections 100.250 to
100.297. All such separate accounts may be administered by
a corporate trustee on behalf of the board upon the terms
and conditions established by the board.
3. Moneys in the jobs now fund, the development and
reserve fund, the guarantee fund, and the export finance
fund shall be invested by the board in the manner prescribed


by the board and any interest earned on invested moneys
shall accrue to the benefit of the respective fund.
4. None of the funds and accounts of the board shall
be considered a state fund, and money deposited therein may
not be appropriated therefrom, nor shall any money deposited
therein be subject to the provisions of section 33.080.
5. The commissioner of administration shall annually
calculate the increased amount of revenue to the state
treasury due to the provisions of sections 135.155, 135.286,
[135.546,] and subsection 7 of section 620.1039, as enacted
or modified by this act and shall allocate up to twelve
million dollars of such revenue to the jobs now fund.
103.003. As used in [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this
chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) "Actuarial reserves", the necessary funding
required to pay all the medical expenses for services
provided to members of the plan but for which the claims
have not yet been received by the claims administrator;
(2) "Actuary", a member of the American Academy of
Actuaries or who is an enrolled actuary under the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;
(3) "Agency", a state-sponsored institution of higher
learning, political subdivision or governmental entity or
instrumentality;
(4) "Alternative delivery health care program", a plan
of covered benefits that pays medical expenses through an
alternate mechanism rather than on a fee-for-service basis.
This includes, but is not limited to, health maintenance
organizations and preferred provider organizations, all of
which shall include chiropractic physicians licensed under
chapter 331, in the provider networks or organizations;
(5) "Board", the board of trustees of the Missouri
consolidated health care plan;


(6) "Claims administrator", an agency contracted to
process medical claims submitted from providers or members
of the plan and their dependents;
(7) "Coordination of benefits", to work with another
group-sponsored health care plan which also covers a member
of the plan to ensure that both plans pay their appropriate
amount of the health care expenses incurred by the member;
(8) "Covered benefits", a schedule of covered
services, including chiropractic services, which are payable
under the plan;
(9) "Employee", any person employed full time by the
state or a participating member agency, or a person eligible
for coverage by a state-sponsored retirement system or a
retirement system sponsored by a participating member agency
of the plan;
(10) "Evidence of good health", medical information
supplied by a potential member of the plan that is reviewed
to determine the financial risk the person represents to the
plan and the corresponding determination of whether or not
he or she should be accepted into the plan;
(11) "Health care plan", any group medical benefit
plan providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis, any
HMO, any group service or indemnity contract issued by a
health plan of any type or description;
(12) "Medical benefits coverages" shall include
services provided by chiropractic physicians as well as
physicians licensed under chapter 334;
(13) "Medical expenses", costs for services performed
by a provider and covered under the plan;
(14) "Missouri consolidated health care plan benefit
fund account", the benefit trust fund account containing all
payroll deductions, payments, and income from all sources
for the plan;


(15) "Officer", an elected official of the state of
Missouri;
(16) "Participating higher education entity", a state-
sponsored institution of higher learning;
(17) "Participating member agency", a political
subdivision or governmental entity that has elected to join
the plan and has been accepted by the board;
(18) "Plan year", a twelve-month period designated by
the board which is used to calculate the annual rate
categories and the appropriate coverage;
(19) "Provider", a physician, hospital, pharmacist,
psychologist, chiropractic physician or other licensed
practitioner who or which provides health care services
within the respective scope of practice of such practitioner
pursuant to state law and regulation;
(20) "Retiree", a person who is not an employee and is
receiving or is entitled to receive an annuity benefit from
a state-sponsored retirement system or a retirement system
of a participating member agency of the plan or becomes
eligible for retirement benefits because of service with a
participating member agency.
103.005. For the purpose of covering medical expenses
of the officers, employees and retirees, the eligible
dependents of officers, employees and retirees and to the
surviving spouses and children of deceased officers,
employees and retirees of the state and participating member
agencies of the state, there is hereby created and
established a health care plan which shall be a body
corporate, which shall be under the management of the board
of trustees herein described, and shall be known as the
"Missouri Consolidated Health Care Plan". Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, such plan may sue and
be sued, transact business, contract, invest funds and hold


cash, securities and other property and shall be vested with
such other powers as may be necessary or proper to enable
it, its officers, employees, and agents to carry out fully
and effectively all the purposes of [sections 103.003 to
103.175] this chapter.
103.047. Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote.
Six trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business and any official action of the board shall be
based on the majority vote of the trustees present. Unless
otherwise expressly provided in [sections 103.003 to
103.175] this chapter, a meeting need not be called or held
to make any decision on a matter before the board. Each
member must be sent by the executive director a copy of the
matter to be decided with full information on the question
from the files of the plan. The concurring decisions of six
trustees may decide the issue by signing a document
declaring their decision and sending the written document to
the executive director within fifteen days after the
document and information was mailed to the trustee. If any
trustee is not in agreement with the six trustees, the
matter is to be passed on at a regular board meeting or a
special meeting called for that purpose.
103.083. The board shall provide or contract, or both,
on its own behalf, for medical benefits coverage and
services for persons covered under [sections 103.003 to
103.175] this chapter and enrolled in the plan. The board
may contract for medical benefits coverage with alternative
delivery health care programs where available. Medical
expenses shall also include expenses for comparable benefits
for employees who rely solely on spiritual means through
prayer for healing.
103.089. Participants in the program of medical
benefits coverage provided by [sections 103.003 to 103.175]


this chapter who are eligible for Medicare benefits and who
are not eligible for the program of medical benefits
coverage provided under sections 103.083 to 103.098 to be
their primary plan of coverage benefits shall be provided
substantially similar benefits provided participants who are
not eligible for Medicare benefits. Medical benefits
coverage provided under [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this
chapter shall be coordinated with Medicare benefits for
participants covered by part A or part B, or both, of
Medicare benefits, or for participants eligible for but not
covered by part A or part B, or both, of Medicare benefits,
reduced by an amount determined by the claims administrator
to provide a benefit equivalent to the amount which would be
provided on a coordination of benefit basis for such
participants if such participants were covered by part A or
part B, or both, of Medicare benefits. As used in sections
103.083 to 103.098, the term "Medicare benefits" shall
include those medical benefits provided by Title XVIII, A
and B, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.) and
amendments thereto. Any participating member agency having
employees or eligible retirees not covered by Medicare shall
authorize the plan at its option to enroll those individuals
for medical benefits as provided by Title XVIII, A and B,
Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal Social
Security Act whenever they become eligible for such benefits
and the plan shall pay the premium for such enrollment on
behalf of that person. The Medicare premium amounts shall
be included in the rate established by the actuary for
providing medical benefits coverage to such a participating
member agency. Anyone not authorizing this Medicare
enrollment shall be denied coverage.


103.095. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, any member of the general assembly and any
elected state official holding a statewide elective state
office, who ceases to hold elective office, or any person
employed by the elected official or employed by a member of
the general assembly, whose employment is terminated because
such elected official or member of the general assembly
ceases to hold elective office, may elect to continue
insurance benefits to cover medical expenses provided under
[sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter, by paying the
cost of such benefits as determined by the board. If an
eligible person does not elect to continue the coverage
within thirty-one days from the last day of the month in
which the eligible person ceases to be an employee, he may
not later elect to be covered under this section.
103.141. The persons in each participating member
agency eligible for coverage by the plan shall include,
subject to the limitations contained in [sections 103.003 to
103.175] this chapter:
(1) All employees, retirees, former employees entitled
to a retirement benefit because of service with the
participating member agency, employees eligible for a
disability benefit from the participating member agency,
employees on a leave of absence, and their dependents;
(2) All persons, and their dependents, who become
employees of a participating member agency on or after the
date such agency becomes covered under the plan, and who
wish to enroll in the plan; and
(3) All persons who become eligible for retirement
benefits because of service with the participating member
agency, persons who become eligible for a disability benefit
from the participating member agency, and their
unemancipated dependents, on or after the date such


participating member agency becomes covered under the plan,
and who have been continuously covered by the benefits under
[sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter for at least the
shorter of:
(a) Two years prior to the date of disability of the
employee or his eligibility for normal or early retirement;
or
(b) From the initial date of eligibility for the
benefits provided by [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this
chapter.
104.352. 1. Each employee described in paragraph (b)
of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 shall be entitled to
the same insurance benefits provided under [sections 103.003
to 103.175] chapter 103 to employees described in paragraph
(a) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 to cover the
medical expenses of such employees and their spouses and
children. Such insurance benefits shall be made available
to employees described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21)
of section 104.010 upon their initial employment as such
employees in the same manner provided for employees
described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of section
104.010, and shall be continued during any period of time,
not to exceed one year, in which such employees are not paid
for full-time employment, so long as such employees pay the
same amount for such insurance benefits as is required of
employees described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of
section 104.010 who continue receiving such insurance
benefits during a leave of absence without pay from their
employment with the state. Any employee described in
paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who is
reemployed by the general assembly or either house thereof,
or by any member of the general assembly while acting in his
official capacity as a member, by the thirteenth legislative


day of the session of the general assembly immediately
following the session of the general assembly in which such
employee was last so employed, without having elected to
discontinue the insurance benefits described in this
subsection, shall be entitled to continue such insurance
benefits without having to prove insurability for himself or
any of his covered dependents for whom he has paid for such
coverage continuously since last employed as an employee
described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section
104.010. Any employee described in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who is not reemployed by
the general assembly or either house thereof, or by any
member of the general assembly while acting in his official
capacity as a member, by the thirteenth legislative day of
the session of the general assembly immediately following
the session of the general assembly in which such employee
was last so employed, shall be deemed terminated as an
employee as of such thirteenth legislative day, and the
insurance benefits provided for such employee under this
subsection and [sections 103.003 to 103.175] chapter 103
shall be terminated as provided for employees described in
paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 whose
employment is terminated. During each month of service in
which an employee described in paragraph (b) of subdivision
(21) of section 104.010 is employed, the state shall make
any contribution required by [sections 103.003 to 103.175]
chapter 103 for such employee.
2. Any employee described in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who is actively employed
on or after September 28, 1992, shall be deemed vested for
purposes of determining eligibility for benefits under
sections 104.320 to 104.620 after being so employed for at
least sixty months.


105.721. 1. The commissioner of administration may,
in his discretion, direct that any or all of the moneys
appropriated to the state legal expense fund be expended to
procure one or more policies of insurance to insure against
all or any portion of the potential liabilities of the state
of Missouri or its agencies, officers, and employees.
2. Until July 1, 1996, the commissioner of
administration may procure one or more policies of insurance
or reinsurance to insure against all potential losses from
liabilities incurred by the state legal expense fund under
paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of
section 105.711. [On or before January 1, 1996, the
commissioner of administration shall prepare and distribute
a report regarding the cost effectiveness of insuring
against potential losses to the state under paragraphs (d)
and (e) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of section
105.711, by the direct purchase of an insurance policy or
policies as compared to self-insuring against such losses
through appropriations to the state legal expense fund under
section 105.711. The report shall be submitted to the
governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the
president pro tempore of the senate, and upon request to any
member of the general assembly.]
3. After consultation with the state courts
administrator, the commissioner of administration shall
procure such surety bonds as are required by statute and
such surety bonds as he deems necessary to protect the state
against loss from the acts or omissions of any person within
the judiciary that receives compensation from the state. No
other bond for such person shall be required for the
protection of the state. A copy of any bond procured
pursuant to this section shall be filed with the secretary
of state.


130.034. 1. Contributions as defined in section
130.011, received by any committee shall not be converted to
any personal use.
2. Contributions may be used for any purpose allowed
by law including, but not limited to:
(1) Any ordinary expenses incurred relating to a
campaign;
(2) Any ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in
connection with the duties of a holder of elective office;
(3) Any expenses associated with the duties of
candidacy or of elective office pertaining to the
entertaining of or providing social courtesies to
constituents, professional associations, or other holders of
elective office;
(4) The return of any contribution to the person who
made the contribution to the candidate or holder of elective
office;
(5) To contribute to a political organization or
candidate committee as allowed by law;
(6) To establish a new committee as defined by this
chapter;
(7) To make an unconditional gift which is fully
vested to any charitable, fraternal or civic organizations
or other associations formed to provide for some good in the
order of benevolence, if such candidate, former candidate or
holder of elective office or such person's immediate family
gain no direct financial benefit from the unconditional
gift[;
(8) Except when such candidate, former candidate or
holder of elective office dies while the committee remains
in existence, the committee may make an unconditional gift
to a fund established for the benefit of the spouse and
children of the candidate, former candidate or holder of


elective office. The provisions of this subdivision shall
expire October 1, 1997].
3. Upon the death of the candidate, former candidate
or holder of elective office who received such
contributions, all contributions shall be disposed of
according to this section and any funds remaining after
final settlement of the candidate's decedent's estate, or if
no estate is opened, then twelve months after the
candidate's death, will escheat to the state of Missouri to
be deposited in the general revenue fund.
4. No contributions, as defined in section 130.011,
received by a candidate, former candidate or holder of
elective office shall be used to make restitution payments
ordered of such individual by a court of law or for the
payment of any fine resulting from conviction of a violation
of any local, state or federal law.
5. Committees described in subdivision (18) of section
130.011 shall make expenditures only for the purpose of
determining whether an individual will be a candidate. Such
expenditures include polling information, mailings, personal
appearances, telephone expenses, office and travel expenses
but may not include contributions to other candidate
committees.
6. Any moneys in the exploratory committee fund may be
transferred to the candidate committee upon declaration of
candidacy for the position being explored. Such funds shall
be included for the purposes of reporting and limitation.
In the event that candidacy is not declared for the position
being explored, the remaining exploratory committee funds
shall be returned to the contributors on a pro rata basis.
In no event shall the amount returned exceed the amount
given by each contributor nor be less than ten dollars.


7. Funds held in candidate committees, campaign
committees, debt service committees, and exploratory
committees shall be liquid such that these funds shall be
readily available for the specific and limited purposes
allowed by law. These funds may be invested only in short-
term treasury instruments or short-term bank certificates
with durations of one year or less, or that allow the
removal of funds at any time without any additional
financial penalty other than the loss of interest income.
Continuing committees, political party committees, and other
committees such as out-of-state committees not formed for
the benefit of any single candidate or ballot issue shall
not be subject to the provisions of this subsection. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to restrict the
placement of funds in an interest-bearing checking account.
135.204. The repeal and reenactment of sections
99.918, 99.1082, 135.205, 135.207, 135.230, 135.530,
135.903, 135.953, [215.263,] and 620.1023 of section A of
this act shall become effective on April 1, 2011, or when
the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey,
based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data
in which the final year of the estimate period ends in zero
becomes available, which first occurs. The commissioner of
the office of administration shall notify the revisor of
statutes when the updated United States Census Bureau data
has been released.
135.530. For the purposes of sections 100.010,
100.710, 100.850, 135.110, 135.200, 135.258, [135.313,]
135.403, 135.405, 135.503, 135.530, [135.545,] 215.030,
348.300, 348.302, and 620.1400 to 620.1460, "distressed
community" means either a Missouri municipality within a
metropolitan statistical area which has a median household
income of under seventy percent of the median household


income for the metropolitan statistical area, according to
the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey,
based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data
in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero
or five, or a United States census block group or contiguous
group of block groups within a metropolitan statistical area
which has a population of at least two thousand five
hundred, and each block group having a median household
income of under seventy percent of the median household
income for the metropolitan area in Missouri, according to
the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey,
based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data
in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero
or five. In addition the definition shall include
municipalities not in a metropolitan statistical area, with
a median household income of under seventy percent of the
median household income for the nonmetropolitan areas in
Missouri according to the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-
year period estimate data in which the final year of the
estimate ends in either zero or five or a census block group
or contiguous group of block groups which has a population
of at least two thousand five hundred with each block group
having a median household income of under seventy percent of
the median household income for the nonmetropolitan areas of
Missouri, according to the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-
year period estimate data in which the final year of the
estimate ends in either zero or five. In metropolitan
statistical areas, the definition shall include areas that
were designated as either a federal empowerment zone; or a
federal enhanced enterprise community; or a state enterprise
zone that was originally designated before January 1, 1986,


but shall not include expansions of such state enterprise
zones done after March 16, 1988.
135.800. 1. The provisions of sections 135.800 to
135.830 shall be known and may be cited as the "Tax Credit
Accountability Act of 2004".
2. As used in sections 135.800 to 135.830, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Administering agency", the state agency or
department charged with administering a particular tax
credit program, as set forth by the program's enacting
statute; where no department or agency is set forth, the
department of revenue;
(2) "Agricultural tax credits", the agricultural
product utilization contributor tax credit created pursuant
to section 348.430, the new generation cooperative incentive
tax credit created pursuant to section 348.432, the family
farm breeding livestock loan tax credit created under
section 348.505, the qualified beef tax credit created under
section 135.679, and the wine and grape production tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.700;
(3) "Business recruitment tax credits", the business
facility tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.110 to
135.150 and section 135.258, the enterprise zone tax
benefits created pursuant to sections 135.200 to 135.270,
the business use incentives for large-scale development
programs created pursuant to sections 100.700 to 100.850,
the development tax credits created pursuant to sections
32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding communities tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.535, the film production tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.750, the enhanced
enterprise zone created pursuant to sections 135.950 to
135.970, and the Missouri quality jobs program created
pursuant to sections 620.1875 to 620.1900;


(4) "Community development tax credits", the
neighborhood assistance tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.100 to 32.125[,] and the family development
account tax credit created pursuant to sections 208.750 to
208.775[, the dry fire hydrant tax credit created pursuant
to section 320.093, and the transportation development tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.545];
(5) "Domestic and social tax credits", the youth
opportunities tax credit created pursuant to section 135.460
and sections 620.1100 to 620.1103, the shelter for victims
of domestic violence created pursuant to section 135.550,
the senior citizen or disabled person property tax credit
created pursuant to sections 135.010 to 135.035, the
adoption tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.325 to
135.339, the champion for children tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.341, the maternity home tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.600, the surviving spouse
tax credit created pursuant to section 135.090, the
residential treatment agency tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.1150, the pregnancy resource center tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.630, the food pantry tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.647, the residential
dwelling access tax credit created pursuant to section
135.562, the developmental disability care provider tax
credit created under section 135.1180, the shared care tax
credit created pursuant to section 192.2015, the health,
hunger, and hygiene tax credit created pursuant to section
135.1125, and the diaper bank tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.621;
(6) "Entrepreneurial tax credits", the capital tax
credit created pursuant to sections 135.400 to 135.429, the
certified capital company tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529, the seed capital tax credit


created pursuant to sections 348.300 to 348.318, the new
enterprise creation tax credit created pursuant to sections
620.635 to 620.653, the research tax credit created pursuant
to section 620.1039, the small business incubator tax credit
created pursuant to section 620.495, [the guarantee fee tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.766,] and the new
generation cooperative tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.105 to 32.125;
(7) "Environmental tax credits", [the charcoal
producer tax credit created pursuant to section 135.313,]
the wood energy tax credit created pursuant to sections
135.300 to 135.311[, and the alternative fuel stations tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.710];
(8) "Financial and insurance tax credits", the bank
franchise tax credit created pursuant to section 148.030,
the bank tax credit for S corporations created pursuant to
section 143.471, the exam fee tax credit created pursuant to
section 148.400, the health insurance pool tax credit
created pursuant to section 376.975, the life and health
insurance guaranty tax credit created pursuant to section
376.745, the property and casualty guaranty tax credit
created pursuant to section 375.774, and the self-employed
health insurance tax credit created pursuant to section
143.119;
(9) "Housing tax credits", the neighborhood
preservation tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.475
to 135.487, the low-income housing tax credit created
pursuant to sections 135.350 to 135.363, and the affordable
housing tax credit created pursuant to sections 32.105 to
32.125;
(10) "Recipient", the individual or entity who both:
(a) Is the original applicant for a tax credit; and


(b) Who directly receives a tax credit or the right to
transfer a tax credit under a tax credit program, regardless
as to whether the tax credit has been used or redeemed; a
100 recipient shall not include the transferee of a transferable
101 tax credit;
102 (11) "Redevelopment tax credits", the historic
103 preservation tax credit created pursuant to sections 253.545
104 to 253.559, the brownfield redevelopment program tax credit
105 created pursuant to sections 447.700 to 447.718, the
106 community development corporations tax credit created
107 pursuant to sections 135.400 to 135.430, the infrastructure
108 tax credit created pursuant to subsection 6 of section
109 100.286, the bond guarantee tax credit created pursuant to
110 section 100.297, and the disabled access tax credit created
111 pursuant to section 135.490[, the new markets tax credit
112 created pursuant to section 135.680, and the distressed
113 areas land assemblage tax credit created pursuant to section
114 99.1205];
115 (12) "Tax credit program", any of the tax credit
116 programs included in the definitions of agricultural tax
117 credits, business recruitment tax credits, community
118 development tax credits, domestic and social tax credits,
119 entrepreneurial tax credits, environmental tax credits,
120 housing tax credits, redevelopment tax credits, and training
121 and educational tax credits;
122 (13) "Training and educational tax credits", the
123 Missouri works new jobs tax credit and Missouri works
124 retained jobs credit created pursuant to sections 620.800 to
125 620.809.
148.370. Every insurance company or association
organized under the laws of the state of Missouri and doing
business under the provisions of sections 376.010 to
376.670, [379.205 to 379.310,] 379.650 to 379.790 and


chapter 381 and every mutual fire insurance company
organized under the provisions of sections 379.010 to
379.190 shall, as hereinafter provided, quarterly pay,
beginning with the year 1983, a tax upon the direct premiums
received by it from policyholders in this state, whether in
cash or in notes, or on account of business done in this
state, in lieu of the taxes imposed under the provisions of
chapters 143 and 147 for insurance of life, property or
interest in this state, at the rate of two percent per
annum, which amount of taxes shall be assessed and collected
as hereinafter provided; provided, that fire and casualty
insurance companies or associations shall be credited with
cancelled or returned premiums actually paid during the year
in this state, and that life insurance companies shall be
credited with dividends actually declared to policyholders
in this state but held by the company and applied to the
reduction of premiums payable by the policyholder.
160.261. 1. The local board of education of each
school district shall clearly establish a written policy of
discipline[, including the district's determination on the
use of corporal punishment and the procedures in which
punishment will be applied. A written copy of the
district's discipline policy and corporal punishment
procedures, if applicable, shall be provided to the pupil
and parent or legal guardian of every pupil enrolled in the
district at the beginning of each school year and also made
available in the office of the superintendent of such
district, during normal business hours, for public
inspection. No pupil shall be subject to corporal
punishment procedures outlined in the discipline and
corporal punishment policy without a parent or guardian
being notified and providing written permission for the
corporal punishment. All employees of the district shall


annually receive instruction related to the specific
contents of the policy of discipline and any interpretations
necessary to implement the provisions of the policy in the
course of their duties, including but not limited to
approved methods of dealing with acts of school violence,
disciplining students with disabilities and instruction in
the necessity and requirements for confidentiality] as
provided in this section.
2. The policy shall require school administrators to
report acts of school violence to all teachers at the
attendance center and, in addition, to other school district
employees with a need to know. For the purposes of this
chapter or chapter 167, "need to know" is defined as school
personnel who are directly responsible for the student's
education or who otherwise interact with the student on a
professional basis while acting within the scope of their
assigned duties. As used in this section, the phrase "act
of school violence" or "violent behavior" means the exertion
of physical force by a student with the intent to do serious
physical injury as defined in section 556.061 to another
person while on school property, including a school bus in
service on behalf of the district, or while involved in
school activities. The policy shall at a minimum require
school administrators to report, as soon as reasonably
practical, to the appropriate law enforcement agency any of
the following crimes, or any act which if committed by an
adult would be one of the following crimes:
(1) First degree murder under section 565.020;
(2) Second degree murder under section 565.021;
(3) Kidnapping under section 565.110 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, or kidnapping in the first degree
under section 565.110;
(4) First degree assault under section 565.050;


(5) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
(6) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
(7) Burglary in the first degree under section 569.160;
(8) Burglary in the second degree under section
569.170;
(9) Robbery in the first degree under section 569.020
as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or robbery in the
first degree under section 570.023;
(10) Distribution of drugs under section 195.211 as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017, or manufacture of a
controlled substance under section 579.055;
(11) Distribution of drugs to a minor under section
195.212 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or delivery
of a controlled substance under section 579.020;
(12) Arson in the first degree under section 569.040;
(13) Voluntary manslaughter under section 565.023;
(14) Involuntary manslaughter under section 565.024 as
it existed prior to January 1, 2017, involuntary
manslaughter in the first degree under section 565.024, or
involuntary manslaughter in the second degree under section
565.027;
(15) Second degree assault under section 565.060 as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017, or second degree assault
under section 565.052;
(16) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
(17) Felonious restraint under section 565.120 as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017, or kidnapping in the
second degree under section 565.120;
(18) Property damage in the first degree under section
569.100;
(19) The possession of a weapon under chapter 571;
(20) Child molestation in the first degree pursuant to
section 566.067 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or


child molestation in the first, second, or third degree
pursuant to section 566.067, 566.068, or 566.069;
(21) Sodomy in the second degree pursuant to section
566.061;
(22) Sexual misconduct involving a child pursuant to
section 566.083;
(23) Sexual abuse in the first degree pursuant to
section 566.100;
(24) Harassment under section 565.090 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, or harassment in the first degree
under section 565.090; or
(25) Stalking under section 565.225 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, or stalking in the first degree
under section 565.225;
committed on school property, including but not limited to
actions on any school bus in service on behalf of the
district or while involved in school activities. The policy
100 shall require that any portion of a student's individualized
101 education program that is related to demonstrated or
102 potentially violent behavior shall be provided to any
103 teacher and other school district employees who are directly
104 responsible for the student's education or who otherwise
105 interact with the student on an educational basis while
106 acting within the scope of their assigned duties. The
107 policy shall also contain the consequences of failure to
108 obey standards of conduct set by the local board of
109 education, and the importance of the standards to the
110 maintenance of an atmosphere where orderly learning is
111 possible and encouraged.
112 3. The policy shall provide that any student who is on
113 suspension for any of the offenses listed in subsection 2 of
114 this section or any act of violence or drug-related activity


115 defined by school district policy as a serious violation of
116 school discipline pursuant to subsection 9 of this section
117 shall have as a condition of his or her suspension the
118 requirement that such student is not allowed, while on such
119 suspension, to be within one thousand feet of any school
120 property in the school district where such student attended
121 school or any activity of that district, regardless of
122 whether or not the activity takes place on district property
123 unless:
124 (1) Such student is under the direct supervision of
125 the student's parent, legal guardian, or custodian and the
126 superintendent or the superintendent's designee has
127 authorized the student to be on school property;
128 (2) Such student is under the direct supervision of
129 another adult designated by the student's parent, legal
130 guardian, or custodian, in advance, in writing, to the
131 principal of the school which suspended the student and the
132 superintendent or the superintendent's designee has
133 authorized the student to be on school property;
134 (3) Such student is enrolled in and attending an
135 alternative school that is located within one thousand feet
136 of a public school in the school district where such student
137 attended school; or
138 (4) Such student resides within one thousand feet of
139 any public school in the school district where such student
140 attended school in which case such student may be on the
141 property of his or her residence without direct adult
142 supervision.
143 4. Any student who violates the condition of
144 suspension required pursuant to subsection 3 of this section
145 may be subject to expulsion or further suspension pursuant
146 to the provisions of sections 167.161, 167.164, and
147 167.171. In making this determination consideration shall


148 be given to whether the student poses a threat to the safety
149 of any child or school employee and whether such student's
150 unsupervised presence within one thousand feet of the school
151 is disruptive to the educational process or undermines the
152 effectiveness of the school's disciplinary policy. Removal
153 of any pupil who is a student with a disability is subject
154 to state and federal procedural rights. This section shall
155 not limit a school district's ability to:
156 (1) Prohibit all students who are suspended from being
157 on school property or attending an activity while on
158 suspension;
159 (2) Discipline students for off-campus conduct that
160 negatively affects the educational environment to the extent
161 allowed by law.
162 5. The policy shall provide for a suspension for a
163 period of not less than one year, or expulsion, for a
164 student who is determined to have brought a weapon to
165 school, including but not limited to the school playground
166 or the school parking lot, brought a weapon on a school bus
167 or brought a weapon to a school activity whether on or off
168 of the school property in violation of district policy,
169 except that:
170 (1) The superintendent or, in a school district with
171 no high school, the principal of the school which such child
172 attends may modify such suspension on a case-by-case basis;
173 and
174 (2) This section shall not prevent the school district
175 from providing educational services in an alternative
176 setting to a student suspended under the provisions of this
177 section.
178 6. For the purpose of this section, the term "weapon"
179 shall mean a firearm as defined under 18 U.S.C. Section 921
180 and the following items, as defined in section 571.010: a


181 blackjack, a concealable firearm, an explosive weapon, a
182 firearm, a firearm silencer, a gas gun, a knife, knuckles, a
183 machine gun, a projectile weapon, a rifle, a shotgun, a
184 spring gun or a switchblade knife; except that this section
185 shall not be construed to prohibit a school board from
186 adopting a policy to allow a Civil War reenactor to carry a
187 Civil War era weapon on school property for educational
188 purposes so long as the firearm is unloaded. The local
189 board of education shall define weapon in the discipline
190 policy. Such definition shall include the weapons defined
191 in this subsection but may also include other weapons.
192 7. All school district personnel responsible for the
193 care and supervision of students are authorized to hold
194 every pupil strictly accountable for any disorderly conduct
195 in school or on any property of the school, on any school
196 bus going to or returning from school, during school-
197 sponsored activities, or during intermission or recess
198 periods.
199 8. Teachers and other authorized district personnel in
200 public schools responsible for the care, supervision, and
201 discipline of schoolchildren, including volunteers selected
202 with reasonable care by the school district, shall not be
203 civilly liable when acting in conformity with the
204 established policies developed by each board, including but
205 not limited to policies of student discipline or when
206 reporting to his or her supervisor or other person as
207 mandated by state law acts of school violence or threatened
208 acts of school violence, within the course and scope of the
209 duties of the teacher, authorized district personnel or
210 volunteer, when such individual is acting in conformity with
211 the established policies developed by the board. Nothing in
212 this section shall be construed to create a new cause of
213 action against such school district, or to relieve the


214 school district from liability for the negligent acts of
215 such persons.
216 9. Each school board shall define in its discipline
217 policy acts of violence and any other acts that constitute a
218 serious violation of that policy. "Acts of violence" as
219 defined by school boards shall include but not be limited to
220 exertion of physical force by a student with the intent to
221 do serious bodily harm to another person while on school
222 property, including a school bus in service on behalf of the
223 district, or while involved in school activities. School
224 districts shall for each student enrolled in the school
225 district compile and maintain records of any serious
226 violation of the district's discipline policy. Such records
227 shall be made available to teachers and other school
228 district employees with a need to know while acting within
229 the scope of their assigned duties, and shall be provided as
230 required in section 167.020 to any school district in which
231 the student subsequently attempts to enroll.
232 10. [Spanking, when administered by certificated
233 personnel and in the presence of a witness who is an
234 employee of the school district, or] The use of reasonable
235 force to protect persons or property, when administered by
236 personnel of a school district in a reasonable manner in
237 accordance with the local board of education's written
238 policy of discipline, is not abuse within the meaning of
239 chapter 210.
240 11. Upon receipt of any reports of child abuse by the
241 children's division pursuant to sections 210.110 to 210.165
242 which allegedly involve personnel of a school district, the
243 children's division shall notify the superintendent of
244 schools of the district or, if the person named in the
245 alleged incident is the superintendent of schools, the


246 president of the school board of the school district where
247 the alleged incident occurred.
248 12. In order to ensure the safety of all students,
249 should a student be expelled for bringing a weapon to
250 school, violent behavior, or for an act of school violence,
251 that student shall not, for the purposes of the
252 accreditation process of the Missouri school improvement
253 plan, be considered a dropout or be included in the
254 calculation of that district's educational persistence ratio.
160.405. 1. A person, group or organization seeking
to establish a charter school shall submit the proposed
charter, as provided in this section, to a sponsor. If the
sponsor is not a school board, the applicant shall give a
copy of its application to the school board of the district
in which the charter school is to be located and to the
state board of education, within five business days of the
date the application is filed with the proposed sponsor.
The school board may file objections with the proposed
sponsor, and, if a charter is granted, the school board may
file objections with the state board of education. The
charter shall include a legally binding performance contract
that describes the obligations and responsibilities of the
school and the sponsor as outlined in sections 160.400 to
160.425 and section 167.349 and shall address the following:
(1) A mission and vision statement for the charter
school;
(2) A description of the charter school's
organizational structure and bylaws of the governing body,
which will be responsible for the policy, financial
management, and operational decisions of the charter school,
including the nature and extent of parental, professional
educator, and community involvement in the governance and
operation of the charter school;


(3) A financial plan for the first three years of
operation of the charter school including provisions for
annual audits;
(4) A description of the charter school's policy for
securing personnel services, its personnel policies,
personnel qualifications, and professional development plan;
(5) A description of the grades or ages of students
being served;
(6) The school's calendar of operation, which shall
include at least the equivalent of a full school term as
defined in section 160.011;
(7) A description of the charter school's pupil
performance standards and academic program performance
standards, which shall meet the requirements of subdivision
(6) of subsection 4 of this section. The charter school
program shall be designed to enable each pupil to achieve
such standards and shall contain a complete set of
indicators, measures, metrics, and targets for academic
program performance, including specific goals on graduation
rates and standardized test performance and academic growth;
(8) A description of the charter school's educational
program and curriculum;
(9) The term of the charter, which shall be five years
and may be renewed;
(10) Procedures, consistent with the Missouri
financial accounting manual, for monitoring the financial
accountability of the charter, which shall meet the
requirements of subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this
section;
(11) Preopening requirements for applications that
require that charter schools meet all health, safety, and
other legal requirements prior to opening;


(12) A description of the charter school's policies on
student discipline and student admission, which shall
include a statement, where applicable, of the validity of
attendance of students who do not reside in the district but
who may be eligible to attend under the terms of judicial
settlements and procedures that ensure admission of students
with disabilities in a nondiscriminatory manner;
(13) A description of the charter school's grievance
procedure for parents or guardians;
(14) A description of the agreement and time frame for
implementation between the charter school and the sponsor as
to when a sponsor shall intervene in a charter school, when
a sponsor shall revoke a charter for failure to comply with
subsection 8 of this section, and when a sponsor will not
renew a charter under subsection 9 of this section;
(15) Procedures to be implemented if the charter
school should close, as provided in subdivision (6) of
subsection 16 of section 160.400 including:
(a) Orderly transition of student records to new
schools and archival of student records;
(b) Archival of business operation and transfer or
repository of personnel records;
(c) Submission of final financial reports;
(d) Resolution of any remaining financial obligations;
(e) Disposition of the charter school's assets upon
closure; and
(f) A notification plan to inform parents or guardians
of students, the local school district, the retirement
system in which the charter school's employees participate,
and the state board of education within thirty days of the
decision to close;


(16) A description of the special education and
related services that shall be available to meet the needs
of students with disabilities; and
(17) For all new or revised charters, procedures to be
used upon closure of the charter school requiring that
unobligated assets of the charter school be returned to the
department of elementary and secondary education for their
disposition, which upon receipt of such assets shall return
them to the local school district in which the school was
located, the state, or any other entity to which they would
belong.
Charter schools operating on August 27, 2012, shall have
100 until August 28, 2015, to meet the requirements of this
101 subsection.
102 2. Proposed charters shall be subject to the following
103 requirements:
104 (1) A charter shall be submitted to the sponsor, and
105 follow the sponsor's policies and procedures for review and
106 granting of a charter approval, and be approved by the state
107 board of education by January thirty-first prior to the
108 school year of the proposed opening date of the charter
109 school;
110 (2) A charter may be approved when the sponsor
111 determines that the requirements of this section are met,
112 determines that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to
113 operate a charter school, and that the proposed charter is
114 consistent with the sponsor's charter sponsorship goals and
115 capacity. The sponsor's decision of approval or denial
116 shall be made within ninety days of the filing of the
117 proposed charter;
118 (3) If the charter is denied, the proposed sponsor
119 shall notify the applicant in writing as to the reasons for


120 its denial and forward a copy to the state board of
121 education within five business days following the denial;
122 (4) If a proposed charter is denied by a sponsor, the
123 proposed charter may be submitted to the state board of
124 education, along with the sponsor's written reasons for its
125 denial. If the state board determines that the applicant
126 meets the requirements of this section, that the applicant
127 is sufficiently qualified to operate the charter school, and
128 that granting a charter to the applicant would be likely to
129 provide educational benefit to the children of the district,
130 the state board may grant a charter and act as sponsor of
131 the charter school. The state board shall review the
132 proposed charter and make a determination of whether to deny
133 or grant the proposed charter within sixty days of receipt
134 of the proposed charter, provided that any charter to be
135 considered by the state board of education under this
136 subdivision shall be submitted no later than March first
137 prior to the school year in which the charter school intends
138 to begin operations. The state board of education shall
139 notify the applicant in writing as the reasons for its
140 denial, if applicable; and
141 (5) The sponsor of a charter school shall give
142 priority to charter school applicants that propose a school
143 oriented to high-risk students and to the reentry of
144 dropouts into the school system. If a sponsor grants three
145 or more charters, at least one-third of the charters granted
146 by the sponsor shall be to schools that actively recruit
147 dropouts or high-risk students as their student body and
148 address the needs of dropouts or high-risk students through
149 their proposed mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and
150 services. For purposes of this subsection, a "high-risk"
151 student is one who is at least one year behind in
152 satisfactory completion of course work or obtaining high


153 school credits for graduation, has dropped out of school, is
154 at risk of dropping out of school, needs drug and alcohol
155 treatment, has severe behavioral problems, has been
156 suspended from school three or more times, has a history of
157 severe truancy, is a pregnant or parenting teen, has been
158 referred for enrollment by the judicial system, is exiting
159 incarceration, is a refugee, is homeless or has been
160 homeless sometime within the preceding six months, has been
161 referred by an area school district for enrollment in an
162 alternative program, or qualifies as high risk under
163 department of elementary and secondary education
164 guidelines. Dropout shall be defined through the guidelines
165 of the school core data report. The provisions of this
166 subsection do not apply to charters sponsored by the state
167 board of education.
168 3. If a charter is approved by a sponsor, the charter
169 application shall be submitted to the state board of
170 education, along with a statement of finding by the sponsor
171 that the application meets the requirements of sections
172 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and a monitoring plan
173 under which the charter sponsor shall evaluate the academic
174 performance, including annual performance reports, of
175 students enrolled in the charter school. The state board of
176 education shall approve or deny a charter application within
177 sixty days of receipt of the application. The state board
178 of education may deny a charter on grounds that the
179 application fails to meet the requirements of sections
180 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 or that a charter
181 sponsor previously failed to meet the statutory
182 responsibilities of a charter sponsor. Any denial of a
183 charter application made by the state board of education
184 shall be in writing and shall identify the specific failures
185 of the application to meet the requirements of sections


186 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349, and the written
187 denial shall be provided within ten business days to the
188 sponsor.
189 4. A charter school shall, as provided in its charter:
190 (1) Be nonsectarian in its programs, admission
191 policies, employment practices, and all other operations;
192 (2) Comply with laws and regulations of the state,
193 county, or city relating to health, safety, and state
194 minimum educational standards, as specified by the state
195 board of education, including the requirements relating to
196 student discipline under sections 160.261, 167.161, 167.164,
197 and 167.171, notification of criminal conduct to law
198 enforcement authorities under sections 167.115 to 167.117,
199 academic assessment under section 160.518, transmittal of
200 school records under section 167.020, the minimum amount of
201 school time required under section 171.031, and the employee
202 criminal history background check and the family care safety
203 registry check under section 168.133;
204 (3) Except as provided in sections 160.400 to 160.425
205 and as specifically provided in other sections, be exempt
206 from all laws and rules relating to schools, governing
207 boards and school districts;
208 (4) Be financially accountable, use practices
209 consistent with the Missouri financial accounting manual,
210 provide for an annual audit by a certified public
211 accountant, publish audit reports and annual financial
212 reports as provided in chapter 165, provided that the annual
213 financial report may be published on the department of
214 elementary and secondary education's internet website in
215 addition to other publishing requirements, and provide
216 liability insurance to indemnify the school, its board,
217 staff and teachers against tort claims. A charter school
218 that receives local educational agency status under


219 subsection 6 of this section shall meet the requirements
220 imposed by the Elementary and Secondary Education Act for
221 audits of such agencies and comply with all federal audit
222 requirements for charters with local educational agency
223 status. For purposes of an audit by petition under section
224 29.230, a charter school shall be treated as a political
225 subdivision on the same terms and conditions as the school
226 district in which it is located. For the purposes of
227 securing such insurance, a charter school shall be eligible
228 for the Missouri public entity risk management fund pursuant
229 to section 537.700. A charter school that incurs debt shall
230 include a repayment plan in its financial plan;
231 (5) Provide a comprehensive program of instruction for
232 at least one grade or age group from early childhood through
233 grade twelve, as specified in its charter;
234 (6) (a) Design a method to measure pupil progress
235 toward the pupil academic standards adopted by the state
236 board of education pursuant to section 160.514, establish
237 baseline student performance in accordance with the
238 performance contract during the first year of operation,
239 collect student performance data as defined by the annual
240 performance report throughout the duration of the charter to
241 annually monitor student academic performance, and to the
242 extent applicable based upon grade levels offered by the
243 charter school, participate in the statewide system of
244 assessments, comprised of the essential skills tests and the
245 nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement tests,
246 as designated by the state board pursuant to section
247 160.518, complete and distribute an annual report card as
248 prescribed in section 160.522, which shall also include a
249 statement that background checks have been completed on the
250 charter school's board members, and report to its sponsor,
251 the local school district, and the state board of education


252 as to its teaching methods and any educational innovations
253 and the results thereof. No charter school shall be
254 considered in the Missouri school improvement program review
255 of the district in which it is located for the resource or
256 process standards of the program.
257 (b) For proposed high-risk or alternative charter
258 schools, sponsors shall approve performance measures based
259 on mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and services.
260 Sponsors shall also approve comprehensive academic and
261 behavioral measures to determine whether students are
262 meeting performance standards on a different time frame as
263 specified in that school's charter. Student performance
264 shall be assessed comprehensively to determine whether a
265 high-risk or alternative charter school has documented
266 adequate student progress. Student performance shall be
267 based on sponsor-approved comprehensive measures as well as
268 standardized public school measures. Annual presentation of
269 charter school report card data to the department of
270 elementary and secondary education, the state board, and the
271 public shall include comprehensive measures of student
272 progress.
273 (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as
274 permitting a charter school to be held to lower performance
275 standards than other public schools within a district;
276 however, the charter of a charter school may permit students
277 to meet performance standards on a different time frame as
278 specified in its charter. The performance standards for
279 alternative and special purpose charter schools that target
280 high-risk students as defined in subdivision (5) of
281 subsection 2 of this section shall be based on measures
282 defined in the school's performance contract with its
283 sponsors;


284 (7) Comply with all applicable federal and state laws
285 and regulations regarding students with disabilities,
286 including sections 162.670 to 162.710, the Individuals with
287 Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400) and
288 Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C.
289 Section 794) or successor legislation;
290 (8) Provide along with any request for review by the
291 state board of education the following:
292 (a) Documentation that the applicant has provided a
293 copy of the application to the school board of the district
294 in which the charter school is to be located, except in
295 those circumstances where the school district is the sponsor
296 of the charter school; and
297 (b) A statement outlining the reasons for approval or
298 denial by the sponsor, specifically addressing the
299 requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349.
300 5. (1) Proposed or existing high-risk or alternative
301 charter schools may include alternative arrangements for
302 students to obtain credit for satisfying graduation
303 requirements in the school's charter application and
304 charter. Alternative arrangements may include, but not be
305 limited to, credit for off-campus instruction, embedded
306 credit, work experience through an internship arranged
307 through the school, and independent studies. When the state
308 board of education approves the charter, any such
309 alternative arrangements shall be approved at such time.
310 (2) The department of elementary and secondary
311 education shall conduct a study of any charter school
312 granted alternative arrangements for students to obtain
313 credit under this subsection after three years of operation
314 to assess student performance, graduation rates, educational
315 outcomes, and entry into the workforce or higher education.


316 6. The charter of a charter school may be amended at
317 the request of the governing body of the charter school and
318 on the approval of the sponsor. The sponsor and the
319 governing board and staff of the charter school shall
320 jointly review the school's performance, management and
321 operations during the first year of operation and then every
322 other year after the most recent review or at any point
323 where the operation or management of the charter school is
324 changed or transferred to another entity, either public or
325 private. The governing board of a charter school may amend
326 the charter, if the sponsor approves such amendment, or the
327 sponsor and the governing board may reach an agreement in
328 writing to reflect the charter school's decision to become a
329 local educational agency. In such case the sponsor shall
330 give the department of elementary and secondary education
331 written notice no later than March first of any year, with
332 the agreement to become effective July first. The
333 department may waive the March first notice date in its
334 discretion. The department shall identify and furnish a
335 list of its regulations that pertain to local educational
336 agencies to such schools within thirty days of receiving
337 such notice.
338 7. Sponsors shall annually review the charter school's
339 compliance with statutory standards including:
340 (1) Participation in the statewide system of
341 assessments, as designated by the state board of education
342 under section 160.518;
343 (2) Assurances for the completion and distribution of
344 an annual report card as prescribed in section 160.522;
345 (3) The collection of baseline data during the first
346 three years of operation to determine the longitudinal
347 success of the charter school;


348 (4) A method to measure pupil progress toward the
349 pupil academic standards adopted by the state board of
350 education under section 160.514; and
351 (5) Publication of each charter school's annual
352 performance report.
353 8. (1) (a) A sponsor's policies shall give schools
354 clear, adequate, evidence-based, and timely notice of
355 contract violations or performance deficiencies and mandate
356 intervention based upon findings of the state board of
357 education of the following:
358 a. The charter school provides a high school program
359 which fails to maintain a graduation rate of at least
360 seventy percent in three of the last four school years
361 unless the school has dropout recovery as its mission;
362 b. The charter school's annual performance report
363 results are below the district's annual performance report
364 results based on the performance standards that are
365 applicable to the grade level configuration of both the
366 charter school and the district in which the charter school
367 is located in three of the last four school years; and
368 c. The charter school is identified as a persistently
369 lowest achieving school by the department of elementary and
370 secondary education.
371 (b) A sponsor shall have a policy to revoke a charter
372 during the charter term if there is:
373 a. Clear evidence of underperformance as demonstrated
374 in the charter school's annual performance report in three
375 of the last four school years; or
376 b. A violation of the law or the public trust that
377 imperils students or public funds.
378 (c) A sponsor shall revoke a charter or take other
379 appropriate remedial action, which may include placing the
380 charter school on probationary status for no more than


381 twenty-four months, provided that no more than one
382 designation of probationary status shall be allowed for the
383 duration of the charter contract, at any time if the charter
384 school commits a serious breach of one or more provisions of
385 its charter or on any of the following grounds: failure to
386 meet the performance contract as set forth in its charter,
387 failure to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal
388 management, failure to provide information necessary to
389 confirm compliance with all provisions of the charter and
390 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 within forty-five
391 days following receipt of written notice requesting such
392 information, or violation of law.
393 (2) The sponsor may place the charter school on
394 probationary status to allow the implementation of a
395 remedial plan, which may require a change of methodology, a
396 change in leadership, or both, after which, if such plan is
397 unsuccessful, the charter may be revoked.
398 (3) At least sixty days before acting to revoke a
399 charter, the sponsor shall notify the governing board of the
400 charter school of the proposed action in writing. The
401 notice shall state the grounds for the proposed action. The
402 school's governing board may request in writing a hearing
403 before the sponsor within two weeks of receiving the notice.
404 (4) The sponsor of a charter school shall establish
405 procedures to conduct administrative hearings upon
406 determination by the sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a
407 charter. Final decisions of a sponsor from hearings
408 conducted pursuant to this subsection are subject to an
409 appeal to the state board of education, which shall
410 determine whether the charter shall be revoked.
411 (5) A termination shall be effective only at the
412 conclusion of the school year, unless the sponsor determines


413 that continued operation of the school presents a clear and
414 immediate threat to the health and safety of the children.
415 (6) A charter sponsor shall make available the school
416 accountability report card information as provided under
417 section 160.522 and the results of the academic monitoring
418 required under subsection 3 of this section.
419 9. (1) A sponsor shall take all reasonable steps
420 necessary to confirm that each charter school sponsored by
421 such sponsor is in material compliance and remains in
422 material compliance with all material provisions of the
423 charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349. Every
424 charter school shall provide all information necessary to
425 confirm ongoing compliance with all provisions of its
426 charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 in a
427 timely manner to its sponsor.
428 (2) The sponsor's renewal process of the charter
429 school shall be based on the thorough analysis of a
430 comprehensive body of objective evidence and consider if:
431 (a) The charter school has maintained results on its
432 annual performance report that meet or exceed the district
433 in which the charter school is located based on the
434 performance standards that are applicable to the grade-level
435 configuration of both the charter school and the district in
436 which the charter school is located in three of the last
437 four school years;
438 (b) The charter school is organizationally and
439 fiscally viable determining at a minimum that the school
440 does not have:
441 a. A negative balance in its operating funds;
442 b. A combined balance of less than three percent of
443 the amount expended for such funds during the previous
444 fiscal year; or


445 c. Expenditures that exceed receipts for the most
446 recently completed fiscal year;
447 (c) The charter is in compliance with its legally
448 binding performance contract and sections 160.400 to 160.425
449 and section 167.349; and
450 (d) The charter school has an annual performance
451 report consistent with a classification of accredited for
452 three of the last four years and is fiscally viable as
453 described in paragraph (b) of this subdivision. If such is
454 the case, the charter school may have an expedited renewal
455 process as defined by rule of the department of elementary
456 and secondary education.
457 (3) (a) Beginning August first during the year in
458 which a charter is considered for renewal, a charter school
459 sponsor shall demonstrate to the state board of education
460 that the charter school is in compliance with federal and
461 state law as provided in sections 160.400 to 160.425 and
462 section 167.349 and the school's performance contract
463 including but not limited to those requirements specific to
464 academic performance.
465 (b) Along with data reflecting the academic
466 performance standards indicated in paragraph (a) of this
467 subdivision, the sponsor shall submit a revised charter
468 application to the state board of education for review.
469 (c) Using the data requested and the revised charter
470 application under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
471 subdivision, the state board of education shall determine if
472 compliance with all standards enumerated in this subdivision
473 has been achieved. The state board of education at its next
474 regularly scheduled meeting shall vote on the revised
475 charter application.


476 (d) If a charter school sponsor demonstrates the
477 objectives identified in this subdivision, the state board
478 of education shall renew the school's charter.
479 10. A school district may enter into a lease with a
480 charter school for physical facilities.
481 11. A governing board or a school district employee
482 who has control over personnel actions shall not take
483 unlawful reprisal against another employee at the school
484 district because the employee is directly or indirectly
485 involved in an application to establish a charter school. A
486 governing board or a school district employee shall not take
487 unlawful reprisal against an educational program of the
488 school or the school district because an application to
489 establish a charter school proposes the conversion of all or
490 a portion of the educational program to a charter school.
491 As used in this subsection, "unlawful reprisal" means an
492 action that is taken by a governing board or a school
493 district employee as a direct result of a lawful application
494 to establish a charter school and that is adverse to another
495 employee or an educational program.
496 12. Charter school board members shall be subject to
497 the same liability for acts while in office as if they were
498 regularly and duly elected members of school boards in any
499 other public school district in this state. The governing
500 board of a charter school may participate, to the same
501 extent as a school board, in the Missouri public entity risk
502 management fund in the manner provided under sections
503 537.700 to 537.756.
504 13. Any entity, either public or private, operating,
505 administering, or otherwise managing a charter school shall
506 be considered a quasi-public governmental body and subject
507 to the provisions of sections 610.010 to 610.035.


508 14. The chief financial officer of a charter school
509 shall maintain:
510 (1) A surety bond in an amount determined by the
511 sponsor to be adequate based on the cash flow of the school;
512 or
513 (2) An insurance policy issued by an insurance company
514 licensed to do business in Missouri on all employees in the
515 amount of five hundred thousand dollars or more that
516 provides coverage in the event of employee theft.
517 15. The department of elementary and secondary
518 education shall calculate an annual performance report for
519 each charter school and shall publish it in the same manner
520 as annual performance reports are calculated and published
521 for districts and attendance centers.
522 [16. The joint committee on education shall create a
523 committee to investigate facility access and affordability
524 for charter schools. The committee shall be comprised of
525 equal numbers of the charter school sector and the public
526 school sector and shall report its findings to the general
527 assembly by December 31, 2016.]
167.225. 1. [As used in subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Braille", the system of reading and writing
through touch;
(2) "Student", any student who has an impairment in
vision that, even with correction, adversely affects a
child's educational performance and who is determined
eligible for special education services under the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
2. All students shall receive instruction in Braille
reading and writing as part of their individualized
education plan unless the individual education program team
determines, after an evaluation of a student's reading and


writing skills, needs, and appropriate reading and writing
media, including an evaluation of the student's future needs
for instruction in Braille or the use of Braille, that
instruction in Braille or the use of Braille is not
appropriate. No student shall be denied instruction in
Braille reading and writing solely because the student has
some remaining vision.
3. Instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be
sufficient to enable each student to communicate effectively
and efficiently at a level commensurate with the student's
sighted peers of comparable grade level and intellectual
functioning. The student's individualized education plan
shall specify:
(1) How Braille will be implemented as the primary
mode for learning through integration with normal classroom
activities. If Braille will not be provided to a child who
is blind, the reason for not incorporating it in the
individualized education plan shall be documented therein;
(2) The date on which Braille instruction will
commence;
(3) The level of competency in Braille reading and
writing to be achieved by the end of the period covered by
the individualized education plan; and
(4) The duration of each session.
4. As part of the certification process, teachers
certified in the education of blind and visually impaired
children shall be required to demonstrate competence in
reading and writing Braille. The department of elementary
and secondary education shall adopt assessment procedures to
assess such competencies which are consistent with standards
adopted by the National Library Service for the Blind and
Physically Handicapped, Library of Congress, Washington, D.C.


5.] (1) Subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this section
shall be known and may be cited as the "Blind Students'
Rights to Independence, Training, and Education Act" or the
"BRITE Act".
(2) As used in subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this
section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Accessible assistive technology device", an
assistive technology device, as defined in 20 U.S.C. Section
1401, as amended, that provides blind or visually impaired
students the benefits of an educational program in an
equally effective and integrated manner as that provided to
nondisabled students;
(b) "Adequate instruction", the quality teaching of
blind or visually impaired students, as it pertains to
general education and necessary blindness skills, in
alignment with the U.S. Department of Education's definition
of free appropriate public education, as defined in 20
U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended;
(c) "Blind or visually impaired student":
a. A child who:
(i) Has an individualized education program (IEP) or
an individualized family service plan (IFSP), as such terms
are defined in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended, or a 504
plan created under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation
Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended; and
(ii) Is identified as having the disability of visual
impairment (including blindness) within the definition of
child with a disability in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as
amended; or
b. An individual who is deaf-blind under the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), as
amended, or other federal law;


(d) "Braille", the system of reading and writing
through touch;
(e) "Expanded core curriculum", a disability-specific
curriculum that compensates for vision loss, is foundational
to all other learning, and that covers the nine essential
areas of compensatory access, sensory efficiency, assistive
technology, orientation and mobility, social interaction,
recreation and leisure, independent living, self-
determination, and career education;
(f) "Grade level instruction", instruction that aligns
with state-designated content standards and curricula for
students of the same age or level of maturity, based on the
development of intellectual, emotional, physical, and
behavioral capacity that is typical for the student's age or
age group;
(g) "Local educational agency" or "LEA", the same
definition as in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended;
(h) "Nonvisual access", the ability of a blind or
visually impaired student to use all functions of a device,
without using the student's vision, in an equally effective,
equally integrated manner and with equivalent ease of use as
the student's sighted peers;
100 (i) "Nonvisual skills", skills that are taught in such
101 a way that the student does not need to use any vision;
102 (j) "State educational agency", the same definition as
103 in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended;
104 (k) "Technology-mediated learning environments and
105 methods", the settings in which electronic and information
106 technology including, but not limited to, the following is
107 used:
108 a. Computer-based applications and simulations;
109 b. Personal and mobile computing devices such as
110 smartphones or tablets;


111 c. Web-based platforms;
112 d. Online or distance-learning programs;
113 e. Video games; and
114 f. Exhibits or installations that feature digital
115 media, wearable technology, or other tools that support
116 participants' engagement with new knowledge, skills, or
117 practices;
118 (l) "U.S. Access Board", the independent federal
119 agency created in 1973 that promotes equality for people
120 with disabilities through leadership in accessible design
121 and the development of accessibility guidelines and
122 standards.
123 [6.] 2. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student
124 shall receive instruction in Braille reading and writing as
125 part of such student's individualized education program
126 (IEP) or individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless
127 the IEP or IFSP team determines, after an evaluation of the
128 student's reading and writing skills, needs, and appropriate
129 reading and writing media including, but not limited to, an
130 evaluation of the student's needs for instruction in Braille
131 or the use of Braille, that instruction in Braille or the
132 use of Braille is not appropriate. No blind or visually
133 impaired student shall be denied instruction in Braille
134 reading and writing solely because the student has some
135 vision. During the evaluation and IEP process,
136 consideration shall be given regarding appropriate Braille
137 instruction based on a potential vision loss due to a
138 degenerative medical diagnosis.
139 (2) In conjunction with the U.S. Department of
140 Education's Braille presumption requirement in the federal
141 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), as
142 amended, instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be
143 sufficient to enable each blind or visually impaired student


144 to communicate effectively and efficiently at a level
145 commensurate with the student's same age and with the
146 student's nondisabled peers of comparable intellectual
147 ability. The blind or visually impaired student's
148 individualized education program (IEP) or individualized
149 family support plan (IFSP) shall specify:
150 (a) The results obtained from an evaluation of the
151 blind or visually impaired student's reading and writing
152 skills, needs, and appropriate reading and writing media
153 including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the blind or
154 visually impaired student's needs for instruction in Braille
155 or the use of Braille including, but not limited to,
156 consideration regarding appropriate Braille instruction
157 based on a potential vision loss due to a degenerative
158 medical diagnosis;
159 (b) How Braille will be implemented, if needed as
160 determined by the IEP team, as a primary mode for learning
161 through integration with other classroom activities;
162 (c) The length of the period of instruction and the
163 frequency and duration of each instructional session as
164 determined by the IEP team, which shall, as closely as
165 appropriate based on individual needs, be identical to the
166 level of instruction provided to nondisabled peers; and
167 (d) The level of competency in Braille reading and
168 writing to be achieved by the end of the period.
169 (3) Use, and provision, of Braille materials for
170 reading and writing shall be addressed in 504 plans for
171 blind or visually impaired students created under Section
172 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.
173 Section 794, as amended.
174 [7.] 3. In conjunction with academic achievement and
175 functional performance requirements of 34 CFR
176 300.320(a)(2)(i), as amended, instruction in expanded core


177 curriculum shall be provided to blind or visually impaired
178 students to support progress in the general education
179 curriculum.
180 [8.] 4. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student
181 shall receive instruction in assistive technology as part of
182 the student's individualized education program (IEP) or
183 individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless the IEP or
184 IFSP team determines, after an evaluation of a student's
185 needs, that instruction in assistive technology is not
186 appropriate. No student shall be denied instruction in
187 assistive technology solely because the student has some
188 vision.
189 (2) In conjunction with accessible assistive
190 technology requirements of the federal Individuals with
191 Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) in 20 U.S.C. Section
192 1412(a)(12)(B)(i), as amended, the blind or visually
193 impaired student shall receive grade-level instruction that
194 will equip the blind or visually impaired student with the
195 appropriate technology-mediated learning environments and
196 methods to perform on the same level of proficiency expected
197 of peers of comparable intellectual ability and grade
198 level. The blind or visually impaired student's IEP or IFSP
199 shall specify:
200 (a) The results obtained from an assessment of the
201 blind or visually impaired student's skills, needs, and
202 appropriate accessible assistive technology including, but
203 not limited to, an evaluation of the future needs for
204 accessible assistive technology training or the use of
205 accessible assistive technology;
206 (b) How accessible assistive technology will be
207 implemented as a primary mode for learning through
208 integration with other classroom activities;


209 (c) The frequency and duration of each instructional
210 session;
211 (d) The level of mastery of the accessible assistive
212 technology specified by the blind or visually impaired
213 student's assessment to be achieved by the end of the
214 period; and
215 (e) Acknowledgment that either:
216 a. The blind or visually impaired student may
217 transport the accessible assistive technology to and from
218 school without the need for payment, family assumption of
219 liability for loss or damage, or any other cost to the blind
220 or visually impaired student or the family; or
221 b. If the accessible assistive technology remains at
222 school, the LEA will provide duplicate accessible assistive
223 technology in the blind or visually impaired student's home
224 without requiring payment, family assumption of liability
225 for loss or damage, or any other cost to the blind or
226 visually impaired student or the family.
227 (3) Use, and provision, of accessible assistive
228 technology shall be addressed in 504 plans for blind or
229 visually impaired students created under Section 504 of the
230 federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794,
231 as amended.
232 [9.] 5. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student
233 shall receive instruction in orientation and mobility as
234 part of the student's individualized education program (IEP)
235 or individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless the IEP
236 or IFSP team determines, after an evaluation of a student's
237 needs, that instruction in orientation and mobility is not
238 appropriate. No student shall be denied instruction in
239 orientation and mobility solely because the student has some
240 vision.


241 (2) In conjunction with orientation and mobility
242 services requirements of 34 CFR 300.34(c)(7), as amended,
243 blind or visually impaired students shall receive
244 orientation and mobility instruction to equip each blind or
245 visually impaired student with the age-appropriate tools,
246 techniques, and nonvisual skills to navigate in and around
247 the student's home, schools, communities, and other
248 environments as applicable, and as expected of peers of
249 comparable intellectual ability and grade level. The blind
250 or visually impaired student's IEP or IFSP shall specify:
251 (a) The results obtained from an evaluation of the
252 blind or visually impaired student's orientation and
253 mobility needs including, but not limited to, an evaluation
254 of the blind or visually impaired student's future needs for
255 instruction in orientation and mobility;
256 (b) How orientation and mobility will be integrated
257 into the home, school, and community;
258 (c) The date on which orientation and mobility
259 instruction will commence;
260 (d) The frequency and duration of each instructional
261 session; and
262 (e) The level of mastery of orientation and mobility
263 skills to be achieved by the end of the period.
264 (3) Orientation and mobility equipment,
265 accommodations, and modifications shall be addressed in 504
266 plans for blind or visually impaired students created under
267 Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29
268 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended.
269 (4) An orientation and mobility evaluation shall be
270 conducted by a person who is appropriately certified by the
271 National Blindness Professional Certification Board (NBPCB)
272 with a National Orientation and Mobility Certification
273 (NOMC), or through the Academy for Certification of Vision


274 Rehabilitation and Education Professionals (ACVREP) as a
275 Certified Orientation and Mobility Specialist (COMS), or who
276 holds a nationally recognized certification related to
277 orientation and mobility.
278 (5) The orientation and mobility evaluations described
279 in subdivision (4) of this subsection shall occur in
280 familiar and unfamiliar environments, during the daytime and
281 nighttime, and around the home, school, and community as
282 determined age appropriate by the blind or visually impaired
283 student's IEP or IFSP.
284 [10.] 6. (1) As part of the state educational
285 agency's certification and renewal process, educators hired
286 to teach Braille shall be certified teachers of students
287 with visual impairments, hold a current and valid National
288 Certification in Unified English Braille (NCUEB) working
289 under the supervision of a reading specialist, or hold a
290 nationally recognized certification related to Braille
291 instruction.
292 (2) As part of the state educational agency's
293 certification and renewal process, educators hired to teach
294 accessible assistive technology shall be certified teachers
295 of students with visual impairments, hold a valid and
296 current Certified Assistive Technology Instructional
297 Specialist for People with Visual Impairments (CATIS), or
298 hold a valid and current National Certification in Access
299 Technology for the Blind (NCATB) or other nationally
300 recognized certification related to assistive technology
301 instruction for individuals with visual impairments.
302 (3) As part of the state educational agency's
303 certification and renewal process, specialists hired to
304 teach orientation and mobility shall hold a valid and
305 current National Orientation and Mobility Certification
306 (NOMC) or hold a current and valid Certified Orientation and


307 Mobility Specialist (COMS) certification or other nationally
308 recognized certification related to orientation and mobility
309 instruction for individuals with visual impairments.
310 [11.] 7. (1) LEAs shall deliver services to blind or
311 visually impaired students in a manner that at all times
312 abides by requirements of the federal Individuals with
313 Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), Title II of the Americans
314 with Disabilities Act, and the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
315 as amended, including during declared local, state, or
316 national emergencies.
317 (2) LEAs shall seek and obtain proof of currently
318 available certified professionals from any company, agency,
319 or individual the LEA intends to contract with for services
320 outlined in subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this section.
321 (3) LEAs shall not impose any preclusions or
322 limitations on a student to receive instruction in
323 orientation and mobility services in and around the home,
324 school, or community setting including during daytime and
325 nighttime hours.
326 (4) LEAs may require annual written parental consent
327 to conduct effective instruction when such services are
328 provided before or after regular school hours or when such
329 services are provided away from the educational institution
330 or the blind or visually impaired student's residence.
331 (5) If an LEA prohibits an orientation and mobility
332 instructor from using the instructor's preferred mode of
333 transportation to transport blind or visually impaired
334 students to and from outside environments, the LEA shall
335 provide an equally effective transportation alternative for
336 that purpose without cost to the orientation and mobility
337 instructor. If the blind or visually impaired student's
338 family provides transportation for the student, the LEA
339 shall reimburse the expense.


340 [12.] 8. (1) If an LEA requires an eye report, the
341 LEA shall bear all costs associated with obtaining such
342 report. LEAs shall not delay an evaluation for eligibility
343 based on the absence or delay of such report.
344 (2) All electronic and information technology
345 developed, procured, maintained, or used by LEAs shall be
346 compliant with the U.S. Access Board's Section 508
347 standards, as amended.
348 (3) LEAs shall anticipate the need for nonvisual
349 accessibility and adopt policies and procedures to reduce or
350 eliminate common barriers experienced by blind or visually
351 impaired students, parents, educators, administrators, and
352 other staff.
353 [13. Subsections 1 to 4 of this section shall apply in
354 all school years ending before July 1, 2022. Subsections 5
355 to 12 of]
356 9. This section shall apply in school year 2022-23 and
357 all subsequent school years.
167.950. 1. (1) By December 31, 2017, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall develop
guidelines for the appropriate screening of students for
dyslexia and related disorders and the necessary classroom
support for students with dyslexia and related disorders.
[Such guidelines shall be consistent with the findings and
recommendations of the task force created under section
633.420.]
(2) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years,
each public school, including each charter school, shall
conduct dyslexia screenings for students in the appropriate
year consistent with the guidelines developed by the
department of elementary and secondary education.
(3) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years,
the school board of each district and the governing board of


each charter school shall provide reasonable classroom
support consistent with the guidelines developed by the
department of elementary and secondary education.
2. In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years,
the practicing teacher assistance programs established under
section 168.400 shall offer and include two hours of in-
service training provided by each local school district for
all practicing teachers in such district regarding dyslexia
and related disorders. Each charter school shall also offer
all of its teachers two hours of training on dyslexia and
related disorders. Districts and charter schools may seek
assistance from the department of elementary and secondary
education in developing and providing such training.
Completion of such training shall count as two contact hours
of professional development under section 168.021.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Dyslexia", a disorder that is neurological in
origin, characterized by difficulties with accurate and
fluent word recognition and poor spelling and decoding
abilities that typically result from a deficit in the
phonological component of language, often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of
effective classroom instruction, and of which secondary
consequences may include problems in reading comprehension
and reduced reading experience that can impede growth of
vocabulary and background knowledge. Nothing in this
definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain
an individualized education program (IEP) unless the student
has otherwise met the federal conditions necessary;
(2) "Dyslexia screening", a short test conducted by a
teacher or school counselor to determine whether a student
likely has dyslexia or a related disorder in which a


positive result does not represent a medical diagnosis but
indicates that the student could benefit from approved
support;
(3) "Related disorders", disorders similar to or
related to dyslexia, such as developmental auditory
imperception, dysphasia, specific developmental dyslexia,
developmental dysgraphia, and developmental spelling
disability;
(4) "Support", low-cost and effective best practices,
such as oral examinations and extended test-taking periods,
used to support students who have dyslexia or any related
disorder.
4. The state board of education shall promulgate rules
and regulations for each public school to screen students
for dyslexia and related disorders and to provide the
necessary classroom support for students with dyslexia and
related disorders. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2016, shall be invalid and void.
5. Nothing in this section shall require the MO
HealthNet program to expand the services that it provides.
173.2510. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "15 to Finish Act".


2. The coordinating board for higher education, in
cooperation with public institutions of higher education in
this state, shall develop policies that promote the on-time
completion of degree programs by students. The policies
shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Defining on-time completion for specific levels of
postsecondary credentials;
(2) Providing financial incentives to students during
their senior year of undergraduate study who are on pace to
graduate in no more than eight semesters; and
(3) Reducing, when feasible and permitted by
accreditation or occupational licensure, the number of
credit hours required to earn a degree.
[3. By December 1, 2017, the department of higher
education and workforce development shall provide a report
to the governor and the general assembly describing the
actions taken to implement these provisions.]
178.697. 1. Funding for sections 178.691 to 178.699
shall be made available pursuant to section 163.031 and
shall be subject to appropriations made for this purpose.
2. Costs of contractual arrangements shall be the
obligation of the school district of residence of each
preschool child. Costs of contractual arrangements shall
not exceed an amount equal to an amount reimbursable to the
school districts under the provisions of sections 178.691 to
178.699.
3. Payments for participants for programs outlined in
section 178.693 shall be uniform for all districts or public
agencies.
[4. Families with children under the age of
kindergarten entry shall be eligible to receive annual
development screenings and parents shall be eligible to
receive prenatal visits under sections 178.691 to 178.699.


Priority for service delivery of approved parent education
programs under sections 178.691 to 178.699, which includes,
but is not limited to, home visits, group meetings,
screenings, and service referrals, shall be given to high-
needs families in accordance with criteria set forth by the
department of elementary and secondary education. Local
school districts may establish cost sharing strategies to
supplement funding for such program services. The
provisions of this subsection shall expire on December 31,
2015, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]
184.350. 1. Whenever qualified voters representing
five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in any constitutional charter city not
located within a county and qualified voters representing
five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in a constitutional charter county
adjoining such city shall file verified petitions for the
establishment of a metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, comprising a zoological subdistrict, and art
museum subdistrict or a St. Louis Science Center subdistrict
with the respective election officials of such city and
county, respectively, requesting such election officials to
submit a proposition for the establishment of a metropolitan
zoological park and museum district comprised of a
zoological subdistrict, and art museum subdistrict and a St.
Louis Science Center subdistrict at the next general or
primary election for the election of state officers or
special election for the submission of such proposition,
such election officials shall communicate to their
corresponding counterparts and the chief executive officers
of the respective city and county the fact a verified
petition has been filed. At such time that both election
officials have received the verified petitions described


above, then such officials shall submit the above described
proposition or propositions to the qualified voters of such
city and county at the next general or primary election for
the election of state officers or special election. Such
election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty
days prior to such general or primary election or special
election in at least two newspapers that such proposition or
propositions shall be submitted at the next general or
primary election or special election held for submission of
this proposition.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:
Shall there be established a Metropolitan
Zoological Park and Museum District comprising
the City of ______ and the County of ______
which district shall consist of all or any one
of the following subdistricts:
a. Zoological Subdistrict with a tax rate not
in excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of all taxable property within the
district.
□FOR □AGAINST
b. Art Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not
in excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the
district.
□FOR □AGAINST
c. St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict with a
tax rate not in excess of one cent on each $100
of assessed valuation of taxable property within
the district.
□FOR □AGAINST


3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such propositions in such city and the majority of voters
voting on such propositions in such county at said election
cast votes "FOR" one or more of the propositions, then the
district shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board, for such subdistrict shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
year following the year of said election. The results of
the aforesaid election shall be certified by the election
officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county
not less than thirty days after the day of election. In the
event one or more of the propositions shall fail to receive
a majority of the votes "FOR" in either the city or the
county, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at
any election held within one year of the date of the
election the proposition was rejected. Any such
resubmissions of one or more of such propositions shall
substantially comply with the provisions of sections 184.350
to [184.384] 184.382.
4. All costs of the election shall be paid as provided
by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
184.351. 1. The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350
to [184.384] 184.382, on behalf of the district may request
the election officials of any city and county containing all
or part of such district to submit a proposition to increase
the maximum tax rate for the St. Louis Science Center
subdistrict set in section 184.350, to the qualified voters
of such district at any general or primary or special
election. Such election officials shall give legal notice
as provided in chapter 115.


2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:
Shall the Zoological Park and Museum District of
the City of ______ and County of ______ be
authorized to increase the St. Louis Science
Center Subdistrict to a tax rate not in excess
of six cents on each $100 of assessed valuation
of taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise
financially supporting the subdistrict? The tax
rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the St. Louis Science
Center and approved by the board. This rate
shall replace the present tax rate of ______
cent for the St. Louis Science Center
Subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition in such city and the majority of voters
voting on such proposition in such county at such election
cast votes "YES" for the proposition, then the tax rate for
such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force and effect as
of the first day of the second month following the
election. The results of the aforesaid election shall be
certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of
such city and county not less than thirty days after the day
on which such election was held. All costs of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a
majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the
county, then such proposition shall not be resubmitted at
any election held within one year of the date of the
election at which such proposition was rejected.


184.352. The following terms whenever used or referred
to in sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382 shall unless a
different intent clearly appears from the context be
construed to have the following meaning:
(1) "African-American history museum and cultural
subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict which
shall provide for the collection, preservation, and
exhibition of items relating to the history and culture of
African-Americans, more specifically for interpretation
through core exhibits that may include wax sculptures,
photographs, paintings, and other artistic expressions; and
further for the collection of costumes, archaeological
anthropological material, artifacts, and memorabilia; and
for the maintenance of archives, including manuscripts,
personal records, and other material that relates to the
African-American experience to American history; and to
provide for the preservation of American music traditions,
including ragtime, jazz, blues, and gospel; and to provide
technical assistance and advisory service for historic
research or which may contract with another person with the
capability of providing such services;
(2) "Art museum subdistrict" shall consist of such
institutions and places for the purpose of collection and
exhibition of pictures, statuary and other works of art and
whatever else may be of artistic interest and appropriate
for exhibition in an art gallery or museum for instruction
in art and in general for the promotion by all proper means
of aesthetic or artistic education;
(3) "Board", the governing body of the metropolitan
zoological park and museum district;
(4) "Botanical garden subdistrict" shall consist of a
political subdistrict which shall provide for the collection
and exhibition of displays of things relating to plants or


botany, for the promotion of plant life and related
subjects, educational and research activities, for the
maintenance of a botanical library, and for the promotion by
all proper means of public interest in plant life and
botany; or which may contract with another person with the
capability of providing such services;
(5) "City", a constitutional charter city not located
within a county;
(6) "Commission", the governing body of each of the
respective subdistricts as may be authorized as provided in
section 184.350, 184.351, or 184.353;
(7) "County", a constitutional charter county
adjoining a constitutional charter city;
(8) "District", the metropolitan zoological park and
museum district;
(9) "Missouri history museum subdistrict" shall
consist of a political subdistrict which shall provide for
the collection, preservation, and exhibition of items
relating to the history of the entire state of Missouri and
of the Louisiana Purchase Territory, and more specifically
for the collection and display of photographs, paintings,
costumes, archaeological and anthropological material,
artifacts and memorabilia pertaining to the political,
commercial and cultural history of the region, including
extensive artifacts, memorabilia, historical documents
concerning the first solo transatlantic flight, for the
promotion of archaeological and historical studies, for the
maintenance of a history library and archives, including
manuscripts documenting the first United States-sponsored
exploratory expedition of the Louisiana Purchase Territory
as well as papers of the president who authorized the
Louisiana Purchase, and for the promotion by all proper
means of public interest in the history of Missouri and the


region in which it is located, and, as otherwise provided by
law and in cooperation with the department of natural
resources of the state of Missouri, to provide technical
assistance and advisory services for the collection,
preservation, and exhibition of recordings, instruments, and
memorabilia of ragtime, jazz and blues music including
ragtime pianos and ragtime piano sheet music to be housed
and maintained at the Scott Joplin house state historic
site; or which may contract with another person having all
of the historical materials listed herein as well as the
capability of providing all of the services listed herein;
(10) "Recreation and amateur sports subdistrict" shall
consist of a political subdistrict which shall provide for
and assist in the planning, development, financing,
maintenance, improvement and construction of facilities and
venues to be publicly owned and operated by political
subdivisions, public school districts, universities and
colleges, or not-for-profit corporations chartered to
attract, promote and manage major national and international
amateur sports events, competitions and programs for the use
of the general public. Such subdistrict shall structure its
procedures for procuring supplies, services and construction
to achieve the result that a minimum of twenty percent in
the aggregate of the total dollar value of annual
procurements is made directly or indirectly from certified
socially and economically disadvantaged small business
concerns;
(11) "St. Louis Science Center subdistrict" shall
consist of such institutions and places for the purpose of
collection and exhibition of displays of items of natural
historical, industrial, transport and scientific interest,
the instruction and recreation of the people, for the
promotion of the study of science, industrial, transport and


100 natural history and kindred subjects and for the promotion
101 by all proper means of public interest in natural history,
102 transport, industry and science;
103 (12) "Special election", an election held on the first
104 Tuesday of April or whenever propositions are submitted to
105 the voters of the whole district;
106 (13) "Symphony orchestra subdistrict" shall consist of
107 a political subdistrict which shall provide for regular
108 performances of a symphony orchestra with not less than
109 ninety full-time symphonic musicians, own its own concert
110 hall in which a substantial number of its concerts shall be
111 held, and provide for the promotion by all proper means of
112 public interest in music; or which may contract with another
113 person with the capability of providing such services and
114 which owns it own concert hall;
115 (14) "Transport museum subdistrict" shall consist of a
116 political subdistrict which shall provide for institutions
117 and places for the edification of the public in the history
118 and science of transportation, communications and powering,
119 and more specifically for the preservation and display of
120 artifacts related to man's efforts to transport materials,
121 people, and ideas and to create, transmit, and utilize
122 power, and for the provision of a library of publications
123 and other records containing history and technology related
124 to transportation, communications and powering, and
125 facilities for the study of such efforts; or which may
126 contract with another person with the capability of
127 providing such services;
128 (15) "Zoological subdistrict" shall consist of such
129 institutions and places for the collection and exhibition of
130 animals and animal life, for the instruction and recreation
131 of the people, for the promotion of zoology and kindred
132 subjects, for the encouragement of zoological study and


133 research and for the increase of public interest in wild
134 animals and in the protection of wild animal life.
184.353. 1. (1) The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
established according to the provisions of sections 184.350
to [184.384] 184.382, on behalf of the district may request
the election officials of any city and county containing all
or part of such district to submit the following described
proposition to the qualified voters of such district at any
general, primary or special election. Such election
officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior
to such general, primary or special election in at least two
newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any
general, primary or special election held for submission of
the proposition.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and
County of ______ be authorized to provide for
a Botanical Garden Subdistrict and be
authorized to provide the Botanical Garden
Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of
four cents on each $100 of assessed valuation
of taxable property within the district?
□ YES □ NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
votes on the proposition, then the botanical garden
subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the


second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any
election held prior to the next general or primary election
in such city or county in the following year. Any such
resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions
of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
(4) If the botanical garden subdistrict shall be
established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees
for admission to the premises of the botanical garden
subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of
the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of
which the botanical garden subdistrict is a member.
2. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
zoological park and museum district, as established
according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382, on behalf of the district may request the election
officials of any city and county containing all or part of
such district to submit the following described proposition
to the qualified voters of such district at any general,
primary or special election. Such election officials shall
give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general,


primary or special election in at least two newspapers that
such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary
or special election held for submission of the proposition.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
in substantially the following form at such election:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and
County of ______ be authorized to provide for
a Transport Museum Subdistrict and be
authorized to provide the Transport Museum
Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of
four cents on each $100 of assessed valuation
of taxable property within the district?
□ YES □ NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
votes on the proposition, then the transport museum
subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any
election held prior to the next general or primary election
in such city or county in the following year. Any such


resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions
of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
(4) If the transport museum subdistrict shall be
established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees
100 for admission to the premises of the transport museum
101 subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
102 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
103 and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
104 Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
105 implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of
106 the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of
107 which the transport museum subdistrict is a member.
108 3. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
109 zoological park and museum district, as established
110 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
111 184.382, on behalf of the district may request the election
112 officials of any city and county containing all or part of
113 such district to submit the following described proposition
114 to the qualified voters of such district at any general,
115 primary or special election. Such election officials shall
116 give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general,
117 primary or special election in at least two newspapers that
118 such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary
119 or special election held for submission of the proposition.
120 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
121 in substantially the following form at such election:
122 Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
123 Museum District of the City of ______ and the
124 County of ______ be authorized to provide for
125 a Missouri History Museum Subdistrict and be
126 authorized to provide the Missouri History
127 Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in
128 excess of four cents on each $100 of assessed


valuation of taxable property within the
district?
129 □ YES □ NO
130 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
131 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
132 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
133 votes on the proposition, then the Missouri history museum
134 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
135 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
136 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
137 second month following the election. The results of the
138 election shall be certified by the election officials of
139 such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
140 executive officers of such city and county not less than
141 thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the
142 election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
143 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive
144 a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the
145 county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any
146 election held prior to the next general or primary or
147 special election in such city or county in the following
148 year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with
149 the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
150 4. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
151 zoological park and museum district, as established
152 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.354,
153 on behalf of the district may request the election officials
154 of any city and county containing all or part of such
155 district to submit the following described proposition to
156 the qualified voters of such district at any general,
157 primary or special election. Such election officials shall
158 give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general,


159 primary or special election in at least two newspapers that
160 such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary
161 or special election held for submission of the proposition.
162 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
163 in substantially the following form at such election:
164 Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
165 Museum District of the City of ______ and
166 County of ______ be authorized to provide for
167 a Symphony Orchestra Subdistrict and be
168 authorized to provide the Symphony Orchestra
169 Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of
170 four cents on each $100 of assessed valuation
of taxable property within the district?
171 □ YES □ NO
172 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
173 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
174 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
175 votes on the proposition, then the symphony orchestra
176 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
177 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
178 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
179 second month following the election. The results of the
180 election shall be certified by the election officials of
181 such city and county not less than thirty days after the day
182 of election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
183 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
184 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
185 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
186 shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to the
187 next general or primary in such city or county in the
188 following year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently
189 comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
190 184.382.


191 (4) If the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be
192 established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom
193 its commissioners contract, may charge such prices from time
194 to time for tickets for performances conducted under the
195 auspices of the subdistrict or as they or such person deem
196 proper; provided, however, that no fewer than fifty tickets
197 for each such performance conducted at the principal concert
198 hall of such subdistrict or such person shall be made
199 available without charge for distribution to members of the
200 general public and no fewer than fifty tickets shall be made
201 available without charge for distribution to students in
202 public and private elementary, secondary schools and
203 colleges and universities in the metropolitan zoological
204 park and museum district and all performances of the
205 symphony orchestra conducted at the principal concert hall
206 of the symphony orchestra within the district shall be
207 offered for broadcast live on a public or commercial AM or
208 FM radio station located in and generally receivable in the
209 district or on a public or commercial broadcast television
210 station located in or generally receivable in the district.
211 The symphony orchestra subdistrict shall institute a fully
212 staffed educational music appreciation program to benefit
213 all of the citizens of the taxing district at a nominal
214 charge.
215 (5) Immediately following the effective date of the
216 symphony orchestra subdistrict tax rate any person receiving
217 funds from said tax rate shall become ineligible for program
218 assistance funding from the Missouri state council on the
219 arts.
220 5. The board of directors of any metropolitan
221 zoological park and museum district, as established
222 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
223 184.382, on behalf of the district may request the election


224 officials of any city and county containing all or part of
225 such district to submit the following described proposition
226 to the qualified voters of such district at any general,
227 primary or special election. Such election officials shall
228 give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general,
229 primary or special election in at least two newspapers that
230 such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary
231 or special election held for submission of the proposition.
232 Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in
233 substantially the following form at such election:
234 Shall a Recreational and Amateur Sports
235 Subdistrict be authorized and provided for by
236 the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum
237 District of the City of ______ and the County
238 of ______ and such subdistrict be authorized
239 to establish a tax rate not in excess of four
240 cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of
241 taxable property within the district for a
period not to exceed nine years?
242 □ YES □ NO
243 In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on
244 such proposition in such city and a majority of voters
245 voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes
246 on the proposition, then the recreation and amateur sports
247 subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate, as
248 established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
249 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the
250 second month following the election for a period not to
251 exceed nine years. The results of the election shall be
252 certified by the election officials of such city and county,
253 respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of
254 such city and county not less than thirty days after the day


255 of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
256 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
257 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
258 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
259 shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to the
260 next general or primary or special election in such city or
261 county in the following year. Any such resubmission shall
262 subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350
263 to [184.384] 184.382.
264 6. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan
265 zoological park and museum district, as established
266 according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
267 184.382, on behalf of the district may request the election
268 officials of any city and county containing all or part of
269 such district to submit the following described proposition
270 to the qualified voters of such district at any general,
271 primary or special election. Such election officials shall
272 give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general,
273 primary or special election in at least two newspapers that
274 such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary
275 or special election held for submission of the proposition.
276 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters
277 in substantially the following form at such election:
278 Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
279 Museum District of the City of ______ and County
280 of ______ be authorized to provide for an
281 African-American History Museum and Cultural
282 Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the
283 African-American history museum and cultural
284 subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of
four cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district?
285 □ YES □ NO


286 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters
287 voting on such proposition in such city and a majority of
288 voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES"
289 votes on the proposition, then the African-American history
290 museum and cultural subdistrict shall be deemed established
291 and the tax rate, as established by the board for such
292 subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect as of
293 the first day of the second month following the election.
294 The results of the election shall be certified by the
295 election officials of such city and county, respectively, to
296 the respective chief executive officers of such city and
297 county not less than thirty days after the day of the
298 election. The cost of the election shall be paid as
299 provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
300 proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES"
301 votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
302 shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to the
303 next general or primary election in such city or county in
304 the following year. Any such resubmission shall
305 subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350
306 to [184.384] 184.382.
307 (4) If the African-American history museum and
308 cultural subdistrict shall be established, then its
309 commissioners, or any person with whom its commissioners
310 contract, may establish and charge fees for admission to the
311 premises of the African-American history museum and cultural
312 subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
313 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults
314 and fifty cents for children under sixteen years of age.
315 Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
316 implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of
317 the metropolitan zoological park and museum district of


318 which the African-American history museum and cultural
319 subdistrict is a member.
184.355. 1. Any special purpose subdistrict formed
under the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382 after July 1, 1981, may be dissolved in the
following manner: Upon the filing with the governing body
of the subdistrict of a petition containing the signatures
of qualified voters representing eight percent of the votes
cast at the last preceding election for governor of any
constitutional charter city not located within a county and
qualified voters representing eight percent of the votes
cast at the last preceding election for governor of a
constitutional charter county adjoining such city, the
governing body shall submit the proposition to the voters in
the subdistrict using the same procedure and in the same
manner so far as practicable as is provided for the
submission of the question for forming the subdistrict.
Separate petitions shall be filed for each subdistrict
sought to be dissolved.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be submitted
to the voters in substantially the following form at such
election:
Shall the ______ Subdistrict of the Metropolitan
Zoological Park and Museum District comprising
the City of ______ and the County of ______ be
dissolved?
□ YES □ NO
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
on such proposition or propositions in such city and the
majority of voters voting on such proposition or
propositions in such county at such election cast "YES"
votes on any such proposition or propositions, then the


subdistrict shall be deemed dissolved. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election
officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county
not less than thirty days after the day on which such
election was held. The cost of such election shall be borne
by the city and county, respectively, as provided by law.
4. Dissolution of a subdistrict shall be carried out
in the manner prescribed by section 67.955.
184.357. 1. The board of directors of any
metropolitan zoological park and museum district as
established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350
to [184.384] 184.382, on behalf of the district, may request
the election officials of any city and county of such
district to submit a proposition or propositions to increase
the tax rate for the zoological park subdistrict and the art
museum subdistrict set in section 184.350 and to increase
the rate for the botanical garden subdistrict set in section
184.353 to the qualified voters of such district at any
general, primary or special election. Such election
officials, upon receipt of such request in the form of a
verified resolution or resolutions approved by the majority
of the members of such district board of directors, shall
set the date of such election and give notice of such
election as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be jointly
or severally submitted to the voters in substantially the
following form at such election:
(1) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County
of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate
for the zoological park subdistrict up to the
maximum tax rate of eight cents, or any percent


thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise
financially supporting the subdistrict? The tax
rate shall be set annually by the board based on
the budget submitted by the zoological park
subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax
rate shall replace the present tax rate of
______ cents for the zoological park
subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(2) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County
of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate
for the art museum subdistrict up to the maximum
tax rate of eight cents, or any percent thereof,
on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable
property within the district for the purpose of
operating, maintaining and otherwise financially
supporting the subdistrict and approved by the
board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the
board based on the budget submitted by the art
museum subdistrict and approved by the board.
This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate
of ______ cents for the art museum subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(3) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County
of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate
for the botanical garden subdistrict up to the
maximum tax rate of six cents, or any percent
thereof, on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district for the
purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise
financially supporting the subdistrict and
approved by the board? The tax rate shall be set
annually by the board based on the budget
submitted by the botanical garden subdistrict
and approved by the board. This tax rate shall


replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for
the botanical garden subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
(4) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and County
of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate
for the Missouri history museum subdistrict up
to the maximum tax rate of six cents, or any
percent thereof, on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property within the
district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining, and otherwise financially
supporting the subdistrict and approved by the
board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the
board based on the budget submitted by the
Missouri history museum subdistrict and approved
by the board. This tax rate shall replace the
present tax rate of ______ cents for the
Missouri history museum subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such
proposition or propositions in such city and the majority of
the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in
such county cast votes "YES" on the proposition or
propositions, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall
be deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of
the second month following the election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election
officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county
not less than thirty days after the day on which such
election was held. The cost of the election shall be paid
as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event
the proposition or propositions shall fail to receive a


majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the
county, then the proposition or propositions shall not be
resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date
of the election the proposition or propositions were
rejected.
184.359. 1. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of
chapter 137, the board of directors of any metropolitan
zoological park and museum district, as established
according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382, on behalf of such district, may request the
election officials of any city and county containing all or
part of such district to submit to the qualified voters of
such district at any municipal, special, primary or general
election or elections a referendum or referendums to permit
or restore, in part, or, in whole, the tax rate or rates
authorized for any subdistrict of such district from time to
time under the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382.
2. Such proposal or proposals shall be submitted to
the voters in substantially the following form at such
election or elections:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and
Museum District of the City of ______ and the
County of ______ be authorized to increase the
tax rate for the ______ Subdistrict to ______
cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of
taxable property within the District? This tax
rate shall replace the present tax rate of
______ for the ______ Subdistrict.
□ YES □ NO
3. The proposed tax rate shall not exceed the maximum
tax rate authorized by the voters from time to time pursuant
to sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, prior to reduction


or reductions in such rate following any reassessment
pursuant to chapter 137.
4. In the event that a majority of the voters voting
thereon in such city and a majority of the voters voting
thereon in such county cast votes in favor of the proposal
or proposals, then the tax rate or rates for such
subdistrict or subdistricts shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the second month following
the election. The results of the election shall be
certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to such district not less than thirty days
after the day of the election. The cost of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event any proposal shall fail to receive a majority
of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then
such proposal shall not be resubmitted at any election held
within one year of the date of the election on which such
proposal was rejected.
5. Such proposal or proposals to the qualified voters
of the district may be submitted by a verified resolution of
the district board of directors to the respective election
officials of the city and county wherein the district is
located.
184.362. The use and enjoyment of such institutions
and places, museums and parks of any and all of the
subdistricts established under sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382 shall be forever free and open to the public at such
times as may be provided by the reasonable rules and
regulations adopted by the respective commissions in order
to render the use of the said subdistrict's facilities of
the greatest benefit and efficiently to the greatest
number. The respective commissions may exclude from the use
of the said facilities any and all persons who willfully


violate such rules. In addition said commission shall make
and adopt such bylaws, rules and regulations for its own
guidance and for the election of its members and for the
administration of the subdistrict as it may deem expedient
and as may not be inconsistent with the provisions of the
law. The respective commissions may contract for, or exact,
a charge from any person in connection with the use,
enjoyment, purchase, license or lease of any property,
facility, activity, exhibit, function, or personnel of the
respective subdistricts. Said commission shall have
exclusive control of the expenditures of all moneys
collected by the district to the credit of the subdistrict's
fund. The commission of any subdistrict established by the
voters under the authority of section 184.350 shall have
exclusive control of the construction and maintenance of any
subdistrict buildings built or maintained in whole or in
part with moneys of said fund and of the supervision, care
and custody of the grounds, rooms or buildings constructed,
leased or set apart for the purposes of the subdistrict
under the authority conferred in this law. The commission
of any subdistrict established by the voters under the
authority of section 184.350 shall have the power to appoint
a director and necessary assistants, to fix their
compensation and shall also have power to remove such
appointees. All employees, appointees and officers of
publicly owned and operated museums and zoological parks
shall on the establishment of a subdistrict related thereto
become employees of the subdistrict and such appointees' and
employees' seniority, pension, salaries, wages and fringe
benefits shall be equal to or better than that existing at
the time of the establishment of the subdistrict insofar as
may be possible. The respective commissions shall whenever
the need arises transmit to the district a complete survey


and report of the subdistrict's need for construction,
reconstruction and repair of improvements, buildings and
other facilities and shall include all information and data
necessary for the purpose of ascertaining the cost of such
improvements and shall further certify to the district the
need for incurring additional indebtedness as provided in
sections 184.364 to 184.376 herein.
191.211. State expenditures for new programs and
initiatives enacted by sections [103.178,] 143.999, 188.230,
191.231, 191.825 to 191.839, 208.177, 208.178, 208.179 and
208.181, 211.490, 285.240, 337.093, 374.126, 376.891 to
376.894, 431.064, 660.016, 660.017 and 660.018, and the
state expenditures for the new initiatives and expansion of
programs enacted by revising sections 105.711 and 105.721,
191.520, 191.600, 198.090, 208.151, 208.152 and 208.215, as
provided by H.B. 564, 1993, shall be funded exclusively by
federal funds and the funding sources established in
sections 149.011, 149.015, 149.035, 149.061, 149.065,
149.160, 149.170, 149.180, 149.190 and 149.192, and no
future general revenue shall be appropriated to fund such
new programs or expansions.
191.828. 1. The following departments shall conduct
on-going evaluations of the effect of the initiatives
enacted by the following sections:
(1) The department of commerce and insurance shall
evaluate the effect of revising section 376.782 and sections
143.999, 208.178, 374.126, and 376.891 to 376.894;
(2) The department of health and senior services shall
evaluate the effect of revising sections 105.711 and 191.600
and enacting section 191.411, and sections 167.600 to
167.621, 191.231, 208.177, 431.064, and 660.016. In
collaboration with the state board of registration for the
healing arts, the state board of nursing, and the state


board of pharmacy, the department of health and senior
services shall also evaluate the effect of revising section
195.070, section 334.100, and section 335.016, and of
sections 334.104 and 334.112, and section 338.095 and
338.198;
(3) The department of social services shall evaluate
the effect of revising section 198.090, and sections
208.151, 208.152 and 208.215, and section 383.125, and of
sections 167.600 to 167.621, 208.177, 208.178, 208.179,
208.181, and 211.490;
(4) The office of administration shall evaluate the
effect of revising sections 105.711 and 105.721;
(5) [The Missouri consolidated health care plan shall
evaluate the effect of section 103.178; and
(6)] The department of mental health shall evaluate
the effect of section 191.831 as it relates to substance
abuse treatment and of section 191.835.
2. The department of revenue and office of
administration shall make biannual reports to the general
assembly and the governor concerning the income received
into the health initiatives fund and the level of funding
required to operate the programs and initiatives funded by
the health initiatives fund at an optimal level.
191.831. 1. There is hereby established in the state
treasury a "Health Initiatives Fund", to which shall be
deposited all revenues designated for the fund under
subsection 8 of section 149.015, and subsection 3 of section
149.160, and section 167.609, and all other funds donated to
the fund or otherwise deposited pursuant to law. The state
treasurer shall administer the fund. Money in the fund
shall be appropriated to provide funding for implementing
the new programs and initiatives established by sections
105.711 and 105.721. The moneys in the fund may further be


used to fund those programs established by sections 191.411
and 191.600, sections 208.151 and 208.152, and sections
[103.178,] 143.999, 167.600 to 167.621, 188.230, 191.211,
191.231, 191.825 to 191.839, 192.013, 208.177, 208.178,
208.179 and 208.181, 211.490, 285.240, 337.093, 374.126,
376.891 to 376.894, 431.064, 660.016, 660.017 and 660.018;
in addition, not less than fifteen percent of the proceeds
deposited to the health initiative fund pursuant to sections
149.015 and 149.160 shall be appropriated annually to
provide funding for the C-STAR substance abuse
rehabilitation program of the department of mental health,
or its successor program, and a C-STAR pilot project
developed by the director of the division of alcohol and
drug abuse and the director of the department of corrections
as an alternative to incarceration, as provided in
subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section. Such pilot project
shall be known as the "Alt-care" program. In addition, some
of the proceeds deposited to the health initiatives fund
pursuant to sections 149.015 and 149.160 shall be
appropriated annually to the division of alcohol and drug
abuse of the department of mental health to be used for the
administration and oversight of the substance abuse traffic
offender program defined in section 302.010. The provisions
of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in
the health initiatives fund shall not be transferred at the
close of the biennium to the general revenue fund.
2. The director of the division of alcohol and drug
abuse and the director of the department of corrections
shall develop and administer a pilot project to provide a
comprehensive substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation
program as an alternative to incarceration, hereinafter
referred to as "Alt-care". Alt-care shall be funded using
money provided under subsection 1 of this section through


the Missouri Medicaid program, the C-STAR program of the
department of mental health, and the division of alcohol and
drug abuse's purchase-of-service system. Alt-care shall
offer a flexible combination of clinical services and living
arrangements individually adapted to each client and her
children. Alt-care shall consist of the following
components:
(1) Assessment and treatment planning;
(2) Community support to provide continuity,
monitoring of progress and access to services and resources;
(3) Counseling from individual to family therapy;
(4) Day treatment services which include accessibility
seven days per week, transportation to and from the Alt-care
program, weekly drug testing, leisure activities, weekly
events for families and companions, job and education
preparedness training, peer support and self-help and daily
living skills; and
(5) Living arrangement options which are permanent,
substance-free and conducive to treatment and recovery.
3. Any female who is pregnant or is the custodial
parent of a child or children under the age of twelve years,
and who has pleaded guilty to or found guilty of violating
the provisions of chapter 195, and whose controlled
substance abuse was a precipitating or contributing factor
in the commission of the offense, and who is placed on
probation may be required, as a condition of probation, to
participate in Alt-care, if space is available in the pilot
project area. Determinations of eligibility for the
program, placement, and continued participation shall be
made by the division of alcohol and drug abuse, in
consultation with the department of corrections.
4. The availability of space in Alt-care shall be
determined by the director of the division of alcohol and


drug abuse in conjunction with the director of the
department of corrections. If the sentencing court is
advised that there is no space available, the court shall
consider other authorized dispositions.
208.244. 1. [Beginning January 1, 2016, the waiver of
the work requirement for the supplemental nutrition
assistance program under 7 U.S.C. Section 2015(o) shall no
longer apply to individuals seeking benefits in this state.
The provisions of this subsection shall terminate on January
1, 2019.
2.] Any ongoing savings resulting from a reduction in
state expenditures due to modification of the supplemental
nutrition assistance program under this section or the
temporary assistance for needy families program under
sections 208.026 and 208.040 effective on August 28, 2015,
subject to appropriations, shall be used to provide child
care assistance for single parent households, education
assistance, transportation assistance, and job training for
individuals receiving benefits under such programs as
allowable under applicable state and federal law.
[3. The department shall make an annual report to the
joint committee on government accountability on the progress
of implementation of sections 208.026 and 208.040, including
information on enrollment, demographics, work participation,
and changes to specific policies. The joint committee shall
meet at least once a year to review the department's report
and shall make recommendations to the president pro tempore
of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives.]
208.471. 1. The department of social services shall
make payments to those hospitals which have a Medicaid
provider agreement with the department.


2. In each state fiscal year, the amount of federal
reimbursement allowance levied under sections 208.450 to
[208.482] 208.480 shall not exceed forty-five percent of the
total payments to hospitals from the federal reimbursement
allowance fund and associated federal match, including
payments made to hospitals from state-contracted managed
care organizations that are attributed to the federal
reimbursement allowance fund and associated federal match.
By October first of each subsequent state fiscal year, the
department shall report this calculation and the underlying
data supporting the calculation to the budget committee of
the house of representatives and the appropriations
committee of the senate. The underlying data shall include
the amount of federal reimbursement allowance assessment
levied on the hospitals and the total amount of Medicaid
payments to hospitals funded by the federal reimbursement
allowance, including payments made to hospitals from all
state-contracted managed care organizations in aggregate.
Payments made by the department to hospitals and payments
made, in aggregate, by all state-contracted managed care
organizations to hospitals shall be reported separately.
Expenditures reported by the department and all state-
contracted managed care organizations in aggregate shall be
broken down by fund source, inpatient or outpatient category
of service, and individual hospital. In addition, the
department shall separately and concurrently disclose the
amount of hospital payments made by the department and the
amount of hospital payments made by each of the managed care
plans, with the payment data broken down by plan, fund
source, inpatient or outpatient category of service, and
individual hospital, to the hospitals receiving such
payments specific to that hospital or to an organization
designated by such hospitals to receive such data and as


otherwise authorized or required by law. Such payment data
shall otherwise be regarded as proprietary and confidential
under subdivision (15) of section 610.021.
217.151. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Extraordinary circumstance", a substantial flight
risk or some other extraordinary medical or security
circumstance that dictates restraints be used to ensure the
safety and security of a pregnant offender in her third
trimester, a postpartum offender forty-eight hours
postdelivery, the staff of the correctional center or
medical facility, other offenders, or the public;
(2) "Labor", the period of time before a birth during
which contractions are present;
(3) "Postpartum", the period of recovery immediately
following childbirth, which is six weeks for a vaginal birth
or eight weeks for a cesarean birth, or longer if so
determined by a physician or nurse;
(4) "Restraints", any physical restraint or other
device used to control the movement of a person's body or
limbs.
2. Unless extraordinary circumstances exist as
determined by a corrections officer, a correctional center
shall not use restraints on a pregnant offender in her third
trimester during transportation to and from visits to health
care providers or court proceedings, or during medical
appointments and examinations, labor, delivery, or forty-
eight hours postdelivery.
3. In the event a corrections officer determines that
extraordinary circumstances exist and restraints are
necessary, the corrections officer shall fully document in
writing within forty-eight hours of the incident the reasons
he or she determined such extraordinary circumstances


existed, the type of restraints used, and the reasons those
restraints were considered the least restrictive available
and the most reasonable under the circumstances. Such
documents shall be kept on file by the correctional center
for at least ten years from the date the restraints were
used.
4. Any time restraints are used on a pregnant offender
in her third trimester or on a postpartum offender forty-
eight hours postdelivery, the restraints shall be the least
restrictive available and the most reasonable under the
circumstances. In no case shall leg, ankle, or waist
restraints or any mechanical restraints be used on any such
offender, and if wrist restraints are used, such restraints
shall be placed in the front of such offender's body to
protect the offender and unborn child in the case of a
forward fall.
5. If a doctor, nurse, or other health care provider
treating the pregnant offender in her third trimester or the
postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery requests
that restraints not be used, the corrections officer
accompanying such offender shall immediately remove all
restraints.
6. Pregnant offenders shall be transported in vehicles
equipped with seatbelts.
7. The [sentencing and corrections oversight
commission established under section 217.147 and the]
advisory committee established under section 217.015 shall
conduct biannual reviews of every report written on the use
of restraints on a pregnant offender in her third trimester
or on a postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery
in accordance with subsection 3 of this section to determine
compliance with this section. The written reports shall be
kept on file by the department for ten years.


8. The chief administrative officer, or equivalent
position, of each correctional center shall:
(1) Ensure that employees of the correctional center
are provided with training, which may include online
training, on the provisions of this section and section
217.147; and
(2) Inform female offenders, in writing and orally, of
any policies and practices developed in accordance with this
section upon admission to the correctional center, including
policies and practices in any offender handbook, and post
the policies and practices in locations in the correctional
center where such notices are commonly posted and will be
seen by female offenders, including common housing areas and
health care facilities.
9. The provisions of this section shall apply only to
the department of corrections.
301.140. 1. Upon the transfer of ownership of any
motor vehicle or trailer, the certificate of registration
and the right to use the number plates shall expire and the
number plates shall be removed by the owner at the time of
the transfer of possession, and it shall be unlawful for any
person other than the person to whom such number plates were
originally issued to have the same in his or her possession
whether in use or not, unless such possession is solely for
charitable purposes; except that the buyer of a motor
vehicle or trailer who trades in a motor vehicle or trailer
may attach the license plates from the traded-in motor
vehicle or trailer to the newly purchased motor vehicle or
trailer. The operation of a motor vehicle with such
transferred plates shall be lawful for no more than thirty
days[, or no more than ninety days if the dealer is selling
the motor vehicle under the provisions of section 301.213,]
or no more than sixty days if the dealer is selling the


motor vehicle under the provisions of subsection 5 of
section 301.210. As used in this subsection, the term
"trade-in motor vehicle or trailer" shall include any single
motor vehicle or trailer sold by the buyer of the newly
purchased vehicle or trailer, as long as the license plates
for the trade-in motor vehicle or trailer are still valid.
2. In the case of a transfer of ownership the original
owner may register another motor vehicle under the same
number, upon the payment of a fee of two dollars, if the
motor vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight or (in the case
of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating
capacity, not in excess of that originally registered. When
such motor vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or
(in the case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor
vehicle) seating capacity, for which a greater fee is
prescribed, the applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two
dollars and a pro rata portion for the difference in fees.
When such vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in
case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle)
seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.
3. License plates may be transferred from a motor
vehicle which will no longer be operated to a newly
purchased motor vehicle by the owner of such vehicles. The
owner shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars if the newly
purchased vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight or (in the
case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle)
seating capacity, not in excess of that of the vehicle which
will no longer be operated. When the newly purchased motor
vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or (in the
case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle)
seating capacity, for which a greater fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars and a pro


rata portion of the difference in fees. When the newly
purchased vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in
the case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle)
seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.
4. (1) The director of the department of revenue
shall have authority to produce or allow others to produce a
weather resistant, nontearing temporary permit authorizing
the operation of a motor vehicle or trailer by a buyer for
not more than thirty days, or no more than sixty days if
issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle under the
provisions of subsection 5 of section 301.210, from the date
of purchase. The temporary permit authorized under this
section may be purchased by the purchaser of a motor vehicle
or trailer from the central office of the department of
revenue or from an authorized agent of the department of
revenue upon satisfaction of all applicable taxes under
chapter 144, upon proof of purchase of a motor vehicle or
trailer for which the buyer has no registration plate
available for transfer and upon proof of financial
responsibility, or from a motor vehicle dealer upon purchase
of a motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer has no
registration plate available for transfer, or from a motor
vehicle dealer upon purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer
for which the buyer has registered and is awaiting receipt
of registration plates. The director of the department of
revenue or a producer authorized by the director of the
department of revenue may make temporary permits available
to registered dealers in this state, authorized agents of
the department of revenue or the department of revenue. The
price paid by a motor vehicle dealer, an authorized agent of
the department of revenue or the department of revenue for a
temporary permit shall not exceed five dollars for each


permit. The director of the department of revenue shall
direct motor vehicle dealers and authorized agents to obtain
temporary permits from an authorized producer. Amounts
received by the director of the department of revenue for
temporary permits shall constitute state revenue; however,
amounts received by an authorized producer other than the
director of the department of revenue shall not constitute
state revenue and any amounts received by motor vehicle
dealers or authorized agents for temporary permits purchased
from a producer other than the director of the department of
revenue shall not constitute state revenue. In no event
shall revenues from the general revenue fund or any other
state fund be utilized to compensate motor vehicle dealers
or other producers for their role in producing temporary
permits as authorized under this section. Amounts that do
not constitute state revenue under this section shall also
100 not constitute fees for registration or certificates of
101 title to be collected by the director of the department of
102 revenue under section 301.190. No motor vehicle dealer,
103 authorized agent or the department of revenue shall charge
104 more than five dollars for each permit issued. The permit
105 shall be valid for a period of thirty days[, or no more than
106 ninety days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle
107 under the provisions of section 301.213,] or no more than
108 sixty days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle
109 under the provisions of subsection 5 of section 301.210,
110 from the date of purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer, or
111 from the date of sale of the motor vehicle or trailer by a
112 motor vehicle dealer for which the purchaser obtains a
113 permit as set out above. No permit shall be issued for a
114 vehicle under this section unless the buyer shows proof of
115 financial responsibility. Each temporary permit issued
116 shall be securely fastened to the back or rear of the motor


117 vehicle in a manner and place on the motor vehicle
118 consistent with registration plates so that all parts and
119 qualities of the temporary permit thereof shall be plainly
120 and clearly visible, reasonably clean and are not impaired
121 in any way.
122 (2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this
123 subsection requiring satisfaction of all applicable taxes
124 under chapter 144 shall become effective only upon
125 notification by the director of the department of revenue
126 that implementation of such requirements are technologically
127 feasible following the development and maintenance of a
128 modernized, integrated system for the titling of vehicles,
129 the issuance and renewal of vehicle registrations, the
130 issuance and renewal of drivers' licenses and identification
131 cards, and the perfection and release of liens and
132 encumbrances on vehicles.
133 5. The permit shall be issued on a form prescribed by
134 the director of the department of revenue and issued only
135 for the applicant's temporary operation of the motor vehicle
136 or trailer purchased to enable the applicant to temporarily
137 operate the motor vehicle while proper title and
138 registration plates are being obtained, or while awaiting
139 receipt of registration plates, and shall be displayed on no
140 other motor vehicle. Temporary permits issued pursuant to
141 this section shall not be transferable or renewable, shall
142 not be valid upon issuance of proper registration plates for
143 the motor vehicle or trailer, and shall be returned to the
144 department or to the department's agent upon the issuance of
145 such proper registration plates. Any temporary permit
146 returned to the department or to the department's agent
147 shall be immediately destroyed. The provisions of this
148 subsection shall not apply to temporary permits issued for
149 commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twenty-four


150 thousand pounds gross weight. The director of the
151 department of revenue shall determine the size, material,
152 design, numbering configuration, construction, and color of
153 the permit. The director of the department of revenue, at
154 his or her discretion, shall have the authority to reissue,
155 and thereby extend the use of, a temporary permit previously
156 and legally issued for a motor vehicle or trailer while
157 proper title and registration are being obtained.
158 6. Every motor vehicle dealer that issues temporary
159 permits shall keep, for inspection by proper officers, an
160 accurate record of each permit issued by recording the
161 permit number, the motor vehicle dealer's number, buyer's
162 name and address, the motor vehicle's year, make, and
163 manufacturer's vehicle identification number, and the
164 permit's date of issuance and expiration date. Upon the
165 issuance of a temporary permit by either the central office
166 of the department of revenue, a motor vehicle dealer or an
167 authorized agent of the department of revenue, the director
168 of the department of revenue shall make the information
169 associated with the issued temporary permit immediately
170 available to the law enforcement community of the state of
171 Missouri.
172 7. Upon the transfer of ownership of any currently
173 registered motor vehicle wherein the owner cannot transfer
174 the license plates due to a change of motor vehicle
175 category, the owner may surrender the license plates issued
176 to the motor vehicle and receive credit for any unused
177 portion of the original registration fee against the
178 registration fee of another motor vehicle. Such credit
179 shall be granted based upon the date the license plates are
180 surrendered. No refunds shall be made on the unused portion
181 of any license plates surrendered for such credit.
100

182 8. An additional temporary license plate produced in a
183 manner and of materials determined by the director to be the
184 most cost-effective means of production with a configuration
185 that matches an existing or newly issued plate may be
186 purchased by a motor vehicle owner to be placed in the
187 interior of the vehicle's rear window such that the driver's
188 view out of the rear window is not obstructed and the plate
189 configuration is clearly visible from the outside of the
190 vehicle to serve as the visible plate when a bicycle rack or
191 other item obstructs the view of the actual plate. Such
192 temporary plate is only authorized for use when the matching
193 actual plate is affixed to the vehicle in the manner
194 prescribed in subsection 5 of section 301.130. The fee
195 charged for the temporary plate shall be equal to the fee
196 charged for a temporary permit issued under subsection 4 of
197 this section. Replacement temporary plates authorized in
198 this subsection may be issued as needed upon the payment of
199 a fee equal to the fee charged for a temporary permit under
200 subsection 4 of this section. The newly produced third
201 plate may only be used on the vehicle with the matching
202 plate, and the additional plate shall be clearly
203 recognizable as a third plate and only used for the purpose
204 specified in this subsection.
205 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.217,
206 the director may issue a temporary permit to an individual
207 who possesses a salvage motor vehicle which requires an
208 inspection under subsection 9 of section 301.190. The
209 operation of a salvage motor vehicle for which the permit
210 has been issued shall be limited to the most direct route
211 from the residence, maintenance, or storage facility of the
212 individual in possession of such motor vehicle to the
213 nearest authorized inspection facility and return to the
214 originating location. Notwithstanding any other
101

215 requirements for the issuance of a temporary permit under
216 this section, an individual obtaining a temporary permit for
217 the purpose of operating a motor vehicle to and from an
218 examination facility as prescribed in this subsection shall
219 also purchase the required motor vehicle examination form
220 which is required to be completed for an examination under
221 subsection 9 of section 301.190 and provide satisfactory
222 evidence that such vehicle has passed a motor vehicle safety
223 inspection for such vehicle as required in section 307.350.
224 10. The director of the department of revenue may
225 promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
226 administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
227 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
228 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
229 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
230 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
231 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
232 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
233 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
234 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
235 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
236 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
237 August 28, 2012, shall be invalid and void.
238 11. The repeal and reenactment of this section shall
239 become effective on the date the department of revenue or a
240 producer authorized by the director of the department of
241 revenue begins producing temporary permits described in
242 subsection 4 of such section, or on July 1, 2013, whichever
243 occurs first. If the director of revenue or a producer
244 authorized by the director of the department of revenue
245 begins producing temporary permits prior to July 1, 2013,
246 the director of the department of revenue shall notify the
247 revisor of statutes of such fact.
102

301.190. 1. No certificate of registration of any
motor vehicle or trailer, or number plate therefor, shall be
issued by the director of revenue unless the applicant
therefor shall make application for and be granted a
certificate of ownership of such motor vehicle or trailer,
or shall present satisfactory evidence that such certificate
has been previously issued to the applicant for such motor
vehicle or trailer. Application shall be made within thirty
days after the applicant acquires the motor vehicle or
trailer, unless the motor vehicle was acquired under
[section 301.213 or] subsection 5 of section 301.210 in
which case the applicant shall make application within
thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, upon a
blank form furnished by the director of revenue and shall
contain the applicant's identification number, a full
description of the motor vehicle or trailer, the vehicle
identification number, and the mileage registered on the
odometer at the time of transfer of ownership, as required
by section 407.536, together with a statement of the
applicant's source of title and of any liens or encumbrances
on the motor vehicle or trailer, provided that for good
cause shown the director of revenue may extend the period of
time for making such application. When an owner wants to
add or delete a name or names on an application for
certificate of ownership of a motor vehicle or trailer that
would cause it to be inconsistent with the name or names
listed on the notice of lien, the owner shall provide the
director with documentation evidencing the lienholder's
authorization to add or delete a name or names on an
application for certificate of ownership.
2. The director of revenue shall use reasonable
diligence in ascertaining whether the facts stated in such
application are true and shall, to the extent possible
103

without substantially delaying processing of the
application, review any odometer information pertaining to
such motor vehicle that is accessible to the director of
revenue. If satisfied that the applicant is the lawful
owner of such motor vehicle or trailer, or otherwise
entitled to have the same registered in his name, the
director shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate
over his signature and sealed with the seal of his office,
procured and used for such purpose. The certificate shall
contain on its face a complete description, vehicle
identification number, and other evidence of identification
of the motor vehicle or trailer, as the director of revenue
may deem necessary, together with the odometer information
required to be put on the face of the certificate pursuant
to section 407.536, a statement of any liens or encumbrances
which the application may show to be thereon, and, if
ownership of the vehicle has been transferred, the name of
the state issuing the transferor's title and whether the
transferor's odometer mileage statement executed pursuant to
section 407.536 indicated that the true mileage is
materially different from the number of miles shown on the
odometer, or is unknown.
3. The director of revenue shall appropriately
designate on the current and all subsequent issues of the
certificate the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor
Change Vehicle", "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle", or
"Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", as defined in section 301.010.
Effective July 1, 1990, on all original and all subsequent
issues of the certificate for motor vehicles as referenced
in subsections 2 and 3 of section 301.020, the director
shall print on the face thereof the following designation:
"Annual odometer updates may be available from the
department of revenue.". On any duplicate certificate, the
104

director of revenue shall reprint on the face thereof the
most recent of either:
(1) The mileage information included on the face of
the immediately prior certificate and the date of purchase
or issuance of the immediately prior certificate; or
(2) Any other mileage information provided to the
director of revenue, and the date the director obtained or
recorded that information.
4. The certificate of ownership issued by the director
of revenue shall be manufactured in a manner to prohibit as
nearly as possible the ability to alter, counterfeit,
duplicate, or forge such certificate without ready
detection. In order to carry out the requirements of this
subsection, the director of revenue may contract with a
nonprofit scientific or educational institution specializing
in the analysis of secure documents to determine the most
effective methods of rendering Missouri certificates of
ownership nonalterable or noncounterfeitable.
5. The fee for each original certificate so issued
shall be eight dollars and fifty cents, in addition to the
fee for registration of such motor vehicle or trailer. If
application for the certificate is not made within thirty
days after the vehicle is acquired by the applicant, or
where the motor vehicle was acquired under [section 301.213
or] subsection 5 of section 301.210 and the applicant fails
to make application within thirty days after receiving title
from the dealer, a delinquency penalty fee of twenty-five
dollars for the first thirty days of delinquency and twenty-
five dollars for each thirty days of delinquency thereafter,
not to exceed a total of two hundred dollars, but such
penalty may be waived by the director for a good cause
shown. If the director of revenue learns that any person
has failed to obtain a certificate within thirty days after
105

100 acquiring a motor vehicle or trailer, or where the motor
101 vehicle was acquired under [section 301.213 or] subsection 5
102 of section 301.210 and the applicant fails to make
103 application within thirty days after receiving title from
104 the dealer, or has sold a vehicle without obtaining a
105 certificate, he shall cancel the registration of all
106 vehicles registered in the name of the person, either as
107 sole owner or as a co-owner, and shall notify the person
108 that the cancellation will remain in force until the person
109 pays the delinquency penalty fee provided in this section,
110 together with all fees, charges and payments which the
111 person should have paid in connection with the certificate
112 of ownership and registration of the vehicle. The
113 certificate shall be good for the life of the motor vehicle
114 or trailer so long as the same is owned or held by the
115 original holder of the certificate and shall not have to be
116 renewed annually.
117 6. Any applicant for a certificate of ownership
118 requesting the department of revenue to process an
119 application for a certificate of ownership in an expeditious
120 manner requiring special handling shall pay a fee of five
121 dollars in addition to the regular certificate of ownership
122 fee.
123 7. It is unlawful for any person to operate in this
124 state a motor vehicle or trailer required to be registered
125 under the provisions of the law unless a certificate of
126 ownership has been applied for as provided in this section.
127 8. Before an original Missouri certificate of
128 ownership is issued, an inspection of the vehicle and a
129 verification of vehicle identification numbers shall be made
130 by the Missouri state highway patrol on vehicles for which
131 there is a current title issued by another state if a
132 Missouri salvage certificate of title has been issued for
106

133 the same vehicle but no prior inspection and verification
134 has been made in this state, except that if such vehicle has
135 been inspected in another state by a law enforcement officer
136 in a manner comparable to the inspection process in this
137 state and the vehicle identification numbers have been so
138 verified, the applicant shall not be liable for the twenty-
139 five dollar inspection fee if such applicant submits proof
140 of inspection and vehicle identification number verification
141 to the director of revenue at the time of the application.
142 The applicant, who has such a title for a vehicle on which
143 no prior inspection and verification have been made, shall
144 pay a fee of twenty-five dollars for such verification and
145 inspection, payable to the director of revenue at the time
146 of the request for the application, which shall be deposited
147 in the state treasury to the credit of the state highways
148 and transportation department fund.
149 9. Each application for an original Missouri
150 certificate of ownership for a vehicle which is classified
151 as a reconstructed motor vehicle, specially constructed
152 motor vehicle, kit vehicle, motor change vehicle, non-USA-
153 std motor vehicle, or other vehicle as required by the
154 director of revenue shall be accompanied by a vehicle
155 examination certificate issued by the Missouri state highway
156 patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
157 director of revenue. The vehicle examination shall include
158 a verification of vehicle identification numbers and a
159 determination of the classification of the vehicle. The
160 owner of a vehicle which requires a vehicle examination
161 certificate shall present the vehicle for examination and
162 obtain a completed vehicle examination certificate prior to
163 submitting an application for a certificate of ownership to
164 the director of revenue. Notwithstanding any provision of
165 the law to the contrary, an owner presenting a motor vehicle
107

166 which has been issued a salvage title and which is ten years
167 of age or older to a vehicle examination described in this
168 subsection in order to obtain a certificate of ownership
169 with the designation prior salvage motor vehicle shall not
170 be required to repair or restore the vehicle to its original
171 appearance in order to pass or complete the vehicle
172 examination. The fee for the vehicle examination
173 application shall be twenty-five dollars and shall be
174 collected by the director of revenue at the time of the
175 request for the application and shall be deposited in the
176 state treasury to the credit of the state highways and
177 transportation department fund. If the vehicle is also to
178 be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection required in
179 chapter 307 and the emissions inspection required under
180 chapter 643 shall be completed and the fees required by
181 section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the
182 owner.
183 10. When an application is made for an original
184 Missouri certificate of ownership for a motor vehicle
185 previously registered or titled in a state other than
186 Missouri or as required by section 301.020, it shall be
187 accompanied by a current inspection form certified by a duly
188 authorized official inspection station as described in
189 chapter 307. The completed form shall certify that the
190 manufacturer's identification number for the vehicle has
191 been inspected, that it is correctly displayed on the
192 vehicle and shall certify the reading shown on the odometer
193 at the time of inspection. The inspection station shall
194 collect the same fee as authorized in section 307.365 for
195 making the inspection, and the fee shall be deposited in the
196 same manner as provided in section 307.365. If the vehicle
197 is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection
198 required in chapter 307 and the emissions inspection
108

199 required under chapter 643 shall be completed and only the
200 fees required by section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall
201 be charged to the owner. This section shall not apply to
202 vehicles being transferred on a manufacturer's statement of
203 origin.
204 11. Motor vehicles brought into this state in a
205 wrecked or damaged condition or after being towed as an
206 abandoned vehicle pursuant to another state's abandoned
207 motor vehicle procedures shall, in lieu of the inspection
208 required by subsection 10 of this section, be inspected by
209 the Missouri state highway patrol in accordance with
210 subsection 9 of this section. If the inspection reveals the
211 vehicle to be in a salvage or junk condition, the director
212 shall so indicate on any Missouri certificate of ownership
213 issued for such vehicle. Any salvage designation shall be
214 carried forward on all subsequently issued certificates of
215 title for the motor vehicle.
216 12. When an application is made for an original
217 Missouri certificate of ownership for a motor vehicle
218 previously registered or titled in a state other than
219 Missouri, and the certificate of ownership has been
220 appropriately designated by the issuing state as a
221 reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially
222 constructed motor vehicle, or prior salvage vehicle, the
223 director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the
224 current Missouri and all subsequent issues of the
225 certificate of ownership the name of the issuing state and
226 such prior designation. The absence of any prior
227 designation shall not relieve a transferor of the duty to
228 exercise due diligence with regard to such certificate of
229 ownership prior to the transfer of a certificate. If a
230 transferor exercises any due diligence with regard to a
231 certificate of ownership, the legal transfer of a
109

232 certificate of ownership without any designation that is
233 subsequently discovered to have or should have had a
234 designation shall be a transfer free and clear of any
235 liabilities of the transferor associated with the missing
236 designation.
237 13. When an application is made for an original
238 Missouri certificate of ownership for a motor vehicle
239 previously registered or titled in a state other than
240 Missouri, and the certificate of ownership has been
241 appropriately designated by the issuing state as non-USA-std
242 motor vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately
243 designate on the current Missouri and all subsequent issues
244 of the certificate of ownership the words "Non-USA-Std Motor
245 Vehicle".
246 14. The director of revenue and the superintendent of
247 the Missouri state highway patrol shall make and enforce
248 rules for the administration of the inspections required by
249 this section.
250 15. Each application for an original Missouri
251 certificate of ownership for a vehicle which is classified
252 as a reconstructed motor vehicle, manufactured forty or more
253 years prior to the current model year, and which has a value
254 of three thousand dollars or less shall be accompanied by:
255 (1) A proper affidavit submitted by the owner
256 explaining how the motor vehicle or trailer was acquired
257 and, if applicable, the reasons a valid certificate of
258 ownership cannot be furnished;
259 (2) Photocopies of receipts, bills of sale
260 establishing ownership, or titles, and the source of all
261 major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle;
262 (3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars in addition to
263 the fees described in subsection 5 of this section. Such
110

264 fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit
265 of the state highways and transportation department fund; and
266 (4) An inspection certificate, other than a motor
267 vehicle examination certificate required under subsection 9
268 of this section, completed and issued by the Missouri state
269 highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as
270 authorized by the director of revenue. The inspection
271 performed by the highway patrol or other authorized local
272 law enforcement agency shall include a check for stolen
273 vehicles.
274 The department of revenue shall issue the owner a
275 certificate of ownership designated with the words
276 "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle" and deliver such certificate
277 of ownership in accordance with the provisions of this
278 chapter. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of this section, no
279 owner of a reconstructed motor vehicle described in this
280 subsection shall be required to obtain a vehicle examination
281 certificate issued by the Missouri state highway patrol.
301.562. 1. The department may refuse to issue or
renew any license required pursuant to sections 301.550 to
301.580 for any one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The department shall notify
the applicant or licensee in writing at his or her last
known address of the reasons for the refusal to issue or
renew the license and shall advise the applicant or licensee
of his or her right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The department may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by
chapter 621 against any holder of any license issued under
sections 301.550 to 301.580 for any one or any combination
of the following causes:
111

(1) The applicant or license holder was previously the
holder of a license issued under sections 301.550 to
301.580, which license was revoked for cause and never
reissued by the department, or which license was suspended
for cause and the terms of suspension have not been
fulfilled;
(2) The applicant or license holder was previously a
partner, stockholder, director or officer controlling or
managing a partnership or corporation whose license issued
under sections 301.550 to 301.580 was revoked for cause and
never reissued or was suspended for cause and the terms of
suspension have not been fulfilled;
(3) The applicant or license holder has, within ten
years prior to the date of the application, been finally
adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere, in a prosecution under the laws of any
state or of the United States, for any offense reasonably
related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of any
business licensed under sections 301.550 to 301.580; for any
offense, an essential element of which is fraud, dishonesty,
or an act of violence; or for any offense involving moral
turpitude, whether or not sentence is imposed;
(4) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or
bribery in securing any license issued pursuant to sections
301.550 to 301.580;
(5) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any money,
commission, fee, barter, exchange, or other compensation by
fraud, deception, or misrepresentation;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate any provisions of this chapter and chapters 143,
144, 306, 307, 407, 578, and 643 or of any lawful rule or
regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter and chapters
143, 144, 306, 307, 407, 578, and 643;
112

(7) The applicant or license holder has filed an
application for a license which, as of its effective date,
was incomplete in any material respect or contained any
statement which was, in light of the circumstances under
which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any
material fact;
(8) The applicant or license holder has failed to pay
the proper application or license fee or other fees required
pursuant to this chapter or chapter 306 or fails to
establish or maintain a bona fide place of business;
(9) Uses or permits the use of any special license or
license plate assigned to the license holder for any purpose
other than those permitted by law;
(10) The applicant or license holder is finally
adjudged insane or incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(11) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is
false;
(12) Violations of sections 407.511 to 407.556,
section 578.120, which resulted in a conviction or finding
of guilt or violation of any federal motor vehicle laws
which result in a conviction or finding of guilt.
3. Any such complaint shall be filed within one year
of the date upon which the department receives notice of an
alleged violation of an applicable statute or regulation.
After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall,
except for the matters set forth in subsection 5 of this
section, be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds, provided in subsection 2 of
this section, for disciplinary action are met, the
department may, singly or in combination, refuse to issue
the person a license, issue a license for a period of less
113

than two years, issue a private reprimand, place the person
on probation on such terms and conditions as the department
deems appropriate for a period of one day to five years,
suspend the person's license from one day to six days, or
revoke the person's license for such period as the
department deems appropriate. The applicant or licensee
shall have the right to appeal the decision of the
administrative hearing commission and department in the
manner provided in chapter 536.
4. Upon the suspension or revocation of any person's
license issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580, the
department shall recall any distinctive number plates that
were issued to that licensee. If any licensee who has been
suspended or revoked shall neglect or refuse to surrender
his or her license or distinctive number license plates
issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580, the director shall
direct any agent or employee of the department or any law
enforcement officer, to secure possession thereof and return
such items to the director. For purposes of this
100 subsection, a "law enforcement officer" means any member of
101 the highway patrol, any sheriff or deputy sheriff, or any
102 peace officer certified under chapter 590 acting in his or
103 her official capacity. Failure of the licensee to surrender
104 his or her license or distinctive number license plates upon
105 demand by the director, any agent or employee of the
106 department, or any law enforcement officer shall be a class
107 A misdemeanor.
108 5. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this
109 section, the following events or acts by the holder of any
110 license issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580 are deemed
111 to present a clear and present danger to the public welfare
112 and shall be considered cause for suspension or revocation
114

113 of such license under the procedure set forth in subsection
114 6 of this section, at the discretion of the director:
115 (1) The expiration or revocation of any corporate
116 surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit, as required by
117 section 301.560, without submission of a replacement bond or
118 letter of credit which provides coverage for the entire
119 period of licensure;
120 (2) The failure to maintain a bona fide established
121 place of business as required by section 301.560;
122 (3) Criminal convictions as set forth in subdivision
123 (3) of subsection 2 of this section; or
124 (4) Three or more occurrences of violations which have
125 been established following proceedings before the
126 administrative hearing commission under subsection 3 of this
127 section, or which have been established following
128 proceedings before the director under subsection 6 of this
129 section, of this chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307,
130 578, and 643 or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted
131 under this chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307, 578, and
132 643, not previously set forth herein.
133 6. (1) Any license issued under sections 301.550 to
134 301.580 may be suspended or revoked, following an
135 evidentiary hearing before the director or his or her
136 designated hearing officer, if affidavits or sworn testimony
137 by an authorized agent of the department alleges the
138 occurrence of any of the events or acts described in
139 subsection 5 of this section.
140 (2) For any license which the department believes may
141 be subject to suspension or revocation under this
142 subsection, the director shall immediately issue a notice of
143 hearing to the licensee of record. The director's notice of
144 hearing:
115

145 (a) Shall be served upon the licensee personally or by
146 first class mail to the dealer's last known address, as
147 registered with the director;
148 (b) Shall be based on affidavits or sworn testimony
149 presented to the director, and shall notify the licensee
150 that such information presented therein constitutes cause to
151 suspend or revoke the licensee's license;
152 (c) Shall provide the licensee with a minimum of ten
153 days' notice prior to hearing;
154 (d) Shall specify the events or acts which may provide
155 cause for suspension or revocation of the license, and shall
156 include with the notice a copy of all affidavits, sworn
157 testimony or other information presented to the director
158 which support discipline of the license; and
159 (e) Shall inform the licensee that he or she has the
160 right to attend the hearing and present any evidence in his
161 or her defense, including evidence to show that the event or
162 act which may result in suspension or revocation has been
163 corrected to the director's satisfaction, and that he or she
164 may be represented by counsel at the hearing.
165 (3) At any hearing before the director conducted under
166 this subsection, the director or his or her designated
167 hearing officer shall consider all evidence relevant to the
168 issue of whether the license should be suspended or revoked
169 due to the occurrence of any of the acts set forth in
170 subsection 5 herein. Within twenty business days after such
171 hearing, the director or his or her designated hearing
172 officer shall issue a written order, with findings of fact
173 and conclusions of law, which either grants or denies the
174 issuance of an order of suspension or revocation. The
175 suspension or revocation shall be effective ten days after
176 the date of the order. The written order of the director or
177 his or her hearing officer shall be the final decision of
116

178 the director and shall be subject to judicial review under
179 the provisions of chapter 536.
180 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or
181 chapter 610 or 621 to the contrary, the proceedings under
182 this subsection shall be closed and no order shall be made
183 public until it is final, for purposes of appeal.
184 7. In lieu of acting under subsection 2 or 6 of this
185 section, the department of revenue may enter into an
186 agreement with the holder of the license to ensure future
187 compliance with sections 301.210, [301.213,] 307.380,
188 sections 301.217 to 301.229, and sections 301.550 to
189 301.580. Such agreement may include an assessment fee not
190 to exceed five hundred dollars per violation or five
191 thousand dollars in the aggregate unless otherwise permitted
192 by law, probation terms and conditions, and other
193 requirements as may be deemed appropriate by the department
194 of revenue and the holder of the license. Any fees
195 collected by the department of revenue under this subsection
196 shall be deposited into the motor vehicle commission fund
197 created in section 301.560.
313.270. 1. The director, pursuant to rules and
regulations issued by the commission, may directly purchase
or lease such goods or services as are necessary for
effectuating the purposes of sections 313.200 to 313.350,
including procurements which integrate functions such as
lottery game design, supply of goods and services, and
advertising. The lottery commission by approved rule may
purchase goods made in the United States and sold by a
Missouri business to be given away as prizes within the
provisions of section 313.321. Contracts shall be awarded
to lottery contractors or lottery vendors on the basis of
lowest and best bid on an evaluated basis in order to
maximize revenues to the lottery fund. The director may
117

also utilize state purchasing procedures. [The director
shall award at least ten percent of the aggregate dollar
amount of all contracts to provide goods and services to the
lottery to minority business enterprises as defined by the
office of administration and shall award at least five
percent of the aggregate dollar amount of all contracts to
provide goods and services to the lottery to women business
enterprises as defined by the office of administration.] No
contract awarded or entered into by the director may be
assigned by the holder thereof except by specific approval
of the commission.
2. [Any contract awarded to any lottery contractor or
vendor shall provide that such contractor or vendor shall
award a minimum of ten percent of his subcontracted business
to minority business enterprises as defined by the office of
administration and shall award a minimum of five percent of
his subcontracted business to women business enterprises as
defined by the office of administration. This section shall
not apply to multistate lottery.
3.] Any lottery vendor which enters into a contract to
supply lottery materials, services or equipment for use in
the operation of the state lottery shall first disclose such
information as the commission may require, by rule and
regulation, concerning the selection of lottery vendors.
[4.] 3. The costs of any investigation into the
background of the applicant seeking a contract shall be
assessed against the applicant and shall be paid by the
applicant at the time of billing by the state.
[5.] 4. Performance bonds shall be posted by each
contractor with the commission with a surety acceptable to
the commission in an amount as may be required by the
commission, but not to exceed the expected total value of
the contract. The contract of any lottery contractor who
118

does not comply with such requirements may be terminated by
the commission. The commission may terminate the contract
of any lottery vendor who:
(1) Is convicted of any felony;
(2) Is convicted of any gambling-related offense;
(3) Is convicted of any crime involving fraud or
misrepresentation;
(4) Fails to comply with the rules and regulations of
the commission existing at the time the contract was entered
into; or
(5) Fails to periodically update any disclosure
requirements.
[6. The provisions in this section requiring that
certain percentages of lottery contracts and subcontracts be
awarded to businesses owned and controlled by women or
ethnic and racial minorities shall expire on January 1,
2005.]
320.092. 1. Tax credits issued pursuant to sections
135.400[,] and 135.750 [and 320.093] shall be subject to
oversight provisions. Effective January 1, 2000,
notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057, the board,
department or authority issuing tax credits shall annually
report to the office of administration, president pro tem of
the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives
regarding the tax credits issued pursuant to sections
135.400[,] and 135.750 [and 320.093] which were issued in
the previous fiscal year. The report shall contain, but not
be limited to, the aggregate number and dollar amount of tax
credits issued by the board, department or authority, the
number and dollar amount of tax credits claimed by
taxpayers, and the number and dollar amount of tax credits
unclaimed by taxpayers as well as the number of years
119

allowed for claims to be made. This report shall be
delivered no later than November of each year.
2. The reporting requirements established pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section shall also apply to the
department of economic development and the Missouri
development finance board established pursuant to section
100.265. The department and the Missouri development
finance board shall report on the tax credit programs which
they respectively administer that are authorized under the
provisions of chapters 32, 100, 135, 178, 253, 348, 447 and
620.
375.330. 1. No insurance company formed under the
laws of this state shall be permitted to purchase, hold or
convey real estate, excepting for the purpose and in the
manner herein set forth, to wit:
(1) Such as shall be necessary for its accommodation
in the transaction of its business; provided that before the
purchase of real estate for any such purpose, the approval
of the director of the department of commerce and insurance
must be first had and obtained, and except with the approval
of the director, the value of such real estate, together
with all appurtenances thereto, purchased for such purpose
shall not exceed twenty percent of the insurance company's
capital and surplus as shown by its last annual statement; or
(2) Such as shall have been mortgaged in good faith by
way of security for loans previously contracted, or for
moneys due; or
(3) Such as shall have been conveyed to it in
satisfaction of debts contracted in the course of its
dealings; or
(4) Such as shall have been purchased at sales upon
the judgments, decrees or mortgages obtained or made for
such debts; or
120

(5) Such as shall be necessary and proper for carrying
on its legitimate business under the provisions of the Urban
Redevelopment Corporations Act; or
(6) Such as shall have been acquired under the
provisions of the Urban Redevelopment Corporations Act
permitting such company to purchase, own, hold or convey
real estate; or
(7) Such real estate, or any interest therein, as may
be acquired or held by it by purchase, lease or otherwise,
as an investment for the production of income, which real
estate or interest therein may thereafter be held, improved,
developed, maintained, managed, leased, sold or conveyed by
it as real estate necessary and proper for carrying on its
legitimate business; or
(8) A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange may, in
its own name, purchase, sell, mortgage, hold, encumber,
lease, convey, or otherwise affect the title to real
property for the purposes and objects of the reciprocal or
interinsurance exchange. Such deeds, notes, mortgages or
other documents relating to real property may be executed by
the attorney in fact of the reciprocal or interinsurance
exchange. This provision shall be retroactive and shall
apply to real estate owned or sold by a reciprocal insurer
prior to August 28, 1990.
2. The investments acquired under subdivision (7) of
subsection 1 of this section may be in either existing or
new business or industrial properties, or for new
residential properties or new housing purposes.
3. Provided, no such insurance company shall invest
more than ten percent of its admitted assets, as shown by
its last annual statement preceding the date of acquisition,
as filed with the director of the department of commerce and
insurance of the state of Missouri, in the total amount of
121

real estate acquired under subdivision (7) of subsection 1,
nor more under subdivision (7) of subsection 1 than one
percent of its admitted assets or ten percent of its capital
and surplus, whichever is greater, in any one property, nor
more under subdivision (7) of subsection 1 than one percent
of its admitted assets or ten percent of its capital and
surplus, whichever is greater, in total properties leased or
rented to any one individual, partnership or corporation.
4. It shall not be lawful for any company incorporated
as aforesaid to purchase, hold or convey real estate in any
other case or for any other purpose; and all such real
estate acquired in payment of a debt, by foreclosure or
otherwise, and real estate exchanged therefor, shall be sold
and disposed of within ten years after such company shall
have acquired absolute title to the same, unless the company
owning such real estate or interest therein shall elect to
hold it pursuant to subdivision (7) of subsection 1.
5. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance may, for good cause shown, extend the time for
holding such real estate acquired in paying of a debt, by
foreclosure or otherwise, and real estate exchanged
therefor, and not held by the company under subdivision (7)
of subsection 1, for such period as he may find to be to the
best interests of the policyholders of said company.
6. [If a life insurance company depositing under
section 376.170 becomes the owner of real estate pursuant to
this section, the company may execute its own deed for the
real estate to the director of the department of commerce
and insurance, as trustee. The deed may be deposited with
the director as proper security, under and according to the
provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670, the value to be
subject to the approval of the director.
122

7.] This section shall not apply to an insurer
organized under chapter 376 or licensed under chapter 354.
376.309. 1. As used in this section, "separate
account" means an account established by an insurance
company, into which any amounts paid to or held by such
company under applicable contracts are credited and the
assets of which, subject to the provisions of this section,
may be invested in such investments as shall be authorized
by a resolution adopted by such company's board of
directors. The income, if any, and gains and losses,
realized or unrealized, on such account shall be credited to
or charged against the amounts allocated to such account
without regard to other income, gains or losses of the
company. If and to the extent so provided under the
applicable contracts, that portion of the assets of any such
separate account equal to the reserves and other contract
liabilities with respect to such account shall not be
chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other
business the company may conduct.
2. Any domestic life insurance company may, after
adoption of a resolution by its board of directors,
establish one or more separate accounts, and may allocate to
such account or accounts any amounts paid to or held by it
which are to be applied under the terms of an individual or
group contract to provide benefits payable in fixed or in
variable dollar amounts or in both.
3. To the extent it deems necessary to comply with any
applicable federal or state act, the company may, with
respect to any separate account or any portion thereof,
provide for the benefit of persons having beneficial
interests therein special voting and other rights and
special procedures for the conduct of the business and
affairs of such separate account or portion thereof,
123

including, without limitation, special rights and procedures
relating to investment policy, investment advisory services,
selection of public accountants, and selection of a
committee, the members of which need not be otherwise
affiliated with the company, to manage the business and
affairs of such separate account or portion thereof; and the
corporate charter of such company shall be deemed amended to
authorize the company to do so. The provisions of this
section shall not affect existing laws pertaining to the
voting rights of such company's policyholders.
4. The amounts allocated to any separate account and
the accumulations thereon may be invested and reinvested
without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed
by the laws of this state governing the investments of life
insurance companies, and the investments in such separate
account or accounts shall not be taken into account in
applying the investment limitations, including but not
limited to quantitative restrictions, otherwise applicable
to the investments of the company, except that to the extent
that the company's reserve liability with regard to benefits
guaranteed as to principal amount and duration, and funds
guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of
interest, is maintained in any separate account, a portion
of the assets of such separate account at least equal to
such reserve liability shall be, except as the director
might otherwise approve, invested in accordance with the
laws of this state governing the general investment account
of any company. As used herein, the expression "general
investment account" shall mean all of the funds, assets and
investments of the company which are not allocated in a
separate account. [The provisions of section 376.170
relating to deposits for registered policies shall not be
applicable to funds and investments allocated to separate
124

accounts.] No investment in the separate account or in the
general investment account of a life insurance company shall
be transferred by sale, exchange, substitution or otherwise
from one account to another unless, in case of a transfer
into a separate account, the transfer is made solely to
establish the account or to support the operation of the
contracts with respect to the separate account to which the
transfer is made or unless the transfer, whether into or
from a separate account, is made by a transfer of cash, or
by a transfer of other assets having a readily determinable
market value, provided that such transfer of other assets is
approved by the director and is for assets of equivalent
value. Such transfer shall be deemed approved to the extent
the assets of a separate account so transferred have been
paid to or are being held by the company in connection with
a pension, retirement or profit-sharing plan subject to the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
amended. The director may withdraw such deemed approval by
providing written notice to the company that its financial
condition or past practices require such withdrawal. The
director may approve other transfers among such accounts if
the director concludes that such transfers would be
equitable.
5. Unless otherwise approved by the director, assets
allocated to a separate account shall be valued at their
market value on the date of valuation, or if there is no
readily available market, then as provided under the terms
of the contract or the rules or other written agreement
applicable to such separate account; provided, that the
portion of the assets of such separate account at least
equal to the company's reserve liability with regard to the
guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in subsection 4 of
125

this section, if any, shall be valued in accordance with the
rules otherwise applicable to the company's assets.
100 6. The director shall have the sole and exclusive
101 authority to regulate the issuance and authority to regulate
102 the sale of contracts under which amounts are to be
103 allocated to one or more separate accounts as provided
104 herein, and to issue such reasonable rules, regulations and
105 licensing requirements as the director shall deem necessary
106 to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section;
107 and the companies that issue such contracts shall not be
108 subject to registration with the commissioner of
109 securities. The director may, subject to the provisions of
110 section 374.185, consult and cooperate with the commissioner
111 of securities in investigations arising from the offer and
112 sale of contracts regulated under this section and may
113 request assistance from the commissioner of securities in
114 any proceeding arising from the offer and sale of any such
115 contracts.
116 7. No domestic life insurance company, and no other
117 life insurance company admitted to transact business in this
118 state, shall be authorized to deliver within this state any
119 contract under which amounts are to be allocated to one or
120 more separate accounts as provided herein until said company
121 has satisfied the director that its condition or methods of
122 operation in connection with the issuance of such contracts
123 will not render its operation hazardous to the public or its
124 policyholders in this state. In determining the
125 qualifications of a company requesting authority to deliver
126 such contracts within this state, the director shall
127 consider, among other things:
128 (1) The history and financial condition of the company;
129 (2) The character, responsibility and general fitness
130 of the officers and directors of the company; and
126

131 (3) In the case of a company other than a domestic
132 company, whether the statutes and regulations of the
133 jurisdiction of its incorporation provide a degree of
134 protection to policyholders and the public which is
135 substantially equal to that provided by this section and the
136 rules and regulations issued thereunder.
137 8. An authorized life insurance company, whether
138 domestic, foreign or alien, which issues contracts under
139 which amounts are to be allocated to one or more separate
140 accounts as provided herein, and which is a subsidiary of or
141 affiliated through common management or ownership with
142 another life insurance company authorized to do business in
143 this state, may be deemed to have met the provisions of
144 subsection 7 of this section if either it or the parent or
145 affiliated company meets the requirements thereof.
146 9. If the contract provides for payment of benefits in
147 variable amounts, it shall contain a statement of the
148 essential features of the procedure to be followed by the
149 company in determining the dollar amount of such variable
150 benefits. Any such contract, including a group contract,
151 and any certificate issued thereunder, shall state that such
152 dollar amount may decrease or increase and shall contain on
153 its first page a statement that the benefits thereunder are
154 on a variable basis.
155 10. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all
156 pertinent provisions of the insurance laws of this state
157 shall apply to separate accounts and contracts relating
158 thereto.
379.316. 1. Section 379.017 and sections 379.316 to
379.361 apply to insurance companies incorporated pursuant
to sections 379.035 to [379.355] 379.055, section 379.080,
sections 379.060 to 379.075, sections 379.085 to 379.095,
[sections 379.205 to 379.310,] and to insurance companies of
127

a similar type incorporated pursuant to the laws of any
other state of the United States, and alien insurers
licensed to do business in this state, which transact fire
and allied lines, marine and inland marine insurance, to any
and all combinations of the foregoing or parts thereof, and
to the combination of fire insurance with other types of
insurance within one policy form at a single premium, on
risks or operations in this state, except:
(1) Reinsurance, other than joint reinsurance to the
extent stated in section 379.331;
(2) Insurance of vessels or craft, their cargoes,
marine builders' risks, marine protection and indemnity, or
other risks commonly insured pursuant to marine, as
distinguished from inland marine, insurance policies;
(3) Insurance against loss of or damage to aircraft,
or against liability, other than employers' liability,
arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of
aircraft;
(4) All forms of motor vehicle insurance; and
(5) All forms of life, accident and health, and
workers' compensation insurance.
2. Inland marine insurance shall be deemed to include
insurance now or hereafter defined by statute, or by
interpretation thereof, or if not so defined or interpreted,
by ruling of the director, or as established by general
custom of the business, as inland marine insurance.
3. Commercial property and commercial casualty
insurance policies are subject to rate and form filing
requirements as provided in section 379.321.
379.670. The subscribers so contracting among
themselves shall, through their attorney, file with the
director of the department of commerce and insurance of this
128

state a declaration verified by the oath of the attorney
setting forth:
(1) The name or title of the office at which the
subscribers propose to exchange indemnity contracts. The
name or title shall not be so similar to any other name or
title previously adopted by a similar organization or by any
insurance corporation or association as in the opinion of
the director of the department of commerce and insurance is
calculated to result in confusion or deception;
(2) The kind or kinds of insurance to be effected or
exchanged;
(3) A copy of the form of policy contract or agreement
under or by which the insurance is to be effected or
exchanged;
(4) A copy of the form of power of attorney or other
authority of the attorney under which the insurance is to be
effected or exchanged;
(5) The location of the offices from which the
contracts or agreements are to be issued;
(6) That, except as to the kinds of insurance herein
specifically mentioned in this subdivision, applications
have been made for indemnity upon at least one hundred
separate risks aggregating not less than one and one-half
million dollars represented by executed contracts or bona
fide applications to become concurrently effective. In the
case of employer's liability or workers' compensation
insurance, applications shall have been made for indemnity
upon at least one hundred separate risks covering a total
payroll of not less than two and one-half million dollars as
represented by executed contracts or bona fide applications
to become concurrently effective. In the case of automobile
insurance, applications shall have been made for indemnity
upon at least one thousand motor vehicles or for insurance
129

aggregating not less than one and one-half million dollars
represented by executed contracts or bona fide applications
to become concurrently effective on any or all classes of
automobile insurance effected by the subscribers through the
attorney;
(7) That there is in the possession of the attorney
and available for the payment of losses, assets conforming
to the requirements of [sections 379.700 and] section
379.710.
379.720. 1. If at any time the amounts on hand are
less than the requirements of [sections 379.700 and] section
379.710, the subscribers or their attorney for them shall
make up the deficiency.
2. Where funds other than those which have accrued
from premiums or deposits of subscribers are supplied to
make up a deficiency as herein provided for they shall be
deposited and held for the benefit of subscribers under such
terms and conditions as the director of the department of
commerce and insurance may require so long as the deficiency
exists, thereafter to be returned to the depositors.
3. "Net premiums" or "deposits" as used in this law
shall be construed to mean the advance premiums or deposits
made by subscribers after deducting therefrom the amount for
expenses specifically provided in the subscriber's agreement.
379.1310. 1. A pure captive insurance company may be
incorporated as a stock insurer with its capital divided
into shares and held by the stockholders as a nonprofit
corporation with one or more members, or as a manager-
managed limited liability company.
2. An association captive insurance company or an
industrial insured captive insurance company may be:
(1) Incorporated as a stock insurer with its capital
divided into shares and held by the stockholders;
130

(2) Incorporated as a mutual insurer without capital
stock, the governing body of which is elected by its
insureds;
(3) Organized as a manager-managed limited liability
company; or
(4) Organized as a reciprocal insurer in accordance
with sections 379.650 to 379.790.
3. A captive insurance company incorporated or
organized in this state shall have not less than three
incorporators or three organizers of whom not less than one
shall be a resident of this state.
4. In the case of a captive insurance company:
(1) Formed as a corporation, before the articles of
incorporation are transmitted to the secretary of state, the
incorporators shall petition the director to issue a
certificate setting forth the director's finding that the
establishment and maintenance of the proposed corporation
will promote the general good of the state. In arriving at
such a finding the director shall consider:
(a) The character, reputation, financial standing and
purposes of the incorporators;
(b) The character, reputation, financial
responsibility, insurance experience, and business
qualifications of the officers and directors; and
(c) Such other aspects as the director shall deem
advisable.
The articles of incorporation, such certificate, and the
organization fee shall be transmitted to the secretary of
state, who shall thereupon record both the articles of
incorporation and the certificate;
(2) Formed as a limited liability company, before the
articles of organization are transmitted to the secretary of
131

state, the organizers shall petition the director to issue a
certificate setting forth the director's finding that the
establishment and maintenance of the proposed company will
promote the general good of the state. In arriving at such
a finding, the director shall consider the items set forth
in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection;
(3) Formed as a reciprocal insurer, the organizers
shall petition the director to issue a certificate setting
the director's finding that the establishment and
maintenance of the proposed association will promote the
general good of the state. In arriving at such a finding
the director shall consider the items set forth in
paragraphs (a) to (c) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
5. The capital stock of a captive insurance company
incorporated as a stock insurer may be authorized with no
par value.
6. In the case of a captive insurance company:
(1) Formed as a corporation, at least one of the
members of the board of directors shall be a resident of
this state;
(2) Formed as a limited liability company, at least
one of the managers shall be a resident of this state;
(3) Formed as a reciprocal insurer, at least one of
the members of the subscribers' advisory committee shall be
a resident of this state.
7. Other than captive insurance companies formed as
limited liability companies under chapter 347, or as
nonprofit corporations under chapter 355, captive insurance
companies formed as corporations under sections 379.1300 to
379.1351 shall have the privileges and be subject to chapter
351 as well as the applicable provisions contained in
sections 379.1300 to 379.1308. In the event of conflict
132

between the provisions of such general corporation law and
sections 379.1300 to 379.1351, sections 379.1300 to 379.1351
shall control.
8. Captive insurance companies formed under sections
379.1300 to 379.1351:
(1) As limited liability companies shall have the
privileges and be subject to the provisions of chapter 347
as well as the applicable provisions contained in sections
379.1300 to 379.1351. In the event of a conflict between
chapter 347 and sections 379.1300 to 379.1351, sections
379.1300 to 379.1351 shall control; or
(2) As nonprofit corporations shall have the
privileges and be subject to the provisions of chapter 355
as well as the applicable provisions contained in sections
379.1300 to 379.1351. In the event of conflict between
chapter 355 and sections 379.1300 to 379.1351, sections
379.1300 to 379.1351 shall control.
9. The provisions of [section 375.355,] section
375.908, sections 379.980 to 379.988, and chapter 382,
pertaining to mergers, consolidations, conversions,
mutualizations, redomestications, and mutual holding
companies shall apply in determining the procedures to be
followed by captive insurance companies in carrying out any
of the transactions described therein; except that:
(1) The director may waive or modify the requirements
100 for public notice and hearing, or in accordance with rules
101 which the director may adopt addressing categories of
102 transactions, modify the requirements for public notice and
103 hearing. If a notice of public hearing is required, but no
104 one requests a hearing ten days before the day set for the
105 hearing, then the director may cancel the hearing;
133

106 (2) An alien insurer may be a party to a merger or a
107 redomestication authorized under this subsection, if
108 approved by the director; and
109 (3) The director may issue a certificate of general
110 good to permit the formation of a captive insurance company
111 that is established for the sole purpose of consolidating or
112 merging with or assuming existing insurance or reinsurance
113 business from an existing Missouri licensed captive
114 insurance company. The director may, upon a request of such
115 newly formed captive insurance company, waive or modify the
116 requirements of paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) and
117 subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 379.1302.
118 10. The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a
119 captive insurance company formed as a corporation may
120 authorize a quorum of its board of directors to consist of
121 no fewer than one-third of the full board of directors,
122 provided that a quorum shall not consist of fewer than two
123 directors.
124 11. Captive insurance companies formed as reciprocal
125 insurers under the provisions of sections 379.1300 to
126 379.1351 shall have the privileges and be subject to the
127 provisions of sections 379.650 to 379.790 in addition to the
128 applicable provisions of sections 379.1300 to 379.1351. In
129 the event of a conflict between the provisions of sections
130 379.650 to 379.790 and the provisions of sections 379.1300
131 to 379.1351, the latter shall control, to the extent a
132 reciprocal insurer is made subject to other provisions of
133 chapters 374, 375, and 379 under sections 379.650 to
134 379.790, such provisions shall not be applicable to a
135 reciprocal insurer formed under sections 379.1300 to
136 379.1351 unless such provisions are expressly made
137 applicable to captive insurance companies under sections
138 379.1300 to 379.1351.
134

139 12. The subscribers' agreement or other organizing
140 document of a captive insurance company formed as a
141 reciprocal insurer may authorize a quorum of its
142 subscribers' advisory committee to consist of no fewer than
143 one-third of the number of its members.
382.070. The provisions of sections 382.040, 382.050
and 382.060 shall not apply to:
(1) Any transaction which is subject to the provisions
of section [375.355 or] 375.861; or
(2) Any offer, request, invitation, agreement or
acquisition which the director by order shall exempt
therefrom as not having been made or entered into for the
purpose and not having the effect of changing or influencing
the control of a domestic insurer, or as otherwise not
comprehended within the purposes of sections 382.010 to
382.300.
394.120. 1. No person shall become a member of a
cooperative unless such person shall agree to use electric
energy furnished by the cooperative when such electric
energy shall be available through its facilities. The
bylaws of a cooperative may provide that any person,
including an incorporator, shall cease to be a member
thereof if he or she shall fail or refuse to use electric
energy made available by the cooperative or if electric
energy shall not be made available to such person by the
cooperative within a specified time after such person shall
have become a member thereof. Membership in the cooperative
shall not be transferable, except as provided in the
bylaws. The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications
and limitations in respect of membership.
2. An annual meeting of the members shall be held at
such time as shall be provided in the bylaws.
135

3. Special meetings of the members may be called by
the board of directors, by any three directors, by not less
than ten percent of the members, or by the president.
4. Meetings of members shall be held at such place as
may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such
provisions, all meetings shall be held in the city or town
in which the principal office of the cooperative is located.
5. Except as herein otherwise provided, written or
printed notice stating the time and place of each meeting of
members and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose
or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given
to each member, either personally or by mail, not less than
ten nor more than twenty-five days before the date of the
meeting.
6. Two percent of the first two thousand members and
one percent of the remaining members, present in person, or
if the bylaws so provide, participating electronically or by
mail, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business at all meetings of the members, unless the bylaws
prescribe the presence of a greater percentage of the
members for a quorum. If less than a quorum is present at
any meeting, a majority of those present in person may
adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.
7. Each member shall be entitled to one vote on each
matter submitted to a vote at a meeting. Voting shall be in
person, but, if the bylaws so provide, may also be by proxy,
by electronic means, by mail, or any combination thereof.
If the bylaws provide for voting by proxy, by electronic
means, or by mail, they shall also prescribe the conditions
under which proxy, electronic, or mail voting shall be
exercised. In any event, no person shall vote as proxy for
more than two members at any meeting of the members.
136

[8. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 2
and 7 of this section, the board of directors shall have the
power to set the time and place of the annual meeting and
also to provide for voting by proxy, electronic means, by
mail, or any combination thereof, and to prescribe the
conditions under which such voting shall be exercised. The
meeting requirement provided in this section may be
satisfied through virtual means. The provisions of this
subsection shall expire on August 28, 2022.]
414.407. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "B-20", a blend of twenty percent by volume
biodiesel fuel and eighty percent by volume petroleum-based
diesel fuel;
(2) "Biodiesel", fuel as defined in ASTM Standard
PS121;
(3) "EPAct", the federal Energy Policy Act, 42 U.S.C.
13201, et seq.;
(4) "EPAct credit", a credit issued pursuant to EPAct;
(5) "Fund", the biodiesel fuel revolving fund;
(6) "Incremental cost", the difference in cost between
biodiesel fuel and conventional petroleum-based diesel fuel
at the time the biodiesel fuel is purchased.
2. The department, in cooperation with the department
of agriculture, shall establish and administer an EPAct
credit banking and selling program to allow state agencies
to use moneys generated by the sale of EPAct credits to
purchase biodiesel fuel for use in state vehicles. Each
state agency shall provide the department with all vehicle
fleet information necessary to determine the number of EPAct
credits generated by the agency. The department may sell
credits in any manner pursuant to the provisions of EPAct.
137

3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"Biodiesel Fuel Revolving Fund", into which shall be
deposited moneys received from the sale of EPAct credits
banked by state agencies on August 28, 2001, and in future
reporting years, any moneys appropriated to the fund by the
general assembly, and any other moneys obtained or accepted
by the department for deposit into the fund. The fund shall
be managed to maximize benefits to the state in the purchase
of biodiesel fuel and, when possible, to accrue those
benefits to state agencies in proportion to the number of
EPAct credits generated by each respective agency.
4. Moneys deposited into the fund shall be used to pay
for the incremental cost of biodiesel fuel with a minimum
biodiesel concentration of B-20 for use in state vehicles
and for administration of the fund. Not later than January
thirty-first of each year, the department shall submit an
annual report to the general assembly on the expenditures
from the fund during the preceding fiscal year.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080,
no portion of the fund shall be transferred to the general
revenue fund, and any appropriation made to the fund shall
not lapse. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
6. The department shall promulgate such rules as are
necessary to implement this section. No rule or portion of
a rule promulgated pursuant to this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter
536.
[7. The department shall conduct a study of the use of
alternative fuels in motor vehicles in the state and shall
report its findings and recommendations to the general
138

assembly no later than January 1, 2002. Such study shall
include:
(1) An analysis of the current use of alternative
fuels in public and private vehicle fleets in the state;
(2) An assessment of methods that the state may use to
increase use of alternative fuels in vehicle fleets,
including the sale of credits generated pursuant to the
federal Energy Policy Act, 42 U.S.C. 13201, et seq., to pay
for the difference in cost between alternative fuels and
conventional fuels;
(3) An assessment of the benefits or harm that
increased use of alternative fuels may make to the state's
economy and environment;
(4) Any other information that the department deems
relevant.]
454.433. 1. When a tribunal of another state as
defined in section [454.850] 454.1503 has ordered support
payments to a person who has made an assignment of child
support rights to the family support division or who is
receiving child support services pursuant to section
454.425, the family support division may notify the court of
this state in the county in which the obligor, obligee or
the child resides or works. Until October 1, 1999, upon
such notice the circuit clerk shall accept all support
payments and remit such payments to the person or entity
entitled to receive the payments. Effective October 1,
1999, the division shall order the payment center to accept
all support payments and remit such payments to the person
or entity entitled to receive the payments.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the notification to the court by the division
shall authorize the court to make the clerk trustee. The
clerk shall keep an accurate record of such payments and
139

shall report all collections to the division in the manner
specified by the division. Effective October 1, 1999, the
duties of the clerk as trustee pursuant to this section
shall terminate and all payments shall be made to the
payment center pursuant to section 454.530.
454.470. 1. The director may issue a notice and
finding of financial responsibility to a parent who owes a
state debt or who is responsible for the support of a child
on whose behalf the custodian of that child is receiving
support enforcement services from the division pursuant to
section 454.425 if a court order has not been previously
entered against that parent, a court order has been
previously entered but has been terminated by operation of
law or if a support order from another state has been
entered but is not entitled to recognition under sections
[454.850 to 454.997] 454.1500 to 454.1728. Service of the
notice and finding shall be made on the parent or other
party in the manner prescribed for service of process in a
civil action by an authorized process server appointed by
the director, or by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The director may appoint any uninterested party,
including but not limited to employees of the division, to
serve such process. For purposes of this subsection, a
parent who refuses receipt of service by certified mail is
deemed to have been served. Service upon an obligee who is
receiving support enforcement services under section 454.425
may be made by regular mail. When appropriate to the
circumstances of the individual action, the notice shall
state:
(1) The name of the person or agency with custody of
the dependent child and the name of the dependent child for
whom support is to be paid;
140

(2) The monthly future support for which the parent
shall be responsible;
(3) The state debt, if any, accrued and accruing, and
the monthly payment to be made on the state debt which has
accrued;
(4) A statement of the costs of collection, including
attorney's fees, which may be assessed against the parent;
(5) That the parent shall be responsible for providing
medical insurance for the dependent child;
(6) That if a parent desires to discuss the amount of
support that should be paid, the parent or person having
custody of the child may, within twenty days after being
served, contact the division office which sent the notice
and request a negotiation conference. The other parent or
person having custody of the child shall be notified of the
negotiated conference and may participate in the
conference. If no agreement is reached on the monthly
amount to be paid, the director may issue a new notice and
finding of financial responsibility, which may be sent to
the parent required to pay support by regular mail addressed
to the parent's last known address or, if applicable, the
parent's attorney's last known address. A copy of the new
notice and finding shall be sent by regular mail to the
other parent or person having custody of the child;
(7) That if a parent or person having custody of the
child objects to all or any part of the notice and finding
of financial responsibility and no negotiation conference is
requested, within twenty days of the date of service the
parent or person having custody of the child shall send to
the division office which issued the notice a written
response which sets forth any objections and requests a
hearing; and, that if the director issues a new notice and
finding of financial responsibility, the parent or person
141

having custody of the child shall have twenty days from the
date of issuance of the new notice to send a hearing request;
(8) That if such a timely response is received by the
appropriate division office, and if such response raises
factual questions requiring the submission of evidence, the
parent or person having custody of the child shall have the
right to a hearing before an impartial hearing officer who
is an attorney licensed to practice law in Missouri and,
that if no timely written response is received, the director
may enter an order in accordance with the notice and finding
of financial responsibility;
(9) That the parent has the right to be represented at
the hearing by an attorney of the parent's own choosing;
(10) That the parent or person having custody of the
child has the right to obtain evidence and examine witnesses
as provided for in chapter 536, together with an explanation
of the procedure the parent or person having custody of the
child shall follow in order to exercise such rights;
(11) That as soon as the order is entered, the
property of the parent required to pay support shall be
subject to collection actions, including, but not limited
to, wage withholding, garnishment, liens, and execution
thereon;
(12) A reference to sections 454.460 to 454.510;
(13) That the parent is responsible for notifying the
division of any change of address or employment;
(14) That if the parent has any questions, the parent
should telephone or visit the appropriate division office or
consult an attorney; and
(15) Such other information as the director finds
appropriate.
2. The statement of periodic future support required
by subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section is to be
142

computed under the guidelines established in subsection 8 of
section 452.340.
3. Any time limits for notices or requests may be
extended by the director, and such extension shall have no
effect on the jurisdiction of the court, administrative
body, or other entity having jurisdiction over the
100 proceedings.
101 4. If a timely written response setting forth
102 objections and requesting a hearing is received by the
103 appropriate division office, and if such response raises a
104 factual question requiring the submission of evidence, a
105 hearing shall be held in the manner provided by section
106 454.475. If no timely written response and request for
107 hearing is received by the appropriate division office, the
108 director may enter an order in accordance with the notice,
109 and shall specify:
110 (1) The amount of periodic support to be paid, with
111 directions on the manner of payment;
112 (2) The amount of state debt, if any, accrued in favor
113 of the department;
114 (3) The monthly payment to be made on state debt, if
115 any;
116 (4) The amount of costs of collection, including
117 attorney's fees, assessed against the parent;
118 (5) The name of the person or agency with custody of
119 the dependent child and the name and birth date of the
120 dependent child for whom support is to be paid;
121 (6) That the property of the parent is subject to
122 collection actions, including, but not limited to, wage
123 withholding, garnishment, liens, and execution thereon; and
124 (7) If appropriate, that the parent shall provide
125 medical insurance for the dependent child, or shall pay the
143

126 reasonable and necessary medical expenses of the dependent
127 child.
128 5. The parent or person having custody of the child
129 shall be sent a copy of the order by regular mail addressed
130 to the parent's last known address or, if applicable, the
131 parent's attorney's last known address. The order is final,
132 and action by the director to enforce and collect upon the
133 order, including arrearages, may be taken from the date of
134 issuance of the order.
135 6. Copies of the orders issued pursuant to this
136 section shall be mailed within fourteen days of the issuance
137 of the order.
138 7. Any parent or person having custody of the child
139 who is aggrieved as a result of any allegation or issue of
140 fact contained in the notice and finding of financial
141 responsibility shall be afforded an opportunity for a
142 hearing, upon the request in writing filed with the director
143 not more than twenty days after service of the notice and
144 finding is made upon such parent or person having custody of
145 the child, and if in requesting such hearing, the aggrieved
146 parent or person having custody of the child raises a
147 factual issue requiring the submission of evidence.
148 8. At any time after the issuance of an order under
149 this section, the director may issue an order vacating that
150 order if it is found that the order was issued without
151 subject matter or personal jurisdiction or if the order was
152 issued without affording the obligor due process of law.
454.490. 1. A true copy of any order entered by the
director pursuant to sections 454.460 to [454.997] 454.1728,
along with a true copy of the return of service, may be
filed with the clerk of the circuit court in the county in
which the judgment of dissolution or paternity has been
entered, or if no such judgment was entered, in the county
144

where either the parent or the dependent child resides or
where the support order was filed. Upon filing, the clerk
shall enter the order in the judgment docket. Upon
docketing, the order shall have all the force, effect, and
attributes of a docketed order or decree of the circuit
court, including, but not limited to, lien effect and
enforceability by supplementary proceedings, contempt of
court, execution and garnishment. Any administrative order
or decision of the family support division filed in the
office of the circuit clerk of the court shall not be
required to be signed by an attorney, as provided by supreme
court rule of civil procedures 55.03(a), or required to have
any further pleading other than the director's order.
2. In addition to any other provision to enforce an
order docketed pursuant to this section or any other support
order of the court, the court may, upon petition by the
division, require that an obligor who owes past due support
to pay support in accordance with a plan approved by the
court, or if the obligor is subject to such plan and is not
incapacitated, the court may require the obligor to
participate in work activities.
3. In addition to any other provision to enforce an
order docketed pursuant to this section or any other support
order of the court, division or other IV-D agency, the
director may order that an obligor who owes past due support
to pay support in accordance with a plan approved by the
director, or if the obligor is subject to such plan and is
not incapacitated, the director may order the obligor to
participate in work activities. The order of the director
shall be filed with a court pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section and shall be enforceable as an order of the court.
4. As used in this section, "work activities" include:
(1) Unsubsidized employment;
145

(2) Subsidized private sector employment;
(3) Subsidized public sector employment;
(4) Work experience (including work associated with
the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing) if sufficient
private sector employment is not available;
(5) On-the-job training;
(6) Job search and readiness assistance;
(7) Community services programs;
(8) Vocational educational training, not to exceed
twelve months for any individual;
(9) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(10) Education directly related to employment for an
individual who has not received a high school diploma or its
equivalent;
(11) Satisfactory attendance at a secondary school or
course of study leading to a certificate of general
equivalence for an individual who has not completed
secondary school or received such a certificate; or
(12) The provision of child care services to an
individual who is participating in a community service
program.
488.426. 1. The judges of the circuit court, en banc,
in any circuit in this state may require any party filing a
civil case in the circuit court, at the time of filing the
suit, to deposit with the clerk of the court a surcharge in
addition to all other deposits required by law or court
rule. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
proceedings when costs are waived or are to be paid by the
county or state or any city.
2. The surcharge in effect on August 28, 2001, shall
remain in effect until changed by the circuit court. The
circuit court in any circuit, except the circuit court in
Jackson County or the circuit court in any circuit that
146

reimburses the state for the salaries of family court
commissioners under and pursuant to section 487.020, may
change the fee to any amount not to exceed fifteen dollars.
The circuit court in Jackson County or the circuit court in
any circuit that reimburses the state for the salaries of
family court commissioners under and pursuant to section
487.020 may change the fee to any amount not to exceed
twenty dollars. A change in the fee shall become effective
and remain in effect until further changed.
3. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to
proceedings when costs are waived or are paid by the county
or state or any city.
[4. In addition to any fee authorized by subsection 1
of this section, any county of the first classification with
more than one hundred one thousand but fewer than one
hundred fifteen thousand inhabitants may impose an
additional fee of ten dollars excluding cases concerning
adoption and those in small claims court. The provisions of
this subsection shall expire on December 31, 2019.]
620.570. 1. [The Missouri training and employment
council, as established in section 620.523, shall review and
recommend criteria for evaluating project funding
assistance, program criteria, and other requirements and
priorities to be used by the division in the evaluation and
monitoring of Missouri youth service and conservation corps
projects.
2.] The division shall work with the department of
higher education and workforce development, the department
of elementary and secondary education, all colleges,
universities and lending institutions throughout the state
to develop a system of academic credit, tuition grants and
deferred loan repayment incentives for young adults who
enroll and complete participation in corps programs. The
147

division shall adopt rules under chapter 536 designed to
implement any such incentive programs.
[3.] 2. The division of workforce development of the
department of economic development shall establish and
promote the recruitment of "Show-Me Employers" which shall
consist of Missouri-based corporations and businesses
agreeing to interview, for entry-level jobs, participants
successfully completing a youth corps program.
[4.] 3. The division of workforce development of the
department of economic development shall recognize and
promote within the labor exchange system the youth service
corps and the potential benefits of hiring participants who
have successfully completed any of the corps' programs.
620.1020. There is hereby created within the
department of economic development a "Business Extension
Service Team" program. The purpose of the teams shall be to
provide technical and management assistance to Missouri
businesses, to improve their competitiveness and increase
their market share of the economy, to assist businesses with
the introduction of improved production processes, and to
assist the businesses with their job training needs. [Each
team shall inform the Missouri training and employment
council of specific job training needs which it identifies
for an individual business or general job training needs
which it recommends for the state. A team may recommend
that, by means of contract, feasibility studies or
productivity assessments be performed for businesses.]
Businesses to be assisted may include those faced with
employee layoffs, plant closings or financial instability.
The expenses of a team shall be financed by state and
federal appropriations, local governments, economic
development organizations, private contributions and fees
paid by assisted businesses.
148

620.2020. 1. The department shall respond to a
written request, by or on behalf of a qualified company or
qualified military project, for a proposed benefit award
under the provisions of this program within five business
days of receipt of such request. The department shall
respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a qualified
manufacturing company, for a proposed benefit award under
the provisions of this program within fifteen business days
of receipt of such request. Such response shall contain
either a proposal of benefits for the qualified company or
qualified military project, or a written response refusing
to provide such a proposal and stating the reasons for such
refusal. A qualified company or qualified military project
that intends to seek benefits under the program shall submit
to the department a notice of intent. The department shall
respond within thirty days to a notice of intent with an
approval or a rejection, provided that the department may
withhold approval or provide a contingent approval until it
is satisfied that proper documentation of eligibility has
been provided. The department shall certify or reject the
qualifying company's plan outlined in their notice of intent
as satisfying good faith efforts made to employ, at a
minimum, commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
previous decennial census, the following: racial
minorities, contractors who are racial minorities, and
contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial
minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
previous decennial census. Failure to respond on behalf of
the department shall result in the notice of intent being
deemed approved. A qualified company receiving approval for
program benefits may receive additional benefits for
149

subsequent new jobs at the same facility after the full
initial project period if the applicable minimum job
requirements are met. There shall be no limit on the number
of project periods a qualified company may participate in
the program, and a qualified company may elect to file a
notice of intent to begin a new project period concurrent
with an existing project period if the applicable minimum
job requirements are achieved, the qualified company
provides the department with the required annual reporting,
and the qualified company is in compliance with this program
and any other state programs in which the qualified company
is currently or has previously participated. However, the
qualified company shall not receive any further program
benefits under the original approval for any new jobs
created after the date of the new notice of intent, and any
jobs created before the new notice of intent shall not be
included as new jobs for purposes of the benefit calculation
for the new approval. When a qualified company has filed
and received approval of a notice of intent and subsequently
files another notice of intent, the department shall apply
the definition of project facility under subdivision (24) of
section 620.2005 to the new notice of intent as well as all
previously approved notices of intent and shall determine
the application of the definitions of new job, new payroll,
project facility base employment, and project facility base
payroll accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the benefits available to the qualified company
under any other state programs for which the company is
eligible and which utilize withholding tax from the new or
retained jobs of the company shall first be credited to the
other state program before the withholding retention level
applicable under this program will begin to accrue. If any
150

qualified company also participates in a job training
program utilizing withholding tax, the company shall retain
no withholding tax under this program, but the department
shall issue a refundable tax credit for the full amount of
benefit allowed under this program. The calendar year
annual maximum amount of tax credits which may be issued to
a qualifying company that also participates in a job
training program shall be increased by an amount equivalent
to the withholding tax retained by that company under a jobs
training program.
3. A qualified company or qualified military project
receiving benefits under this program shall provide an
annual report of the number of jobs, along with minority
jobs created or retained, and such other information as may
be required by the department to document the basis for
program benefits available no later than ninety days prior
to the end of the qualified company's or industrial
development authority's tax year immediately following the
tax year for which the benefits provided under the program
are attributed. In such annual report, if the average wage
is below the applicable percentage of the county average
wage, the qualified company or qualified military project
has not maintained the employee insurance as required, if
the department after a review determines the qualifying
company fails to satisfy other aspects of their notice of
intent, including failure to make good faith efforts to
employ, at a minimum, commensurate with the percentage of
minority populations in the state of Missouri, as reported
in the previous decennial census, the following: racial
minorities, contractors who are racial minorities, and
contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial
minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority
populations in the state of Missouri, as reported in the
151

100 previous decennial census, or if the number of jobs is below
101 the number required, the qualified company or qualified
102 military project shall not receive tax credits or retain the
103 withholding tax for the balance of the project period. If a
104 statewide state of emergency exists for more than sixteen
105 months, a qualified company or industrial development
106 authority shall be entitled to a one-time suspension of
107 program deadlines equal to the number of months such
108 statewide state of emergency existed with any partial month
109 rounded to the next whole. During such suspension, the
110 qualified company or industrial development authority shall
111 not be entitled to retain any withholding tax as calculated
112 under subdivision (38) of section 620.2005 nor shall it earn
113 any awarded tax credit or receive any tax credit under the
114 program for the suspension period. The suspension period
115 shall run consecutively and be available to a qualified
116 company or industrial development authority that, during the
117 statewide state of emergency, submitted notice of intent
118 that was approved or that was in year one or a subsequent
119 year of benefits under a program agreement with the
120 department. The suspension period that runs consecutively
121 and may be available to a qualified company or industrial
122 development authority as provided in this subsection may
123 apply retroactively. Any qualified company or industrial
124 development authority requesting a suspension pursuant to
125 this subsection shall submit notice to the department on its
126 provided form identifying the requested start and end dates
127 of the suspension, not to exceed the maximum number of
128 months available under this subsection. Such notice shall
129 be submitted to the department not later than the end of the
130 twelfth month following the termination of the state of
131 emergency. No suspension period shall start later than the
132 date on which the state of emergency was terminated. The
152

133 department and the qualified company or the industrial
134 development authority shall enter into a program agreement
135 or shall amend an existing program agreement, as applicable,
136 stating the deadlines following the suspension period and
137 updating the applicable wage requirements. Failure to
138 timely file the annual report required under this section
139 may result in the forfeiture of tax credits attributable to
140 the year for which the reporting was required and a
141 recapture of withholding taxes retained by the qualified
142 company or qualified military project during such year.
143 4. The department may withhold the approval of any
144 benefits under this program until it is satisfied that
145 proper documentation has been provided, and shall reduce the
146 benefits to reflect any reduction in full-time employees or
147 payroll. Upon approval by the department, the qualified
148 company may begin the retention of the withholding taxes
149 when it reaches the required number of jobs and the average
150 wage meets or exceeds the applicable percentage of county
151 average wage. Tax credits, if any, may be issued upon
152 satisfaction by the department that the qualified company
153 has exceeded the applicable percentage of county average
154 wage and the required number of jobs; provided that, tax
155 credits awarded under subsection 7 of section 620.2010 may
156 be issued following the qualified company's acceptance of
157 the department's proposal and pursuant to the requirements
158 set forth in the written agreement between the department
159 and the qualified company under subsection 4 of section
160 620.2010.
161 5. Any qualified company or qualified military project
162 approved for benefits under this program shall provide to
163 the department, upon request, any and all information and
164 records reasonably required to monitor compliance with
165 program requirements. This program shall be considered a
153

166 business recruitment tax credit under subdivision (3) of
167 subsection 2 of section 135.800, and any qualified company
168 or qualified military project approved for benefits under
169 this program shall be subject to the provisions of sections
170 135.800 to 135.830.
171 6. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this
172 program who knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed
173 to work legally in the United States shall immediately
174 forfeit such benefits and shall repay the state an amount
175 equal to any state tax credits already redeemed and any
176 withholding taxes already retained.
177 7. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that may be
178 authorized under this program for any fiscal year shall be
179 limited as follows, less the amount of any tax credits
180 previously obligated for that fiscal year under any of the
181 tax credit programs referenced in subsection 14 of this
182 section:
183 (a) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2013, but
184 ending on or before June 30, 2014, no more than one hundred
185 six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
186 (b) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2014, but
187 ending on or before June 30, 2015, no more than one hundred
188 eleven million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
189 (c) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
190 2015, but ending on or before June 30, 2020, no more than
191 one hundred sixteen million dollars in tax credits may be
192 authorized for each fiscal year; and
193 (d) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
194 2020, no more than one hundred six million dollars in tax
195 credits may be authorized for each fiscal year. The
196 provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to tax credits
197 issued to qualified companies under a notice of intent filed
198 prior to July 1, 2020.
154

199 (2) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
200 2020, in addition to the amount of tax credits that may be
201 authorized under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this
202 subsection, an additional ten million dollars in tax credits
203 may be authorized for each fiscal year for the purpose of
204 the completion of infrastructure projects directly connected
205 with the creation or retention of jobs under the provisions
206 of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 and an additional ten
207 million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each
208 fiscal year for a qualified manufacturing company based on a
209 manufacturing capital investment as set forth in section
210 620.2010.
211 8. For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
212 2020, the maximum total amount of withholding tax that may
213 be authorized for retention for the creation of new jobs
214 under the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 by
215 qualified companies with a project facility base employment
216 of at least fifty shall not exceed seventy-five million
217 dollars for each fiscal year. The provisions of this
218 subsection shall not apply to withholding tax authorized for
219 retention for the creation of new jobs by qualified
220 companies with a project facility base employment of less
221 than fifty.
222 9. For tax credits for the creation of new jobs under
223 section 620.2010, the department shall allocate the annual
224 tax credits based on the date of the approval, reserving
225 such tax credits based on the department's best estimate of
226 new jobs and new payroll of the project, and any other
227 applicable factors in determining the amount of benefits
228 available to the qualified company or qualified military
229 project under this program; provided that, the department
230 may reserve up to twenty-one and one-half percent of the
231 maximum annual amount of tax credits that may be authorized
155

232 under subsection 7 of this section for award under
233 subsection 7 of section 620.2010. However, the annual
234 issuance of tax credits shall be subject to annual
235 verification of actual payroll by the department or, for
236 qualified military projects, annual verification of average
237 salary for the jobs directly created by the qualified
238 military project. Any authorization of tax credits shall
239 expire if, within two years from the date of commencement of
240 operations, or approval if applicable, the qualified company
241 has failed to meet the applicable minimum job requirements.
242 The qualified company may retain authorized amounts from the
243 withholding tax under the project once the applicable
244 minimum job requirements have been met for the duration of
245 the project period. No benefits shall be provided under
246 this program until the qualified company or qualified
247 military project meets the applicable minimum new job
248 requirements or, for benefits awarded under subsection 7 of
249 section 620.2010, until the qualified company has satisfied
250 the requirements set forth in the written agreement between
251 the department and the qualified company under subsection 4
252 of section 620.2010. In the event the qualified company or
253 qualified military project does not meet the applicable
254 minimum new job requirements, the qualified company or
255 qualified military project may submit a new notice of intent
256 or the department may provide a new approval for a new
257 project of the qualified company or qualified military
258 project at the project facility or other facilities.
259 10. Tax credits provided under this program may be
260 claimed against taxes otherwise imposed by chapters 143 and
261 148, and may not be carried forward, but shall be claimed
262 within one year of the close of the taxable year for which
263 they were issued. Tax credits provided under this program
264 may be transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a notarized
156

265 endorsement thereof with the department that names the
266 transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred, and the
267 value received for the credit, as well as any other
268 information reasonably requested by the department. For a
269 qualified company with flow-through tax treatment to its
270 members, partners, or shareholders, the tax credit shall be
271 allowed to members, partners, or shareholders in proportion
272 to their share of ownership on the last day of the qualified
273 company's tax period.
274 11. Prior to the issuance of tax credits or the
275 qualified company beginning to retain withholding taxes, the
276 department shall verify through the department of revenue
277 and any other applicable state department that the tax
278 credit applicant does not owe any delinquent income, sales,
279 or use tax or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any
280 delinquent fees or assessments levied by any state
281 department and through the department of commerce and
282 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent
283 insurance taxes or other fees. Such delinquency shall not
284 affect the approval, except that any tax credits issued
285 shall be first applied to the delinquency and any amount
286 issued shall be reduced by the applicant's tax delinquency.
287 If the department of revenue, the department of commerce and
288 insurance, or any other state department concludes that a
289 taxpayer is delinquent after June fifteenth but before July
290 first of any year and the application of tax credits to such
291 delinquency causes a tax deficiency on behalf of the
292 taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty
293 days to satisfy the deficiency in which interest, penalties,
294 and additions to tax shall be tolled. After applying all
295 available credits toward a tax delinquency, the
296 administering agency shall notify the appropriate department
297 and that department shall update the amount of outstanding
157

298 delinquent tax owed by the applicant. If any credits remain
299 after satisfying all insurance, income, sales, and use tax
300 delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the
301 applicant, subject to the restrictions of other provisions
302 of law.
303 12. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to
304 the qualified company to the extent that the amount of tax
305 credits allowed under this program exceeds the amount of the
306 qualified company's tax liability under chapter 143 or 148.
307 13. An employee of a qualified company shall receive
308 full credit for the amount of tax withheld as provided in
309 section 143.211.
310 14. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
311 contrary, beginning August 28, 2013, no new benefits shall
312 be authorized for any project that had not received from the
313 department a proposal or approval for such benefits prior to
314 August 28, 2013, under the development tax credit program
315 created under sections 32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding
316 communities tax credit program created under section
317 135.535, the enhanced enterprise zone tax credit program
318 created under sections 135.950 to 135.973, and the Missouri
319 quality jobs program created under sections 620.1875 to
320 620.1890. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
321 construed to limit or impair the ability of any
322 administering agency to authorize or issue benefits for any
323 project that had received an approval or a proposal from the
324 department under any of the programs referenced in this
325 subsection prior to August 28, 2013, or the ability of any
326 taxpayer to redeem any such tax credits or to retain any
327 withholding tax under an approval issued prior to that
328 date. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
329 construed to limit or in any way impair the ability of any
330 governing authority to provide any local abatement or
158

331 designate a new zone under the enhanced enterprise zone
332 program created by sections 135.950 to 135.963.
333 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no
334 qualified company that is awarded benefits under this
335 program shall[:
336 (1)] simultaneously receive benefits under the
337 programs referenced in this subsection at the same capital
338 investment[; or
339 (2) Receive benefits under the provisions of section
340 620.1910 for the same jobs].
341 15. If any provision of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020
342 or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
343 invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
344 application of these sections which can be given effect
345 without the invalid provisions or application, and to this
346 end, the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 are
347 hereby declared severable.
348 16. By no later than January 1, 2014, and the first
349 day of each calendar quarter thereafter, the department
350 shall present a quarterly report to the general assembly
351 detailing the benefits authorized under this program during
352 the immediately preceding calendar quarter to the extent
353 such information may be disclosed under state and federal
354 law. The report shall include, at a minimum:
355 (1) A list of all approved and disapproved applicants
356 for each tax credit;
357 (2) A list of the aggregate amount of new or retained
358 jobs that are directly attributable to the tax credits
359 authorized;
360 (3) A statement of the aggregate amount of new capital
361 investment directly attributable to the tax credits
362 authorized;
159

363 (4) Documentation of the estimated net state fiscal
364 benefit for each authorized project and, to the extent
365 available, the actual benefit realized upon completion of
366 such project or activity; and
367 (5) The department's response time for each request
368 for a proposed benefit award under this program.
369 17. The department may adopt such rules, statements of
370 policy, procedures, forms, and guidelines as may be
371 necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 620.2000
372 to 620.2020. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
373 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
374 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
375 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
376 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
377 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
378 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
379 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
380 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
381 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
382 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
383 2013, shall be invalid and void.
384 18. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
385 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under
386 sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall be reauthorized as of
387 August 28, 2018, and shall expire on August 28, 2030; and
388 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
389 authorized under this section shall automatically sunset
390 twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
391 of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020; and
392 (3) Sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall terminate on
393 September first of the calendar year immediately following
394 the calendar year in which the program authorized under
395 sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 is sunset.
160

630.717. 1. Any residential facility or day program
which provides services exclusively to those persons
affected by alcohol or drug abuse shall be exempt from
licensure rules promulgated by the department.
2. Any residential facility or day program which
offers services, treatment or rehabilitation to persons
affected by alcohol or drug abuse shall submit to the
department a description of the services, treatment or
rehabilitation which it offers, a statement of whether each
facility or program is required to meet any fire-safety
standards of a municipality, political subdivision of the
state, and documentation of compliance with such standards,
if they apply.
3. [The department shall survey all such facilities
and programs and shall prepare a report for submission to
the general assembly of actions necessary to bring such
facilities and programs in compliance with fire-safety
standards developed by the department for certification.
The report shall be filed with the speaker of the house and
the president pro tem of the senate by January 1, 1983.
4.] Failure of a facility or program to submit
information requested by the department and required by this
section shall disqualify such facility or program from
receiving department certification or funding until such
information is submitted.
[21.851. 1. There is hereby established a
joint committee of the general assembly, which
shall be known as the "Joint Committee on
Disaster Preparedness and Awareness" and shall
be composed of the following members:
(1) Three members of the senate to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(2) Two members of the senate to be
appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate;
161

(3) Three members of the house of
representatives to be appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives;
(4) Two members of the house of
representatives to be appointed by the minority
floor leader of the house of representatives;
(5) The director of the department of
public safety, or his or her designee;
(6) The director of the department of
agriculture, or his or her designee; and
(7) The adjutant general of the state, or
his or her designee.
2. A majority of the members of the
committee shall constitute a quorum, but the
concurrence of a majority of the members shall
be required for the determination of any matter
within the committee's duties.
3. The joint committee shall make a
continuous study and investigation into issues
relating to disaster preparedness and awareness
including, but not limited to, the following
areas:
(1) Natural and manmade disasters;
(2) State and local preparedness for
floods;
(3) State and local preparedness for
tornados, blizzards, and other severe storms;
(4) Food and energy resiliency;
(5) Cybersecurity;
(6) The budget reserve fund established
under Article IV, Section 27(a) of the Missouri
Constitution;
(7) The protection of vulnerable
populations in intermediate care facilities and
skilled nursing facilities as those terms are
defined in section 198.006; and
(8) Premises that have been previously
contaminated with radioactive material.
4. The joint committee shall compile a
full report of its activities for submission to
the general assembly. The report shall be
submitted not later than January first of even-
numbered years and may include any
recommendations which the committee may have for
legislative action. The report may also include
an analysis and statement of the manner in which
162

statutory provisions relating to disaster
preparedness and awareness are being executed.
5. The joint committee may employ such
personnel as it deems necessary to carry out the
duties imposed by this section, within the
limits of any appropriation for such purpose.
6. The members of the committee shall
serve without compensation, but any actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance
of the committee's official duties by the joint
committee, its members, and any staff assigned
to the committee shall be paid from the joint
contingent fund.
7. This section shall expire on December
31, 2022.]
[32.088. 1. There is hereby created the
"Missouri Task Force on Fair, Nondiscriminatory
Local Taxation Concerning Motor Vehicles,
Trailers, Boats, and Outboard Motors" to consist
of the following members:
(1) The following six members of the
general assembly:
(a) Three members of the house of
representatives, with no more than two members
from the same political party and each member to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(b) Three members of the senate, with no
more than two members from the same political
party and each member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) The director of the department of
revenue or the director's designee;
(3) Two Missouri motor vehicle dealers,
with one to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives and one to be appointed
by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(4) Two representatives from Missouri
county governments, with one to be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives and
one to be appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate;
(5) Two representatives from Missouri city
governments, with one to be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives and one
163

to be appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate; and
(6) One Missouri marine dealer, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
2. The task force shall meet within thirty
days after its creation and organize by
selecting a chair and a vice chair, one of whom
shall be a member of the senate and the other of
whom shall be a member of the house of
representatives. The chair shall designate a
person to keep the records of the task force. A
majority of the task force constitutes a quorum
and a majority vote of a quorum is required for
any action.
3. The task force shall meet at least
quarterly. However, the task force shall meet
at least monthly during each term of the general
assembly. Meetings may be held by telephone or
video conference at the discretion of the chair.
4. Members shall serve on the task force
without compensation but may, subject to
appropriation, be reimbursed for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance
of their official duties as members of the task
force.
5. The goals of the task force shall
address:
(1) The disparity in taxation that
resulted from the Missouri Supreme Court's
decision in Street v. Director of Revenue, 361
S.W.3d 355 (Mo. en banc 2012), concerning the
local taxation of motor vehicles, boats,
trailers, and outboard motors if purchased from
a source other than a licensed Missouri dealer;
(2) The need for local jurisdictions to
continue to receive revenue to provide vital
services restored by S.B. 23, effective July 5,
2013; and
(3) The need to avoid placing Missouri
dealers of motor vehicles, outboard motors,
boats, and trailers at a competitive
disadvantage to non-Missouri dealers of motor
vehicles, outboard motors, boats, and trailers.
6. The task force shall:
164

(1) Review evidence regarding the methods
to address the goals of the task force;
(2) Review the methods used by other
states to address the goals of the task force;
(3) Review the impact of the disparity of
treatment on Missouri dealers; and
(4) Develop legislation that will not
discriminate against Missouri dealers and will
safeguard local revenue to provide vital local
services.
7. On or before December 31, 2017, the
task force shall submit a report on its findings
to the governor and general assembly. The
report shall include any dissenting opinions in
addition to any majority opinions.
8. The task force shall expire on January
1, 2018, or upon submission of a report under
subsection 7 of this section, whichever is
earlier.]
[67.5125. By December 31, 2018, the
department of revenue shall prepare and deliver
a report to the general assembly on the amount
of revenue collected by local governments for
the previous three fiscal years from
communications service providers, as such term
is defined in section 67.5111; a direct-to-home
satellite service, as defined in Public Law 104-
104, Title VI, Section 602; and any video
service provided through electronic commerce, as
defined in Public Law 105-277, Title XI, as
amended, Section 1105(3), from video fees,
linear-foot fees, antenna fees, sales and use
taxes, gross receipts taxes, business license
fees, business license taxes, or any other taxes
or fees assessed to such providers.]
[99.1205. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Distressed Areas Land
Assemblage Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Acquisition costs", the purchase
price for the eligible parcel, costs of
environmental assessments, closing costs, real
estate brokerage fees, reasonable demolition
costs of vacant structures, and reasonable
165

maintenance costs incurred to maintain an
acquired eligible parcel for a period of five
years after the acquisition of such eligible
parcel. Acquisition costs shall not include
costs for title insurance and survey, attorney's
fees, relocation costs, fines, or bills from a
municipality;
(2) "Applicant", any person, firm,
partnership, trust, limited liability company,
or corporation which has:
(a) Incurred, within an eligible project
area, acquisition costs for the acquisition of
land sufficient to satisfy the requirements
under subdivision (8) of this subsection; and
(b) Been appointed or selected, pursuant
to a redevelopment agreement by a municipal
authority, as a redeveloper or similar
designation, under an economic incentive law, to
redevelop an urban renewal area or a
redevelopment area that includes all of an
eligible project area or whose redevelopment
plan or redevelopment area, which encompasses
all of an eligible project area, has been
approved or adopted under an economic incentive
law. In addition to being designated the
redeveloper, the applicant shall have been
designated to receive economic incentives only
after the municipal authority has considered the
amount of the tax credits in adopting such
economic incentives as provided in subsection 8
of this section. The redevelopment agreement
shall provide that:
a. The funds generated through the use or
sale of the tax credits issued under this
section shall be used to redevelop the eligible
project area;
b. No more than seventy-five percent of
the urban renewal area identified in the urban
renewal plan or the redevelopment area
identified in the redevelopment plan may be
redeveloped by the applicant; and
c. The remainder of the urban renewal area
or the redevelopment area shall be redeveloped
by co-redevelopers or redevelopers to whom the
applicant has assigned its redevelopment rights
166

and obligations under the urban renewal plan or
the redevelopment plan;
(3) "Certificate", a tax credit
certificate issued under this section;
(4) "Condemnation proceedings", any action
taken by, or on behalf of, an applicant to
initiate an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to use the power of eminent domain
to acquire a parcel within the eligible project
area. Condemnation proceedings shall include
any and all actions taken after the submission
of a notice of intended acquisition to an owner
of a parcel within the eligible project area by
a municipal authority or any other person or
entity under section 523.250;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(6) "Economic incentive laws", any
provision of Missouri law pursuant to which
economic incentives are provided to redevelopers
of a parcel or parcels to redevelop the land,
such as tax abatement or payments in lieu of
taxes, or redevelopment plans or redevelopment
projects approved or adopted which include the
use of economic incentives to redevelop the
land. Economic incentive laws include, but are
not limited to, the land clearance for
redevelopment authority law under sections
99.300 to 99.660, the real property tax
increment allocation redevelopment act under
sections 99.800 to 99.865, the Missouri downtown
and rural economic stimulus act under sections
99.915 to 99.1060, and the downtown
revitalization preservation program under
sections 99.1080 to 99.1092;
(7) "Eligible parcel", a parcel:
(a) Which is located within an eligible
project area;
(b) Which is to be redeveloped;
(c) On which the applicant has not
commenced construction prior to November 28,
2007;
(d) Which has been acquired without the
commencement of any condemnation proceedings
100 with respect to such parcel brought by or on
101 behalf of the applicant. Any parcel acquired by
167

102 the applicant from a municipal authority shall
103 not constitute an eligible parcel; and
104 (e) On which all outstanding taxes, fines,
105 and bills levied by municipal governments that
106 were levied by the municipality during the time
107 period that the applicant held title to the
108 eligible parcel have been paid in full;
109 (8) "Eligible project area", an area which
110 shall have satisfied the following requirements:
111 (a) The eligible project area shall
112 consist of at least seventy-five acres and may
113 include parcels within its boundaries that do
114 not constitute an eligible parcel;
115 (b) At least eighty percent of the
116 eligible project area shall be located within a
117 Missouri qualified census tract area, as
118 designated by the United States Department of
119 Housing and Urban Development under 26 U.S.C.
120 Section 42, or within a distressed community as
121 that term is defined in section 135.530;
122 (c) The eligible parcels acquired by the
123 applicant within the eligible project area shall
124 total at least fifty acres, which may consist of
125 contiguous and noncontiguous parcels;
126 (d) The average number of parcels per acre
127 in an eligible project area shall be four or
128 more;
129 (e) Less than five percent of the acreage
130 within the boundaries of the eligible project
131 area shall consist of owner-occupied residences
132 which the applicant has identified for
133 acquisition under the urban renewal plan or the
134 redevelopment plan pursuant to which the
135 applicant was appointed or selected as the
136 redeveloper or by which the person or entity was
137 qualified as an applicant under this section on
138 the date of the approval or adoption of such
139 plan;
140 (9) "Interest costs", interest, loan fees,
141 and closing costs. Interest costs shall not
142 include attorney's fees;
143 (10) "Maintenance costs", costs of
144 boarding up and securing vacant structures,
145 costs of removing trash, and costs of cutting
146 grass and weeds;
168

147 (11) "Municipal authority", any city,
148 town, village, county, public body corporate and
149 politic, political subdivision, or land trust of
150 this state established and authorized to own
151 land within the state;
152 (12) "Municipality", any city, town,
153 village, or county;
154 (13) "Parcel", a single lot or tract of
155 land, and the improvements thereon, owned by, or
156 recorded as the property of, one or more persons
157 or entities;
158 (14) "Redeveloped", the process of
159 undertaking and carrying out a redevelopment
160 plan or urban renewal plan pursuant to which the
161 conditions which provided the basis for an
162 eligible project area to be included in a
163 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan are to
164 be reduced or eliminated by redevelopment or
165 rehabilitation; and
166 (15) "Redevelopment agreement", the
167 redevelopment agreement or similar agreement
168 into which the applicant entered with a
169 municipal authority and which is the agreement
170 for the implementation of the urban renewal plan
171 or redevelopment plan pursuant to which the
172 applicant was appointed or selected as the
173 redeveloper or by which the person or entity was
174 qualified as an applicant under this section;
175 and such appointment or selection shall have
176 been approved by an ordinance of the governing
177 body of the municipality, or municipalities, or
178 in the case of any city not within a county, the
179 board of aldermen, in which the eligible project
180 area is located. The redevelopment agreement
181 shall include a time line for redevelopment of
182 the eligible project area. The redevelopment
183 agreement shall state that the named developer
184 shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
185 290.
186 3. Any applicant shall be entitled to a
187 tax credit against the taxes imposed under
188 chapters 143, 147, and 148, except for sections
189 143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty
190 percent of the acquisition costs, and one
191 hundred percent of the interest costs incurred
192 for a period of five years after the acquisition
169

193 of an eligible parcel. No tax credits shall be
194 issued under this section until after January 1,
195 2008.
196 4. If the amount of such tax credit
197 exceeds the total tax liability for the year in
198 which the applicant is entitled to receive a tax
199 credit, the amount that exceeds the state tax
200 liability may be carried forward for credit
201 against the taxes imposed under chapters 143,
202 147, and 148 for the succeeding six years, or
203 until the full credit is used, whichever occurs
204 first. The applicant shall not be entitled to a
205 tax credit for taxes imposed under sections
206 143.191 to 143.265. Applicants entitled to
207 receive such tax credits may transfer, sell, or
208 assign the tax credits. Tax credits granted to
209 a partnership, a limited liability company taxed
210 as a partnership, or multiple owners of property
211 shall be passed through to the partners,
212 members, or owners respectively pro rata or
213 pursuant to an executed agreement among the
214 partners, members, or owners documenting an
215 alternate distribution method.
216 5. A purchaser, transferee, or assignee of
217 the tax credits authorized under this section
218 may use acquired tax credits to offset up to one
219 hundred percent of the tax liabilities otherwise
220 imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148, except
221 for sections 143.191 to 143.265. A seller,
222 transferor, or assignor shall perfect such
223 transfer by notifying the department in writing
224 within thirty calendar days following the
225 effective date of the transfer and shall provide
226 any information as may be required by the
227 department to administer and carry out the
228 provisions of this section.
229 6. To claim tax credits authorized under
230 this section, an applicant shall submit to the
231 department an application for a certificate. An
232 applicant shall identify the boundaries of the
233 eligible project area in the application. The
234 department shall verify that the applicant has
235 submitted a valid application in the form and
236 format required by the department. The
237 department shall verify that the municipal
238 authority held the requisite hearings and gave
170

239 the requisite notices for such hearings in
240 accordance with the applicable economic
241 incentive act, and municipal ordinances. On an
242 annual basis, an applicant may file for the tax
243 credit for the acquisition costs, and for the
244 tax credit for the interest costs, subject to
245 the limitations of this section. If an
246 applicant applying for the tax credit meets the
247 criteria required under this section, the
248 department shall issue a certificate in the
249 appropriate amount. If an applicant receives a
250 tax credit for maintenance costs as a part of
251 the applicant's acquisition costs, the
252 department shall post on its internet website
253 the amount and type of maintenance costs and a
254 description of the redevelopment project for
255 which the applicant received a tax credit within
256 thirty days after the department issues the
257 certificate to the applicant.
258 7. The total aggregate amount of tax
259 credits authorized under this section shall not
260 exceed ninety-five million dollars. At no time
261 shall the annual amount of the tax credits
262 issued under this section exceed twenty million
263 dollars. If the tax credits that are to be
264 issued under this section exceed, in any year,
265 the twenty million dollar limitation, the
266 department shall either:
267 (1) Issue tax credits to the applicant in
268 the amount of twenty million dollars, if there
269 is only one applicant entitled to receive tax
270 credits in that year; or
271 (2) Issue the tax credits on a pro rata
272 basis to all applicants entitled to receive tax
273 credits in that year. Any amount of tax
274 credits, which an applicant is, or applicants
275 are, entitled to receive on an annual basis and
276 are not issued due to the twenty million dollar
277 limitation, shall be carried forward for the
278 benefit of the applicant or applicants to
279 subsequent years.
280 No tax credits provided under this section shall
281 be authorized after August 28, 2013. Any tax
282 credits which have been authorized on or before
283 August 28, 2013, but not issued, may be issued,
284 subject to the limitations provided under this
171

285 subsection, until all such authorized tax
286 credits have been issued.
287 8. Upon issuance of any tax credits
288 pursuant to this section, the department shall
289 report to the municipal authority the
290 applicant's name and address, the parcel numbers
291 of the eligible parcels for which the tax
292 credits were issued, the itemized acquisition
293 costs and interest costs for which tax credits
294 were issued, and the total value of the tax
295 credits issued. The municipal authority and the
296 state shall not consider the amount of the tax
297 credits as an applicant's cost, but shall
298 include the tax credits in any sources and uses
299 and cost benefit analysis reviewed or created
300 for the purpose of awarding other economic
301 incentives. The amount of the tax credits shall
302 not be considered an applicant's cost in the
303 evaluation of the amount of any award of any
304 other economic incentives, but shall be
305 considered in measuring the reasonableness of
306 the rate of return to the applicant with respect
307 to such award of other economic incentives. The
308 municipal authority shall provide the report to
309 any relevant commission, board, or entity
310 responsible for the evaluation and
311 recommendation or approval of other economic
312 incentives to assist in the redevelopment of the
313 eligible project area. Tax credits authorized
314 under this section shall constitute
315 redevelopment tax credits, as such term is
316 defined under section 135.800, and shall be
317 subject to all provisions applicable to
318 redevelopment tax credits provided under
319 sections 135.800 to 135.830.
320 9. The department may promulgate rules to
321 implement the provisions of this section. Any
322 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
323 defined in section 536.010, that is created
324 under the authority delegated in this section
325 shall become effective only if it complies with
326 and is subject to all of the provisions of
327 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
328 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
329 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
330 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
172

331 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
332 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
333 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
334 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
335 adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
336 and void.]
[103.175. The board shall study and report
to the general assembly, on or before December
15, 2003, on the feasibility of including in
this plan individuals who are employees of
eligible agencies which have not elected to join
the plan or who are retirees of school
districts.]
[103.178. 1. Beginning on a date
specified by the board of trustees of the
Missouri consolidated health care plan but not
later than July 1, 1995, the Missouri
consolidated health care plan established under
section 103.005 shall implement a pilot project
to make available to those residing in the pilot
project area who are covered by the plan an
alternative system of benefits for the treatment
of chemical dependency added to those benefits
regularly available to plan participants. The
benefits provided under the pilot project shall
be similar in scope and comprehensiveness, but
not limited to, the benefits provided for the
treatment and rehabilitation of persons who are
chemically dependent under the department of
mental health's comprehensive substance
treatment and rehabilitation program, popularly
described as the C-STAR program. Such a pilot
project shall operate for a period not to exceed
four years. To the extent that participation in
the pilot project incurs additional cost to a
person covered under the plan, participation
shall be voluntary. If no additional cost is
incurred, the alternative system of benefits may
be made in lieu of the regular benefits for the
services in the pilot project area.
2. The Missouri state employees'
retirement system or the Missouri health care
plan, as appropriate, shall in cooperation with
the department of mental health and the
department of commerce and insurance design the
173

pilot project so as to generate data to evaluate
the costs and benefits of providing coverage of
chemical dependency using an alternative set of
benefits as provided in this section. The
Missouri consolidated health care plan shall at
the completion of the pilot project submit to
the governor and the members of the general
assembly a report which describes the results of
the evaluation of this pilot project. As
authorized by appropriations made for that
purpose, the Missouri state employees'
retirement system or the Missouri consolidated
health care plan may contract with persons to
conduct an independent evaluation of the pilot
project established in this section.]
[135.276. As used in sections 135.276 to
135.283, the following terms mean:
(1) "Continuation of commercial
operations" shall be deemed to occur during the
first taxable year following the taxable year
during which the business entered into an
agreement with the department pursuant to
section 135.283 in order to receive the tax
exemption, tax credits and refundable credits
authorized by sections 135.276 to 135.283;
(2) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(3) "Director", the director of the
department of economic development;
(4) "Enterprise zone", an enterprise zone
created under section 135.210 that includes all
or part of a home rule city with more than
twenty-six thousand but less than twenty-seven
thousand inhabitants located in any county with
a charter form of government and with more than
one million inhabitants;
(5) "Facility", any building used as a
revenue-producing enterprise located within an
enterprise zone, including the land on which the
facility is located and all machinery,
equipment, and other real and depreciable
tangible personal property acquired for use at
and located at or within such facility and used
in connection with the operation of such
facility;
174

(6) "NAICS", the industrial classification
as such classifications are defined in the 1997
edition of the North American Industrial
Classification System Manual as prepared by the
Executive Office of the President, Office of
Management and Budget;
(7) "Retained business facility", a
facility in an enterprise zone operated by the
taxpayer which satisfies the following
requirements as determined by the department and
included in an agreement with the department:
(a) The taxpayer agrees to a capital
investment project at the facility of at least
five hundred million dollars to take place over
a period of two consecutive taxable years ending
no later than the fifth taxable year after
continuation of commercial operations;
(b) The taxpayer has maintained at least
two thousand employees per year at the facility
for each of the five taxable years preceding the
year of continuation of commercial operations;
(c) The taxpayer agrees to maintain at
least the level of employment that it had at the
facility in the taxable year immediately
preceding the year of continuation of commercial
operations for ten consecutive taxable years
beginning with the year of the continuation of
commercial operations. Temporary layoffs
necessary to implement the capital investment
project will not be considered a violation of
this requirement;
(d) The taxpayer agrees that the amount of
the average wage paid by the taxpayer at the
facility will exceed the average wage paid
within the county in which the facility is
located for ten consecutive taxable years
beginning with the year of the continuation of
commercial operations;
(e) Significant local incentives with
respect to the project or retained facility have
been committed, which incentives may consist of:
a. Cash or in-kind incentives derived from
any nonstate source, including incentives
provided by the affected political subdivisions,
private industry and/or local chambers of
commerce or similar such organizations; or
175

b. Relief from local taxes;
(f) Receipt of the tax exemption, tax
credits, and refunds are major factors in the
taxpayer's decision to retain its operations at
the facility in Missouri and go forward with the
capital investment project and not receiving the
exemption, credits, and refunds will result in
the taxpayer moving its operations out of
Missouri; and
(g) There is at least one other state that
the taxpayer verifies is being considered as the
site to which the facility's operations will be
relocated;
(8) "Retained business facility employee",
a person employed by the taxpayer in the
operation of a retained business facility during
the taxable year for which the credit allowed by
section 135.279 is claimed, except that truck
drivers and rail and barge vehicle operators
shall not constitute retained business facility
employees. A person shall be deemed to be so
employed if such person performs duties in
connection with the operation of the retained
100 business facility on a regular, full-time
101 basis. The number of retained business facility
102 employees during any taxable year shall be
103 determined by dividing by twelve the sum of the
104 number of individuals employed on the last
105 business day of each month of such taxable
106 year. If the retained business facility is in
107 operation for less than the entire taxable year,
108 the number of retained business facility
109 employees shall be determined by dividing the
110 sum of the number of individuals employed on the
111 last business day of each full calendar month
112 during the portion of such taxable year during
113 which the retained business facility was in
114 operation by the number of full calendar months
115 during such period;
116 (9) "Retained business facility income",
117 the Missouri taxable income, as defined in
118 chapter 143, derived by the taxpayer from the
119 operation of the retained business facility. If
120 a taxpayer has income derived from the operation
121 of a retained business facility as well as from
122 other activities conducted within this state,
176

123 the Missouri taxable income derived by the
124 taxpayer from the operation of the retained
125 business facility shall be determined by
126 multiplying the taxpayer's Missouri taxable
127 income, computed in accordance with chapter 143,
128 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
129 property factor, as defined in paragraph (a) of
130 this subdivision, plus the payroll factor, as
131 defined in paragraph (b) of this subdivision,
132 and the denominator of which is two:
133 (a) The "property factor" is a fraction,
134 the numerator of which is the retained business
135 facility investment certified for the tax
136 period, and the denominator of which is the
137 average value of all the taxpayer's real and
138 depreciable tangible personal property owned or
139 rented and used in this state during the tax
140 period. The average value of all such property
141 shall be determined as provided in chapter 32;
142 (b) The "payroll factor" is a fraction,
143 the numerator of which is the total amount paid
144 during the tax period by the taxpayer for
145 compensation to persons qualifying as retained
146 business facility employees at the retained
147 business facility, and the denominator of which
148 is the total amount paid in this state during
149 the tax period by the taxpayer for
150 compensation. The compensation paid in this
151 state shall be determined as provided in chapter
152 32;
153 (10) "Retained business facility
154 investment", the value of real and depreciable
155 tangible personal property, acquired by the
156 taxpayer as part of the retained business
157 facility after the date of continuation of
158 commercial operations, which is used by the
159 taxpayer in the operation of the retained
160 business facility, during the taxable year for
161 which the credit allowed by section 135.279 is
162 claimed, except that trucks, truck-trailers,
163 truck semitrailers, rail vehicles, barge
164 vehicles, aircraft and other rolling stock for
165 hire, track, switches, barges, bridges, tunnels,
166 rail yards, and spurs shall not constitute
167 retained business facility investments. The
177

168 total value of such property during such taxable
169 year shall be:
170 (a) Its original cost if owned by the
171 taxpayer; or
172 (b) Eight times the net annual rental
173 rate, if leased by the taxpayer. The net annual
174 rental rate shall be the annual rental rate paid
175 by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate
176 received by the taxpayer from subrentals. The
177 retained business facility investment shall be
178 determined by dividing by twelve the sum of the
179 total value of such property on the last
180 business day of each calendar month of the
181 taxable year. If the retained business facility
182 is in operation for less than an entire taxable
183 year, the retained business facility investment
184 shall be determined by dividing the sum of the
185 total value of such property on the last
186 business day of each full calendar month during
187 the portion of such taxable year during which
188 the retained business facility was in operation
189 by the number of full calendar months during
190 such period;
191 (11) "Revenue-producing enterprise",
192 manufacturing activities classified as NAICS
193 336211.]
[135.277. The provisions of chapter 143
notwithstanding, one-half of the Missouri
taxable income attributed to an approved
retained business facility that is earned by a
taxpayer operating the approved retained
business facility may be exempt from taxation
under chapter 143. That portion of income
attributed to the retained business facility
shall be determined in a manner prescribed in
paragraph (b) of subdivision (9) of section
135.276, except that compensation paid to truck
drivers, rail, or barge vehicle operators shall
be excluded from the fraction.]
[135.279. 1. Any taxpayer that operates
an approved retained business facility in an
enterprise zone may be allowed a credit, each
year for ten years, in an amount determined
pursuant to subsection 2 or 3 of this section,
whichever is applicable, against the tax imposed
178

by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, as
follows:
(1) The credit allowed for each retained
business facility employee shall be four hundred
dollars, except that for each retained business
facility employee that exceeds the level of
employment set forth in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (7) of section 135.276, the credit
shall be five hundred dollars. Transfers from
another facility operated by the taxpayer in the
state will not count as retained business
facility employees;
(2) An additional credit of four hundred
dollars shall be granted for each twelve-month
period that a retained business facility
employee is a resident of an enterprise zone;
(3) An additional credit of four hundred
dollars shall be granted for each twelve-month
period that the person employed as a retained
business facility employee is a person who, at
the time of such employment by the new business
facility, met the criteria as set forth in
section 135.240;
(4) To the extent that expenses incurred
by a retained business facility in an enterprise
zone for the training of persons employed in the
operation of the retained business facility is
not covered by an existing federal, state, or
local program, such retained business facility
shall be eligible for a full tax credit equal to
eighty percent of that portion of such training
expenses which are in excess of four hundred
dollars for each trainee who is a resident of an
enterprise zone or who was at the time of such
employment at the retained business facility
unemployable or difficult to employ as defined
in section 135.240, provided such credit shall
not exceed four hundred dollars for each
employee trained;
(5) The credit allowed for retained
business facility investment shall be equal to
the sum of ten percent of the first ten thousand
dollars of such qualifying investment, plus five
percent of the next ninety thousand dollars of
such qualifying investment, plus two percent of
179

all remaining qualifying investments within an
enterprise zone. The taxpayer's retained
business facility investment shall be reduced by
the amount of investment made by the taxpayer or
related taxpayer which was subsequently
transferred to the retained business facility
from another Missouri facility and for which
credits authorized in this section are not being
earned.
2. The credits allowed by subsection 1 of
this section shall offset the greater of:
(1) Some portion of the income tax
otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, with respect to such taxpayer's
retained business facility income for the
taxable year for which such credit is allowed; or
(2) If the taxpayer operates no other
facility in Missouri, the credits allowed in
subsection 1 of this section shall offset up to
fifty percent or, in the case of an economic
development project located within a distressed
community as defined in section 135.530, seventy-
five percent of the business income tax
otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, if the business operates no other
facilities in Missouri;
(3) If the taxpayer operates more than one
facility in Missouri, the credits allowed in
subsection 1 of this section shall offset up to
the greater of the portion prescribed in
subdivision (1) of this subsection or twenty-
five percent or, in the case of an economic
development project located within a distressed
community as defined in section 135.530, thirty-
five percent of the business' tax, except that
no taxpayer operating more than one facility in
Missouri shall be allowed to offset more than
twenty-five percent or, in the case of an
economic development project located within a
distressed community as defined in section
135.530, thirty-five percent of the taxpayer's
business income tax in any tax period under the
method prescribed in this subdivision.
180

3. In the case where a person employed by
the retained business facility is a resident of
100 the enterprise zone for less than a twelve-month
101 period, or in the case where a person employed
102 as a retained business facility employee is a
103 person who, at the time of such employment by
104 the retained business facility, met the criteria
105 as set forth in section 135.240, is employed for
106 less than a twelve-month period, the credits
107 allowed by subdivisions (2) and (3) of
108 subsection 1 of this section shall be determined
109 by multiplying the dollar amount of the credit
110 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
111 number of calendar days during the taxpayer's
112 tax year for which such credits are claimed, in
113 which the person met the requirements prescribed
114 in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection,
115 and the denominator of which is three hundred
116 sixty-five.
117 4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
118 the contrary, any taxpayer who claims the
119 exemption and credits allowed in sections
120 135.276 to 135.283 shall not be eligible to
121 receive the exemption allowed in section
122 135.220, the credits allowed in sections 135.225
123 and 135.235, and the refund authorized by
124 section 135.245 or the tax credits allowed in
125 section 135.110. The taxpayer must elect among
126 the options. To perfect the election, the
127 taxpayer shall attach written notification of
128 such election to the taxpayer's initial
129 application for claiming tax credits. The
130 election shall be irreversible once perfected.
131 5. A taxpayer shall not receive the income
132 exemption described in section 135.276 and the
133 tax credits described in subsection 1 of this
134 section for any year in which the terms and
135 conditions of sections 135.276 to 135.283 are
136 not met. Such incentives shall not exceed the
137 fifteen-year limitation pursuant to subsection 1
138 of section 135.230 or the seven-year limitation
139 pursuant to subsection 5 of section 135.230.
140 6. The initial application for claiming
141 tax credits must be made in the taxpayer's tax
142 period immediately following the tax period in
181

143 which commencement of commercial operations
144 began at the new business facility.
145 7. Credits may not be carried forward but
146 shall be claimed for the taxable year during
147 which continuation of commercial operations
148 occurs at such retained business facility, and
149 for each of the nine succeeding taxable years.]
[135.281. 1. Any taxpayer operating an
approved retained business facility that is
located within a state enterprise zone
established pursuant to sections 135.200 to
135.256 may make an application to the
department of economic development for an income
tax refund.
2. Such refunds shall be approved only if
the amount of tax credits certified for the
taxpayer in the taxable year exceeded the
company's total Missouri tax on taxable income
in that year by an amount equal to at least one
million dollars. In such cases, a portion of
tax credits earned shall constitute an
overpayment of taxes and may be refunded to the
taxpayer in the manner authorized by this
section.
3. The department shall evaluate and may
approve such applications based upon the
importance of the approved retained business
facility to the economy of Missouri, the
company's investment of at least five hundred
million dollars in facilities or equipment, and
the number of jobs to be created or retained.
Such applications may be approved annually for
no longer than five successive years. The
maximum amount of refund that may be awarded to
the manufacturer or assembler shall not exceed
two million dollars per year. Notwithstanding
other provisions of law to the contrary, if the
taxpayer's tax credits issued under sections
135.276 to 135.283 for a taxable year exceed the
taxpayer's taxable income by more than two
million dollars, the credits may be carried
forward for five years or until used, whichever
is earlier, and may be included in refund
amounts otherwise authorized by this section.]
182

[135.283. 1. A taxpayer shall apply to
the department for approval to participate in
the program authorized by sections 135.276 to
135.283. The application shall be in a form
prescribed by and contain all information
requested by the department to determine
eligibility for the program and for the
department to make its decision whether to
approve the taxpayer for participation in the
program.
2. The department may issue an approval
contingent upon the successful execution of an
agreement between the department and the
taxpayer seeking approval of a facility as a
retained business facility which shall include,
but not be limited to, the following:
(1) A detailed description of the project
that is the subject of the agreement;
(2) A requirement that the taxpayer shall
annually report to the department the total
amount of salaries and wages paid to eligible
employees in retained business facility jobs,
and any other information the department
requires to confirm compliance with the
requirements of sections 135.276 to 135.283;
(3) A requirement that the taxpayer shall
provide written notification to the director not
more than thirty days after the taxpayer makes
or receives a proposal that would transfer the
taxpayer's state tax liability obligations to a
successor taxpayer;
(4) A requirement that the taxpayer shall
maintain operations at the facility location for
at least ten years at a certain employment level;
(5) The requirements otherwise required by
sections 135.276 to 135.283; and
(6) A provision for repayment of
incentives upon breach of the agreement.]
[135.313. 1. Any person, firm or
corporation who engages in the business of
producing charcoal or charcoal products in the
state of Missouri shall be eligible for a tax
credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to
chapter 143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261,
as an incentive to implement safe and efficient
183

environmental controls. The tax credit shall be
equal to fifty percent of the purchase price of
the best available control technology equipment
connected with the production of charcoal in the
state of Missouri or, if the taxpayer
manufactures such equipment, fifty percent of
the manufacturing cost of the equipment, to and
including the year the equipment is put into
service. The credit may be claimed for a period
of eight years beginning with the 1998 calendar
year and is to be a tax credit against the tax
otherwise due.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the
tax due shall not be refunded but may be carried
over to any subsequent taxable year, not to
exceed seven years.
3. The charcoal producer may elect to
assign to a third party the approved tax
credit. Certification of assignment and other
appropriate forms must be filed with the
Missouri department of revenue and the
department of economic development.
4. When applying for a tax credit, the
charcoal producer specified in subsection 1 of
this section shall make application for the
credit to the division of environmental quality
of the department of natural resources. The
application shall identify the specific best
available control technology equipment and the
purchase price, or manufacturing cost of such
equipment. The director of the department of
natural resources is authorized to require
permits to construct prior to the installation
of best available control technology equipment
and other information which he or she deems
appropriate.
5. The director of the department of
natural resources in conjunction with the
department of economic development shall certify
to the department of revenue that the best
available control technology equipment meets the
requirements to obtain a tax credit as specified
in this section.]
[135.545. A taxpayer shall be allowed a
credit for taxes paid pursuant to chapter 143,
184

147 or 148 in an amount equal to fifty percent
of a qualified investment in transportation
development for aviation, mass transportation,
including parking facilities for users of mass
transportation, railroads, ports, including
parking facilities and limited access roads
within ports, waterborne transportation, bicycle
and pedestrian paths, or rolling stock located
in a distressed community as defined in section
135.530, and which are part of a development
plan approved by the appropriate local agency.
If the department of economic development
determines the investment has been so approved,
the department shall grant the tax credit in
order of date received. A taxpayer may carry
forward any unused tax credit for up to ten
years and may carry it back for the previous
three years until such credit has been fully
claimed. Certificates of tax credit issued in
accordance with this section may be transferred,
sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which
names the transferee. The tax credits allowed
pursuant to this section shall be for an amount
of no more than ten million dollars for each
year. This credit shall apply to returns filed
for all taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 1999. Any unused portion of the tax
credit authorized pursuant to this section shall
be available for use in the future by those
entities until fully claimed. For purposes of
this section, a "taxpayer" shall include any
charitable organization that is exempt from
federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.]
[135.546. For all tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2005, no tax credits shall
be approved, awarded, or issued to any person or
entity claiming any tax credit under section
135.545; if an organization has been allocated
credits for contribution-based credits prior to
January 1, 2005, the organization may issue such
credits prior to January 1, 2007, for qualified
contributions.]
185

[135.680. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted purchase price", the product
of:
(a) The amount paid to the issuer of a
qualified equity investment for such qualified
equity investment; and
(b) The following fraction:
a. The numerator shall be the dollar
amount of qualified low-income community
investments held by the issuer in this state as
of the credit allowance date during the
applicable tax year; and
b. The denominator shall be the total
dollar amount of qualified low-income community
investments held by the issuer in all states as
of the credit allowance date during the
applicable tax year;
c. For purposes of calculating the amount
of qualified low-income community investments
held by an issuer, an investment shall be
considered held by an issuer even if the
investment has been sold or repaid; provided
that the issuer reinvests an amount equal to the
capital returned to or recovered by the issuer
from the original investment, exclusive of any
profits realized, in another qualified low-
income community investment within twelve months
of the receipt of such capital. An issuer shall
not be required to reinvest capital returned
from qualified low-income community investments
after the sixth anniversary of the issuance of
the qualified equity investment, the proceeds of
which were used to make the qualified low-income
community investment, and the qualified low-
income community investment shall be considered
held by the issuer through the seventh
anniversary of the qualified equity investment's
issuance;
(2) "Applicable percentage", zero percent
for each of the first two credit allowance
dates, seven percent for the third credit
allowance date, and eight percent for the next
four credit allowance dates;
(3) "Credit allowance date", with respect
to any qualified equity investment:
186

(a) The date on which such investment is
initially made; and
(b) Each of the six anniversary dates of
such date thereafter;
(4) "Long-term debt security", any debt
instrument issued by a qualified community
development entity, at par value or a premium,
with an original maturity date of at least seven
years from the date of its issuance, with no
acceleration of repayment, amortization, or
prepayment features prior to its original
maturity date, and with no distribution,
payment, or interest features related to the
profitability of the qualified community
development entity or the performance of the
qualified community development entity's
investment portfolio. The foregoing shall in no
way limit the holder's ability to accelerate
payments on the debt instrument in situations
where the issuer has defaulted on covenants
designed to ensure compliance with this section
or Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended;
(5) "Qualified active low-income community
business", the meaning given such term in
Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended; provided that any business
that derives or projects to derive fifteen
percent or more of its annual revenue from the
rental or sale of real estate shall not be
considered to be a qualified active low-income
community business;
(6) "Qualified community development
entity", the meaning given such term in Section
45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; provided that such entity has entered
into an allocation agreement with the Community
Development Financial Institutions Fund of the
U.S. Treasury Department with respect to credits
authorized by Section 45D of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes
the state of Missouri within the service area
set forth in such allocation agreement;
(7) "Qualified equity investment", any
equity investment in, or long-term debt security
187

issued by, a qualified community development
entity that:
(a) Is acquired after September 4, 2007,
at its original issuance solely in exchange for
cash;
(b) Has at least eighty-five percent of
its cash purchase price used by the issuer to
make qualified low-income community investments;
100 and
101 (c) Is designated by the issuer as a
102 qualified equity investment under this
103 subdivision and is certified by the department
104 of economic development as not exceeding the
105 limitation contained in subsection 2 of this
106 section. This term shall include any qualified
107 equity investment that does not meet the
108 provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision
109 if such investment was a qualified equity
110 investment in the hands of a prior holder;
111 (8) "Qualified low-income community
112 investment", any capital or equity investment
113 in, or loan to, any qualified active low-income
114 community business. With respect to any one
115 qualified active low-income community business,
116 the maximum amount of qualified low-income
117 community investments made in such business, on
118 a collective basis with all of its affiliates,
119 that may be used from the calculation of any
120 numerator described in subparagraph a. of
121 paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this
122 subsection shall be ten million dollars whether
123 issued to one or several qualified community
124 development entities;
125 (9) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax
126 otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
127 withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to
128 143.265, or otherwise due under section 375.916
129 or chapter 147, 148, or 153;
130 (10) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity
131 subject to the tax imposed in chapter 143,
132 excluding withholding tax imposed in sections
133 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax imposed in
134 section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153.
135 2. A taxpayer that makes a qualified
136 equity investment earns a vested right to tax
137 credits under this section. On each credit
188

138 allowance date of such qualified equity
139 investment the taxpayer, or subsequent holder of
140 the qualified equity investment, shall be
141 entitled to a tax credit during the taxable year
142 including such credit allowance date. The tax
143 credit amount shall be equal to the applicable
144 percentage of the adjusted purchase price paid
145 to the issuer of such qualified equity
146 investment. The amount of the tax credit
147 claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
148 taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year
149 for which the tax credit is claimed. No tax
150 credit claimed under this section shall be
151 refundable or transferable. Tax credits earned
152 by a partnership, limited liability company, S-
153 corporation, or other pass-through entity may be
154 allocated to the partners, members, or
155 shareholders of such entity for their direct use
156 in accordance with the provisions of any
157 agreement among such partners, members, or
158 shareholders. Any amount of tax credit that the
159 taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
160 claiming in a taxable year may be carried
161 forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent
162 taxable years. The department of economic
163 development shall limit the monetary amount of
164 qualified equity investments permitted under
165 this section to a level necessary to limit tax
166 credit utilization at no more than twenty-five
167 million dollars of tax credits in any fiscal
168 year. Such limitation on qualified equity
169 investments shall be based on the anticipated
170 utilization of credits without regard to the
171 potential for taxpayers to carry forward tax
172 credits to later tax years.
173 3. The issuer of the qualified equity
174 investment shall certify to the department of
175 economic development the anticipated dollar
176 amount of such investments to be made in this
177 state during the first twelve-month period
178 following the initial credit allowance date. If
179 on the second credit allowance date, the actual
180 dollar amount of such investments is different
181 than the amount estimated, the department of
182 economic development shall adjust the credits
189

183 arising on the second allowance date to account
184 for such difference.
185 4. The department of economic development
186 shall recapture the tax credit allowed under
187 this section with respect to such qualified
188 equity investment under this section if:
189 (1) Any amount of the federal tax credit
190 available with respect to a qualified equity
191 investment that is eligible for a tax credit
192 under this section is recaptured under Section
193 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
194 amended; or
195 (2) The issuer redeems or makes principal
196 repayment with respect to a qualified equity
197 investment prior to the seventh anniversary of
198 the issuance of such qualified equity
199 investment. Any tax credit that is subject to
200 recapture shall be recaptured from the taxpayer
201 that claimed the tax credit on a return.
202 5. The department of economic development
203 shall promulgate rules to implement the
204 provisions of this section, including recapture
205 provisions on a scaled proportional basis, and
206 to administer the allocation of tax credits
207 issued for qualified equity investments, which
208 shall be conducted on a first-come, first-serve
209 basis. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
210 term is defined in section 536.010, that is
211 created under the authority delegated in this
212 section shall become effective only if it
213 complies with and is subject to all of the
214 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
215 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
216 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
217 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
218 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
219 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
220 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
221 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
222 adopted after September 4, 2007, shall be
223 invalid and void.
224 6. For fiscal years following fiscal year
225 2010, qualified equity investments shall not be
226 made under this section unless reauthorization
227 is made pursuant to this subsection. For all
228 fiscal years following fiscal year 2010, unless
190

229 the general assembly adopts a concurrent
230 resolution granting authority to the department
231 of economic development to approve qualified
232 equity investments for the Missouri new markets
233 development program and clearly describing the
234 amount of tax credits available for the next
235 fiscal year, or otherwise complies with the
236 provisions of this subsection, no qualified
237 equity investments may be permitted to be made
238 under this section. The amount of available tax
239 credits contained in such a resolution shall not
240 exceed the limitation provided under subsection
241 2 of this section. In any year in which the
242 provisions of this section shall sunset pursuant
243 to subsection 7 of this section, reauthorization
244 shall be made by general law and not by
245 concurrent resolution. Nothing in this
246 subsection shall preclude a taxpayer who makes a
247 qualified equity investment prior to the
248 expiration of authority to make qualified equity
249 investments from claiming tax credits relating
250 to such qualified equity investment for each
251 applicable credit allowance date.
252 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
253 sunset act:
254 (1) The provisions of the new program
255 authorized under this section shall
256 automatically sunset six years after September
257 4, 2007, unless reauthorized by an act of the
258 general assembly; and
259 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
260 program authorized under this section shall
261 automatically sunset twelve years after the
262 effective date of the reauthorization of this
263 section; and
264 (3) This section shall terminate on
265 September first of the calendar year immediately
266 following the calendar year in which the program
267 authorized under this section is sunset.
268 However, nothing in this subsection shall
269 preclude a taxpayer who makes a qualified equity
270 investment prior to sunset of this section under
271 the provisions of section 23.253 from claiming
272 tax credits relating to such qualified equity
273 investment for each credit allowance date.]
191

[135.682. 1. The director of the
department of economic development or the
director's designee shall issue letter rulings
regarding the tax credit program authorized
under section 135.680, subject to the terms and
conditions set forth in this section. The
director of the department of economic
development may impose additional terms and
conditions consistent with this section to
requests for letter rulings by regulation
promulgated under chapter 536. For the purposes
of this section, the term "letter ruling" means
a written interpretation of law to a specific
set of facts provided by the applicant
requesting a letter ruling.
2. The director or director's designee
shall respond to a request for a letter ruling
within sixty days of receipt of such request.
The applicant may provide a draft letter ruling
for the department's consideration. The
applicant may withdraw the request for a letter
ruling, in writing, prior to the issuance of the
letter ruling. The director or the director's
designee may refuse to issue a letter ruling for
good cause, but must list the specific reasons
for refusing to issue the letter ruling. Good
cause includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The applicant requests the director to
determine whether a statute is constitutional or
a regulation is lawful;
(2) The request involves a hypothetical
situation or alternative plans;
(3) The facts or issues presented in the
request are unclear, overbroad, insufficient, or
otherwise inappropriate as a basis upon which to
issue a letter ruling; and
(4) The issue is currently being
considered in a rulemaking procedure, contested
case, or other agency or judicial proceeding
that may definitely resolve the issue.
3. Letter rulings shall bind the director
and the director's agents and their successors
until such time as the taxpayer or its
shareholders, members, or partners, as
applicable, claim all of such tax credits on a
Missouri tax return, subject to the terms and
192

conditions set forth in properly published
regulations. The letter ruling shall apply only
to the applicant.
4. Letter rulings issued under the
authority of this section shall not be a rule as
defined in section 536.010 in that it is an
interpretation issued by the department with
respect to a specific set of facts and intended
to apply only to that specific set of facts, and
therefore shall not be subject to the rulemaking
requirements of chapter 536.
5. Information in letter ruling requests
as described in section 620.014 shall be closed
to the public. Copies of letter rulings shall
be available to the public provided that the
applicant identifying information and otherwise
protected information is redacted from the
letter ruling as provided in subsection 1 of
section 610.024.]
[135.710. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Alternative fuel vehicle refueling
property", property in this state owned by an
eligible applicant and used for storing
alternative fuels and for dispensing such
alternative fuels into fuel tanks of motor
vehicles owned by such eligible applicant or
private citizens;
(2) "Alternative fuels", any motor fuel at
least seventy percent of the volume of which
consists of one or more of the following:
(a) Ethanol;
(b) Natural gas;
(c) Compressed natural gas, or CNG;
(d) Liquified natural gas, or LNG;
(e) Liquified petroleum gas, or LP gas,
propane, or autogas;
(f) Any mixture of biodiesel and diesel
fuel, without regard to any use of kerosene;
(g) Hydrogen;
(3) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(4) "Electric vehicle recharging
property", property in this state owned by an
eligible applicant and used for recharging
193

electric motor vehicles owned by such eligible
applicant or private citizens;
(5) "Eligible applicant", a business
entity or private citizen that is the owner of
an electric vehicle recharging property or an
alternative fuel vehicle refueling property;
(6) "Qualified Missouri contractor", a
contractor whose principal place of business is
located in Missouri and has been located in
Missouri for a period of not less than five
years;
(7) "Qualified property", an electric
vehicle recharging property or an alternative
fuel vehicle refueling property which, if
constructed after August 28, 2014, was
constructed with at least fifty-one percent of
the costs being paid to qualified Missouri
contractors for the:
(a) Fabrication of premanufactured
equipment or process piping used in the
construction of such facility;
(b) Construction of such facility; and
(c) General maintenance of such facility
during the time period in which such facility
receives any tax credit under this section.
If no qualified Missouri contractor is located
within seventy-five miles of the property, the
requirement that fifty-one percent of the costs
shall be paid to qualified Missouri contractors
shall not apply.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2015, but before January 1, 2018, any
eligible applicant who installs and operates a
qualified property shall be allowed a credit
against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, or due under chapter 147 or
chapter 148 for any tax year in which the
applicant is constructing the qualified
property. The credit allowed in this section
per eligible applicant who is a private citizen
shall not exceed fifteen hundred dollars or per
eligible applicant that is a business entity
shall not exceed the lesser of twenty thousand
dollars or twenty percent of the total costs
directly associated with the purchase and
194

installation of any alternative fuel storage and
dispensing equipment or any recharging equipment
on any qualified property, which shall not
include the following:
(1) Costs associated with the purchase of
land upon which to place a qualified property;
(2) Costs associated with the purchase of
an existing qualified property; or
(3) Costs for the construction or purchase
of any structure.
3. Tax credits allowed by this section
shall be claimed by the eligible applicant at
the time such applicant files a return for the
tax year in which the storage and dispensing or
recharging facilities were placed in service at
a qualified property, and shall be applied
against the income tax liability imposed by
chapter 143, chapter 147, or chapter 148 after
all other credits provided by law have been
applied. The cumulative amount of tax credits
which may be claimed by eligible applicants
claiming all credits authorized in this section
shall not exceed one million dollars in any
calendar year, subject to appropriations.
4. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds
the eligible applicant's tax liability, the
difference shall not be refundable. Any amount
100 of credit that an eligible applicant is
101 prohibited by this section from claiming in a
102 taxable year may be carried forward to any of
103 such applicant's two subsequent taxable years.
104 Tax credits allowed under this section may be
105 assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
106 conveyed.
107 5. Any qualified property, for which an
108 eligible applicant receives tax credits under
109 this section, which ceases to sell alternative
110 fuel or recharge electric vehicles shall cause
111 the forfeiture of such eligible applicant's tax
112 credits provided under this section for the
113 taxable year in which the qualified property
114 ceased to sell alternative fuel or recharge
115 electric vehicles and for future taxable years
116 with no recapture of tax credits obtained by an
117 eligible applicant with respect to such
118 applicant's tax years which ended before the
195

119 sale of alternative fuel or recharging of
120 electric vehicles ceased.
121 6. The director of revenue shall establish
122 the procedure by which the tax credits in this
123 section may be claimed, and shall establish a
124 procedure by which the cumulative amount of tax
125 credits is apportioned equally among all
126 eligible applicants claiming the credit. To the
127 maximum extent possible, the director of revenue
128 shall establish the procedure described in this
129 subsection in such a manner as to ensure that
130 eligible applicants can claim all the tax
131 credits possible up to the cumulative amount of
132 tax credits available for the taxable year. No
133 eligible applicant claiming a tax credit under
134 this section shall be liable for any interest or
135 penalty for filing a tax return after the date
136 fixed for filing such return as a result of the
137 apportionment procedure under this subsection.
138 7. Any eligible applicant desiring to
139 claim a tax credit under this section shall
140 submit the appropriate application for such
141 credit with the department. The application for
142 a tax credit under this section shall include
143 any information required by the department. The
144 department shall review the applications and
145 certify to the department of revenue each
146 eligible applicant that qualifies for the tax
147 credit.
148 8. The department and the department of
149 revenue may promulgate rules to implement the
150 provisions of this section. Any rule or portion
151 of a rule, as that term is defined in section
152 536.010, that is created under the authority
153 delegated in this section shall become effective
154 only if it complies with and is subject to all
155 of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
156 applicable, section 536.028. This section and
157 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
158 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant
159 to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
160 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
161 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
162 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
163 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall
164 be invalid and void.
196

165 9. The provisions of section 23.253 of the
166 Missouri sunset act notwithstanding:
167 (1) The provisions of the new program
168 authorized under this section shall
169 automatically sunset three years after December
170 31, 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the
171 general assembly; and
172 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
173 program authorized under this section shall
174 automatically sunset six years after the
175 effective date of the reauthorization of this
176 section; and
177 (3) This section shall terminate on
178 December thirty-first of the calendar year
179 immediately following the calendar year in which
180 the program authorized under this section is
181 sunset; and
182 (4) The provisions of this subsection
183 shall not be construed to limit or in any way
184 impair the department's ability to redeem tax
185 credits authorized on or before the date the
186 program authorized under this section expires or
187 a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]
[135.766. An eligible small business, as
defined in Section 44 of the Internal Revenue
Code, shall be allowed a credit against the tax
otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, not
including sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an
amount equal to any amount paid by the eligible
small business to the United States Small
Business Administration as a guaranty fee
pursuant to obtaining Small Business
Administration guaranteed financing and to
programs administered by the United States
Department of Agriculture for rural development
or farm service agencies. No tax credits
provided under this section shall be authorized
on or after the thirtieth day following the
effective date of this act. The provisions of
this subsection shall not be construed to limit
or in any way impair the department's ability to
issue tax credits authorized prior to the
thirtieth day following the effective date of
this act, or a taxpayer's ability to redeem such
tax credits.]
197

[135.980. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "NAICS", the classification provided
by the most recent edition of the North American
Industry Classification System as prepared by
the Executive Office of the President, Office of
Management and Budget;
(2) "Public financial incentive", any
economic or financial incentive offered
including:
(a) Any tax reduction, credit,
forgiveness, abatement, subsidy, or other tax-
relieving measure;
(b) Any tax increment financing or similar
financial arrangement;
(c) Any monetary or nonmonetary benefit
related to any bond, loan, or similar financial
arrangement;
(d) Any reduction, credit, forgiveness,
abatement, subsidy, or other relief related to
any bond, loan, or similar financial
arrangement; and
(e) The ability to form, own, direct, or
receive any economic or financial benefit from
any special taxation district.
2. No city not within a county shall by
ballot measure impose any restriction on any
public financial incentive authorized by statute
for a business with a NAICS code of 212111.
3. The provisions of this section shall
expire on December 31, 2017.]
[136.450. 1. There is hereby established
the "Study Commission on State Tax Policy" which
shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The members of the joint committee on
tax policy established in section 21.810;
(2) The state treasurer;
(3) The state budget director;
(4) The director of the department of
revenue, but only if such person has been
appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate in accordance with Article
IV, Section 51 of the Constitution of Missouri;
(5) Three individuals representing the
needs and concerns of individual taxpayers in
198

this state, one of whom shall be appointed by
the lieutenant governor, one of whom shall be
appointed by the minority floor leader of the
house of representatives, and one of whom shall
be appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate;
(6) A certified public accountant, who
shall be appointed by the lieutenant governor in
consultation with the Missouri Society of
Certified Public Accountants;
(7) An independent tax practitioner, who
shall be appointed by the lieutenant governor in
consultation with the Missouri Society of
Accountants;
(8) An individual with experience
operating a business with a headquarters in this
state and fewer than fifty employees, who shall
be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(9) An individual with experience
operating a business with a headquarters in this
state and at least fifty employees, who shall be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(10) Two individuals with significant
experience in state and local taxation, public
or private budgeting and finance, or public
services delivery, one of whom shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives in consultation with the
Missouri Association of Counties and the other
appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate in consultation with Missouri Municipal
League; and
(11) A member of the Missouri Bar with
knowledge of the tax laws of this state,
including tax administration and compliance, who
shall be appointed by the board of governors of
the Missouri Bar.
2. Any vacancy on the commission shall be
filled in the same manner as the original
appointment. Any appointed member of the
commission shall serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. Commission members shall
serve without compensation but shall be entitled
to reimbursement for actual and necessary
199

expenses incurred in the performance of their
official duties.
3. The commission shall meet in the
capitol building within ten days after its
creation and organize by selecting a chair and
vice chair from its members. After its
organization, the commission shall adopt an
agenda establishing at least five hearing
dates. The hearings shall be held in different
geographic regions of the state and open to the
public. Additional meetings may be scheduled
and held as often as the chair deems advisable.
A majority of the members shall constitute a
quorum.
4. It shall be the duty of the commission:
(1) To make a complete, detailed review
and study of the tax structure of the state and
its political subdivisions, including tax
sources, the impact of taxes, collection
procedures, administrative regulations, and all
other factors pertinent to the fiscal operation
of the state;
(2) To identify the strengths and
weaknesses of state tax laws, and develop a
broad range of improvements that could be made
to modernize the tax system, maximize economic
development and growth, and maintain necessary
government services at an appropriate level;
(3) To investigate measures and methods to
simplify state tax law, improve tax compliance,
and reduce administrative costs; and
(4) To examine and study any other aspects
of state and local government which may be
related to the tax structure of the state.
5. In order to carry out its duties and
responsibilities under this section, the
commission shall have the authority to:
(1) Consult with public and private
universities and academies, public and private
100 organizations, and private citizens in the
101 performance of its duties;
102 (2) Within the limits of appropriations
103 made for such purpose, employ consultants or
104 others to assist the commission in its work, or
105 contract with public and private entities for
200

106 analysis and study of current or proposed
107 changes to state and local tax policy; and
108 (3) Make reasonable requests for staff
109 assistance from the research and appropriations
110 staffs of the house of representatives and
111 senate and the committee on legislative
112 research, as well as the office of
113 administration and the department of revenue.
114 6. All state agencies and political
115 subdivisions of the state responsible for the
116 administration of tax policies shall cooperate
117 with and assist the commission in the
118 performance of its duties and shall make
119 available all books, records, and information
120 requested, except such books, records, and
121 information as are by law declared confidential
122 in nature, including individually identifiable
123 information regarding a specific taxpayer.
124 7. The commission may issue interim
125 reports as it deems fit, but it shall provide
126 the governor and the general assembly with
127 reports of its findings and recommendations for
128 legal and administrative changes, along with any
129 proposed legislation the commission recommends
130 for adoption by the general assembly. A
131 preliminary report shall be due by December 31,
132 2016. A final report shall be due December 31,
133 2017.
134 8. The commission shall cease all
135 activities by January 1, 2018. This section
136 shall expire August 28, 2018.]
[142.1000. 1. There is hereby created
within the department of revenue the "Electric
Vehicle Task Force" to consist of the following
members:
(1) The director of the department of
revenue, or his or her designee, who shall serve
as chair;
(2) The chairman of the public service
commission, or his or her designee, who shall
serve as vice chair;
(3) The director of the department of
transportation, or his or her designee;
(4) One member of the senate committee
with jurisdiction over transportation matters,
201

to be appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate;
(5) One member of the house of
representatives committee with jurisdiction over
transportation matters, to be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(6) One member of the senate committee
with jurisdiction over transportation matters,
to be appointed by the minority floor leader of
the senate;
(7) One member of the house of
representatives committee with jurisdiction over
transportation matters, to be appointed by the
minority floor leader of the house of
representatives;
(8) One representative of the trucking or
heavy vehicle industry, to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(9) One representative of electric vehicle
manufacturers or dealers, to be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(10) One representative of conventional
motor vehicle manufacturers or dealers, to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(11) One representative of the petroleum
industry or convenience stores, to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(12) One representative of electric
vehicle charging station manufacturers or
operators, to be appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate; and
(13) One representative of electric
utilities, to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.
2. The task force shall analyze the
following in the context of transportation
funding, and make recommendations as to any
actions the state should take to fund
transportation infrastructure in anticipation of
more widespread adoption of electric vehicles:
(1) Removal or mitigation of barriers to
electric vehicle charging, including strategies,
such as time-of-use rates, to reduce operating
costs for current and future electric vehicle
owners without shifting costs to electric
202

ratepayers who do not own or operate electric
vehicles;
(2) Strategies for managing the impact of
electric vehicles on, and services provided for
electric vehicles by, the electricity
transmission and distribution system;
(3) Electric system benefits and costs of
electric vehicle charging, electric utility
planning for electric vehicle charging, and rate
design for electric vehicle charging;
(4) The appropriate role of electric
utilities with regard to the deployment and
operation of electric vehicle charging systems;
(5) How and on what terms, including
quantity, pricing, and time of day, charging
stations owned or operated by entities other
than electric utilities will obtain electricity
to provide to electric vehicles;
(6) What safety standards should apply to
the charging of electric vehicles;
(7) The recommended scope of the
jurisdiction of the public service commission,
the department of revenue, and other state
agencies over charging stations owned or
operated by entities other than electric
utilities;
(8) Whether charging stations owned or
operated by entities other than electric
utilities will be free to set the rates or
prices at which they provide electricity to
electric vehicles, and any other issues relevant
to the appropriate oversight of the rates and
prices charged by such stations, including
transparency to the consumer of those rates and
prices; and
(9) The recommended billing and complaint
procedures for charging stations;
(10) Options to address how electric
vehicle users pay toward the cost of maintaining
100 the state's transportation infrastructure,
101 including methods to assess the impact of
102 electric vehicles on that infrastructure and how
103 to calculate a charge based on that impact, the
104 potential assessment of a charge to electric
105 vehicles as a rate per kilowatt hour delivered
106 to an electric vehicle, varying such per-
203

107 kilowatt-hour charge by size and type of
108 electric vehicle, and phasing in such per-
109 kilowatt-hour charge;
110 (11) The accuracy of electric metering and
111 submetering technology for charging electric
112 vehicles;
113 (12) Strategies to encourage electric
114 vehicle usage without shifting costs to electric
115 ratepayers who do not own or charge electric
116 vehicles; and
117 (13) Any other issues the task force
118 considers relevant.
119 3. The department of revenue shall provide
120 such research, clerical, technical, and other
121 services as the task force may require in the
122 performance of its duties.
123 4. The task force may hold public meetings
124 at which it may invite testimony from experts,
125 or it may solicit information from any party it
126 deems may have information relevant to its
127 duties under this section.
128 5. No later than December 31, 2022, the
129 task force shall provide to the general assembly
130 and the governor a written report detailing its
131 findings and recommendations, including
132 identifying any recommendations that may require
133 enabling legislation.
134 6. Members shall serve on the task force
135 without compensation, but may, at the discretion
136 of the director of the department of revenue, be
137 reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
138 incurred in the performance of their official
139 duties as members of the task force.
140 7. The task force shall expire on December
141 31, 2022.]
[143.173. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "County average wage", the average
wages in each county as determined by the
department of economic development for the most
recently completed full calendar year. However,
if the computed county average wage is above the
statewide average wage, the statewide average
wage shall be deemed the county average wage for
such county for the purpose of this section;
204

(2) "Deduction", an amount subtracted from
the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income to
determine Missouri taxable income, or federal
taxable income in the case of a corporation, for
the tax year in which such deduction is claimed;
(3) "Full-time employee", a position in
which the employee is considered full-time by
the taxpayer and is required to work an average
of at least thirty-five hours per week for a
fifty-two week period;
(4) "New job", the number of full-time
employees employed by the small business in
Missouri on the qualifying date that exceeds the
number of full-time employees employed by the
small business in Missouri on the same date of
the immediately preceding taxable year;
(5) "Qualifying date", any date during the
tax year as chosen by the small business;
(6) "Small business", any small business,
including any sole proprietorship, partnership,
S-corporation, C-corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, or other
business entity, consisting of fewer than fifty
full- or part-time employees;
(7) "Taxpayer", any small business subject
to the income tax imposed in this chapter,
including any sole proprietorship, partnership,
S-corporation, C-corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, or other
business entity.
2. In addition to all deductions listed in
this chapter, for all taxable years beginning on
or after January 1, 2011, and ending on or
before December 31, 2014, a taxpayer shall be
allowed a deduction for each new job created by
the small business in the taxable year. Tax
deductions allowed to any partnership, limited
liability company, S-corporation, or other pass-
through entity may be allocated to the partners,
members, or shareholders of such entity for
their direct use in accordance with the
provisions of any agreement among such partners,
members, or shareholders. The deduction amount
shall be as follows:
205

(1) Ten thousand dollars for each new job
created with an annual salary of at least the
county average wage; or
(2) Twenty thousand dollars for each new
job created with an annual salary of at least
the county average wage if the small business
offers health insurance and pays at least fifty
percent of such insurance premiums.
3. The department of revenue shall
establish the procedure by which the deduction
provided in this section may be claimed, and may
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly under chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2011, shall be invalid
and void.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
three years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
three years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
206

[143.732. 1. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, no taxpayer
who has an individual tax liability under
chapter 143 for the tax year beginning January
1, 2018, and ending December 31, 2018, shall be
assessed any penalty before December 31, 2019,
for a delayed payment or underpayment on such
liability, provided that such taxpayer timely
files his or her individual income tax return
for such tax year and participates, in good
faith, in any payment plan authorized by the
department of revenue with respect to such
liability. Such taxpayer may nonetheless be
assessed interest on such liability under the
provisions of section 143.731 and any other
relevant provision of law, provided that no
interest on such liability shall be assessed
before May 15, 2019. If such taxpayer paid
interest or penalty on such liability under the
provisions of section 143.731 and any other
relevant provision of law before May 15, 2019,
he or she shall be entitled to a refund of such
interest or penalty, which shall be due no later
than December 31, 2019.
2. The department of revenue is authorized
to adopt such rules and regulations as are
reasonable and necessary to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all
of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant
to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after July 11, 2019, shall
be invalid and void.
3. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
207

(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December 31, 2019; and
(2) This section shall terminate on
December thirty-first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which
the program authorized under this section is
sunset.]
[143.1008. 1. In each taxable year
beginning on or after January 1, 2008, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the after-school retreat reading and
assessment grant program fund. The contribution
designation authorized by this section shall be
clearly and unambiguously printed on the first
page of each income tax return form provided by
this state. If any individual or corporation
that is not entitled to a tax refund in an
amount sufficient to make a designation under
this section wishes to make a contribution to
the after-school retreat reading and assessment
grant program fund, such individual or
corporation may, by separate check, draft, or
other negotiable instrument, send in with the
payment of taxes, or may send in separately,
that amount, clearly designated for the after-
school retreat reading and assessment grant
program fund, the individual or corporation
wishes to contribute. The department of revenue
shall deposit such amount to the after-school
retreat reading and assessment grant program
fund as provided in subsection 2 of this section.
2. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the after-school
retreat reading and assessment grant program
fund. The fund shall be administered by the
department of elementary and secondary education
208

with moneys in the fund distributed as provided
under section 167.680.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
the corporations under this section, less an
amount sufficient to cover the cost of
collection, handling, and administration by the
department of revenue during fiscal year 2008,
to the after-school retreat reading and
assessment grant program fund.
4. A contribution designated under this
section shall only be deposited in the after-
school retreat reading and assessment grant
program fund after all other claims against the
refund from which such contribution is to be
made have been satisfied.
5. Moneys deposited in the after-school
retreat reading and assessment grant program
fund shall be distributed by the department of
elementary and secondary education in accordance
with the provisions of this section and section
167.680.
6. The state treasurer shall invest moneys
in the fund in the same manner as other funds
are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on
such investments shall be credited to the fund.
7. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the
Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset six years after August 28,
2007, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the
effective date of the reauthorization of this
section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
December thirty-first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which
the program authorized under this section is
sunset.]
[143.1009. 1. In each taxable year
beginning on or after January 1, 2008, each
209

individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the breast cancer awareness trust fund,
hereinafter referred to as the trust fund. If
any individual or corporation that is not
entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient
to make a designation under this section wishes
to make a contribution to the trust fund, such
individual or corporation may, by separate
check, draft, or other negotiable instrument,
send in with the payment of taxes, or may send
in separately, that amount, clearly designated
for the breast cancer awareness trust fund, the
individual or corporation wishes to contribute.
The department of revenue shall deposit such
amount to the trust fund as provided in
subsections 2 and 3 of this section. All moneys
credited to the trust fund shall be considered
nonstate funds under the provisions of Article
IV, Section 15 of the Missouri Constitution.
2. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the trust fund.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
the corporations under this section, less an
amount sufficient to cover the costs of
collection and handling by the department of
revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to
the trust fund.
4. A contribution designated under this
section shall only be deposited in the trust
fund after all other claims against the refund
from which such contribution is to be made have
been satisfied.
5. All moneys transferred to the trust
fund shall be distributed by the director of
revenue at times the director deems appropriate
to the department of health and senior
services. Such funds shall be used solely for
210

the purpose of providing breast cancer
services. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the
trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not
be transferred to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
6. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Breast Cancer Awareness Trust
Fund", which shall consist of money collected
under this section. The state treasurer shall
be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset six years after August 28,
2008, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the
effective date of the reauthorization of this
section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
December thirty-first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which
the program authorized under this section is
sunset.]
[143.1013. 1. For all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2011, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the American Red Cross trust fund. If any
individual or corporation that is not entitled
to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make
a designation under this section wishes to make
a contribution to the fund, such individual or
corporation may, by separate check, draft, or
211

other negotiable instrument, send in with the
payment of taxes, or may send in separately,
that amount the individual or corporation wishes
to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly
designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "American Red Cross Trust Fund",
which shall consist of money collected under
this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in
the fund shall be used solely for the
administration of this section. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at
the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the
same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments
shall be credited to the fund. All moneys
credited to the trust fund shall be considered
nonstate funds under Section 15, Article IV,
Constitution of Missouri. The treasurer shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the fund at
times the treasurer deems appropriate to the
American Red Cross.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director
of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations
under this section, less an amount sufficient to
cover the costs of collection and handling by
the department of revenue, to the state treasury
for deposit to the fund. A contribution
designated under this section shall only be
deposited in the fund after all other claims
against the refund from which such contribution
is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
212

(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
six years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1014. 1. For all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2011, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the puppy protection trust fund. If any
individual or corporation that is not entitled
to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make
a designation under this section wishes to make
a contribution to the fund, such individual or
corporation may, by separate check, draft, or
other negotiable instrument, send in with the
payment of taxes, or may send in separately,
that amount the individual or corporation wishes
to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly
designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Puppy Protection Trust Fund",
which shall consist of money collected under
this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in
the fund shall be used solely for the state
department of agriculture's administration of
213

section 273.345. Notwithstanding the provisions
of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium
shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys
earned on such investments shall be credited to
the fund. All moneys credited to the trust fund
shall be considered nonstate funds under Section
15, Article IV, Constitution of Missouri. The
treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited
in the fund at times the treasurer deems
appropriate to the department of agriculture.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director
of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations
under this section, less an amount sufficient to
cover the costs of collection and handling by
the department of revenue, to the state treasury
for deposit to the fund. A contribution
designated under this section shall only be
deposited in the fund after all other claims
against the refund from which such contribution
is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
six years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
214

[143.1017. 1. For all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2011, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the developmental disabilities waiting list
equity trust fund. If any individual or
corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund
in an amount sufficient to make a designation
under this section wishes to make a contribution
to the fund, such individual or corporation may,
by separate check, draft, or other negotiable
instrument, send in with the payment of taxes,
or may send in separately, that amount the
individual or corporation wishes to contribute.
Such amounts shall be clearly designated for the
fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Developmental Disabilities Waiting
List Equity Trust Fund", which shall consist of
money collected under this section. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements. The
fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, money in the fund shall be used
solely for the administration of this section
and for providing community services and support
to people with developmental disabilities and
such person's families who are on the
developmental disabilities waiting list and are
eligible for but not receiving services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the
fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert
to the credit of the general revenue fund. The
state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund
in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund. All
moneys credited to the trust fund shall be
considered nonstate funds under Section 15,
215

Article IV, Constitution of Missouri. The
treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited
in the fund at times the treasurer deems
appropriate to the department of mental health.
The moneys in the developmental disabilities
waiting list equity trust fund established in
this subsection shall not be appropriated in
lieu of general state revenues.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director
of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations
under this section, less an amount sufficient to
cover the costs of collection and handling by
the department of revenue, to the state treasury
for deposit to the fund. A contribution
designated under this section shall only be
deposited in the fund after all other claims
against the refund from which such contribution
is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
six years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1027. 1. For all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2014, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate
that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
216

dollar on a single return, and two dollars or
any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited
to the Missouri National Guard Foundation fund.
If any individual or corporation that is not
entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient
to make a designation under this section wishes
to make a contribution to the fund, such
individual or corporation may, by separate
check, draft, or other negotiable instrument,
send in with the payment of taxes, or may send
in separately, that amount the individual or
corporation wishes to contribute. Such amounts
shall be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Missouri National Guard Foundation
Fund", which shall consist of money collected
under this section. The state treasurer shall
be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in
the fund shall be used solely for the
administration of this section. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at
the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the
same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments
shall be credited to the fund. The treasurer
shall distribute all moneys deposited in the
fund at least monthly to the Missouri National
Guard Foundation.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit
at least monthly all contributions designated by
individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director
of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations
under this section, less an amount sufficient to
cover the costs of collection and handling by
the department of revenue, to the state treasury
for deposit to the fund. A contribution
designated under this section shall only be
217

deposited in the fund after all other claims
against the refund from which such contribution
is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
six years after August 28, 2014, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first
twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1100. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Bring Jobs Home Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Business unit":
(a) Any trade or business; and
(b) Any line of business or function unit
which is part of any trade or business;
(2) "Deduction":
(a) For individuals, an amount subtracted
from the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross
income to determine Missouri taxable income for
the tax year in which such deduction is claimed;
and
(b) For corporations, an amount subtracted
from the taxpayer's federal taxable income to
determine Missouri taxable income for the tax
year in which such deduction is claimed;
(3) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(4) "Eligible expenses":
(a) Any amount for which a deduction is
allowed to the taxpayer under Section 162 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
218

(b) Permit and license fees, lease
brokerage fees, equipment installation costs,
and other similar expenses;
(5) "Eligible insourcing expenses":
(a) Eligible expenses paid or incurred by
the taxpayer in connection with the elimination
of any business unit of the taxpayer or of any
member of any expanded affiliated group in which
the taxpayer is also a member located outside
the state of Missouri; and
(b) Eligible expenses paid or incurred by
the taxpayer in connection with the
establishment of any business unit of the
taxpayer or of any member of any expanded
affiliated group in which the taxpayer is also a
member located within the state of Missouri if
such establishment constitutes the relocation of
the business unit so eliminated.
For purposes of this subdivision, expenses shall
be eligible if such elimination of the business
unit in another state or country occurs in a
different taxable year from the establishment of
the business unit in Missouri;
(6) "Expanded affiliated group", an
affiliated group as defined under Section
1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, except to be determined without regard
to Section 1504(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and determined by
substituting "at least eighty percent" with
"more than fifty percent" each place the phrase
appears under Section 1504(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. A partnership
or any other entity other than a corporation
shall be treated as a member of an expanded
affiliated group if such entity is controlled by
members of such group including any entity
treated as a member of such group by reason of
this subdivision;
(7) "Full-time equivalent employee", a
number of employees equal to the number
determined by dividing the total number of hours
of service for which wages were paid by the
employer to employees during the taxable year,
by two thousand eighty;
219

(8) "Insourcing plan", a written plan to
carry out the establishment of a business unit
in Missouri;
(9) "Taxpayer", any individual, firm,
partner in a firm, corporation, partnership,
shareholder in an S corporation, or member of a
limited liability company subject to the income
tax imposed under this chapter, excluding
withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191
to 143.265.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2016, a taxpayer shall be
allowed a deduction equal to fifty percent of
the taxpayer's eligible insourcing expenses in
the taxable year chosen under subsection 5 of
this section. The amount of the deduction
claimed shall not exceed the amount of:
(1) For individuals, the taxpayer's
Missouri adjusted gross income for the taxable
year the deduction is claimed; and
(2) For corporations, the taxpayer's
Missouri taxable income for the taxable year the
deduction is claimed.
However, any amount of the deduction that cannot
be claimed in the taxable year may be carried
over to the next five succeeding taxable years
until the full deduction has been claimed.
4. No deduction shall be allowed under
this section until the department determines
that the number of full-time equivalent
100 employees of the taxpayer in the taxable year
101 the deduction is claimed exceeds the number of
102 full-time equivalent employees of the taxpayer
103 in the taxable year prior to the taxpayer
104 incurring any eligible insourcing expenses.
105 5. Only eligible insourcing expenses that
106 occur in the taxable year such expenses are paid
107 or incurred and:
108 (1) The taxpayer's insourcing plan is
109 completed; or
110 (2) The first taxable year after the
111 taxpayer's insourcing plan is completed;
112 shall be used to calculate the deduction allowed
113 under this section.
114 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of
115 law to the contrary, no deduction shall be
220

116 allowed for any expenses incurred due to
117 dissolving a business unit in Missouri and
118 relocating such business unit to another state.
119 7. The total amount of deductions
120 authorized under this section shall not exceed
121 five million dollars in any taxable year. In
122 the event that more than five million dollars in
123 deductions are claimed in a taxable year,
124 deductions shall be issued on a first-come,
125 first-served filing basis.
126 8. A taxpayer who receives a deduction
127 under the provisions of this section shall be
128 ineligible to receive incentives under the
129 provisions of any other state tax deduction
130 program for the same expenses incurred.
131 9. Any taxpayer allowed a deduction under
132 this section who, within ten years of receiving
133 such deduction, eliminates the business unit for
134 which the deduction was allowed shall repay the
135 amount of tax savings realized from the
136 deduction to the state, prorated by the number
137 of years the business unit was in this state.
138 10. The department of economic development
139 and the department of revenue shall promulgate
140 rules to implement the provisions of this
141 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
142 term is defined in section 536.010, that is
143 created under the authority delegated in this
144 section shall become effective only if it
145 complies with and is subject to all of the
146 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
147 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
148 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
149 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
150 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
151 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
152 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
153 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
154 adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid
155 and void.
156 11. Under section 23.253:
157 (1) The provisions of the new program
158 authorized under this section shall
159 automatically sunset six years after August 28,
160 2016, unless reauthorized by an act of the
161 general assembly; and
221

162 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
163 program authorized under this section shall
164 automatically sunset twelve years after the
165 effective date of the reauthorization of this
166 section; and
167 (3) This section shall terminate on
168 September first of the calendar year immediately
169 following the calendar year in which the program
170 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[161.825. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as "Bryce's Law".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Autism spectrum disorder", pervasive
developmental disorder; Asperger syndrome;
childhood disintegrative disorder; Rett
syndrome; and autism;
(2) "Contribution", a donation of cash,
stock, bonds, or other marketable securities, or
real property;
(3) "Department", the department of
elementary and secondary education;
(4) "Director", the commissioner of
education;
(5) "Dyslexia therapy", an appropriate
specialized dyslexia instructional program that
is systematic, multisensory, and research-based
offered in a small group setting to teach
students the components of reading instruction
including but not limited to phonemic awareness,
graphophonemic knowledge, morphology, semantics,
syntax, and pragmatics, instruction on
linguistic proficiency and fluency with patterns
of language so that words and sentences are
carriers of meaning, and strategies that
students use for decoding, encoding, word
recognition, fluency and comprehension delivered
by qualified personnel;
(6) "Educational scholarships", grants to
students or children to cover all or part of the
tuition and fees at a qualified nonpublic
school, a qualified public school, or a
qualified service provider, including
transportation;
222

(7) "Eligible child", any child from birth
to age five living in Missouri who has an
individualized family services program under the
first steps program, sections 160.900 to
160.933, and whose parent or guardian has
completed the complaint procedure under the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,
Part C, and has received an unsatisfactory
response; or any child from birth to age five
who has been evaluated for qualifying needs as
defined in this section by a person qualified to
perform evaluations under the first steps
program and has been determined to have a
qualifying need but who falls below the
threshold for eligibility by no less than twenty-
five percent;
(8) "Eligible student", any elementary or
secondary student who attended public school in
Missouri the preceding semester, or who will be
attending school in Missouri for the first time,
who has an individualized education program
based on a qualifying needs condition or who has
a medical or clinical diagnosis by a qualified
health professional of a qualifying needs
condition which in the case of dyslexia, may be
based on the C-TOPP assessment as an initial
indicator of dyslexia and confirmed by further
medical or clinical diagnosis;
(9) "Parent", includes a guardian,
custodian, or other person with authority to act
on behalf of the student or child;
(10) "Program", the program established in
this section;
(11) "Qualified health professional", a
person licensed under chapter 334 or 337 who
possesses credentials as described in rules
promulgated jointly by the department of
elementary and secondary education and the
department of mental health to make a diagnosis
of a student's qualifying needs for this program;
(12) "Qualified school", either an
accredited public elementary or secondary school
in a district that is accredited without
provision outside of the district in which a
student resides or an accredited nonpublic
elementary or secondary school in Missouri that
223

complies with all of the requirements of the
program and complies with all state laws that
apply to nonpublic schools regarding criminal
background checks for employees and excludes
from employment any person not permitted by
state law to work in a nonpublic school;
(13) "Qualified service provider", a
person or agency authorized by the department to
provide services under the first steps program,
sections 160.900 to 160.933, and in the case of
a provider offering dyslexia therapy, the term
also includes a person with national
certification as an academic language therapist;
(14) "Qualifying needs", an autism
spectrum disorder, Down Syndrome, Angelman
Syndrome, cerebral palsy, or dyslexia;
(15) "Scholarship granting organization",
a charitable organization that:
100 (a) Is exempt from federal income tax;
101 (b) Complies with the requirements of this
102 program;
103 (c) Provides education scholarships to
104 students attending qualified schools of their
105 parents' choice or to children receiving
106 services from qualified service providers; and
107 (d) Does not accept contributions on
108 behalf of any eligible student or eligible child
109 from any donor with any obligation to provide
110 any support for the eligible student or eligible
111 child.
112 3. The department of elementary and
113 secondary education shall develop a master list
114 of resources available to the parents of
115 children with an autism spectrum disorder or
116 dyslexia and shall maintain a web page for the
117 information. The department shall also actively
118 seek financial resources in the form of grants
119 and donations that may be devoted to scholarship
120 funds or to clinical trials for behavioral
121 interventions that may be undertaken by
122 qualified service providers. The department may
123 contract out or delegate these duties to a
124 nonprofit organization. Priority in referral
125 for funding shall be given to children who have
126 not yet entered elementary school.
224

127 4. The director shall determine, at least
128 annually, which organizations in this state may
129 be classified as scholarship granting
130 organizations. The director may require of an
131 organization seeking to be classified as a
132 scholarship granting organization whatever
133 information that is reasonably necessary to make
134 such a determination. The director shall
135 classify an organization as a scholarship
136 granting organization if such organization meets
137 the definition set forth in this section.
138 5. The director shall establish a
139 procedure by which a donor can determine if an
140 organization has been classified as a
141 scholarship granting organization. Scholarship
142 granting organizations shall be permitted to
143 decline a contribution from a donor.
144 6. Each scholarship granting organization
145 shall provide information to the director
146 concerning the identity of each donor making a
147 contribution to the scholarship granting
148 organization.
149 7. (1) The director shall annually make a
150 determination on the number of students in
151 Missouri with an individualized education
152 program based upon qualifying needs as defined
153 in this section. The director shall use ten
154 percent of this number to determine the maximum
155 number of students to receive scholarships from
156 a scholarship granting organization in that year
157 for students with qualifying needs who have at
158 the time of application an individualized
159 education program, plus a number calculated by
160 the director by applying the state's latest
161 available autism, cerebral palsy, Down Syndrome,
162 Angelman Syndrome, and dyslexia incidence rates
163 to the state's population of children from age
164 five to nineteen who are not enrolled in public
165 schools and taking ten percent of that number.
166 The total of these two calculations shall
167 constitute the maximum number of scholarships
168 available to students.
169 (2) The director shall also annually make
170 a determination on the number of children in
171 Missouri whose parent or guardian has enrolled
172 the child in first steps, received an
225

173 individualized family services program based on
174 qualifying needs, and filed a complaint through
175 the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,
176 Part C, and received an unsatisfactory
177 response. In addition to this number, the
178 director shall apply the latest available
179 autism, cerebral palsy, Down Syndrome, Angelman
180 Syndrome, and dyslexia incidence rates to the
181 latest available census information for children
182 from birth to age five and determine ten percent
183 of that number for the maximum number of
184 scholarships for children.
185 (3) The director shall publicly announce
186 the number of each category of scholarship
187 opportunities available each year. Once a
188 scholarship granting organization has decided to
189 provide a student or child with a scholarship,
190 it shall promptly notify the director. The
191 director shall keep a running tally of the
192 number of scholarships granted in the order in
193 which they were reported. Once the tally
194 reaches the annual limit of scholarships for
195 eligible students or children, the director
196 shall notify all of the participating
197 scholarship granting organizations that they
198 shall not issue any more scholarships and any
199 more receipts for contributions. If the
200 scholarship granting organizations have not
201 expended all of their available scholarship
202 funds in that year at the time when the limit is
203 reached, the available scholarship funds may be
204 carried over into the next year. These
205 unexpended funds shall not be counted as part of
206 the requirement in subdivision (3) of subsection
207 8 of this section for that year. Any receipt
208 for a scholarship contribution issued by a
209 scholarship granting organization before the
210 director has publicly announced the student or
211 child limit has been reached shall be valid.
212 Beginning with school year 2016-17, the director
213 may adjust the allocation of the proportion of
214 scholarships using information on unmet need and
215 use patterns from the previous school years.
216 The director shall provide notice of the change
217 to the state board of education for its approval.
226

218 8. Each scholarship granting organization
219 participating in the program shall:
220 (1) Notify the department of its intent to
221 provide educational scholarships to students
222 attending qualified schools or children
223 receiving services from qualified service
224 providers;
225 (2) Provide a department-approved receipt
226 to donors for contributions made to the
227 organization;
228 (3) Ensure that at least ninety percent of
229 its revenue from donations is spent on
230 educational scholarships, and that all revenue
231 from interest or investments is spent on
232 educational scholarships;
233 (4) Ensure that the scholarships provided
234 do not exceed an average of twenty thousand
235 dollars per eligible child or fifty thousand
236 dollars per eligible student;
237 (5) Inform the parent or guardian of the
238 student or child applying for a scholarship that
239 accepting the scholarship is tantamount to a
240 parentally placed private school student
241 pursuant to 34 CFR 300.130 and, thus, neither
242 the department nor any Missouri public school is
243 responsible to provide the student with a free
244 appropriate public education pursuant to the
245 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or
246 Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973;
247 (6) Distribute periodic scholarship
248 payments as checks made out to a student's or
249 child's parent and mailed to the qualified
250 school where the student is enrolled or
251 qualified service provider used by the child.
252 The parent or guardian shall endorse the check
253 before it can be deposited;
254 (7) Cooperate with the department to
255 conduct criminal background checks on all of its
256 employees and board members and exclude from
257 employment or governance any individual who
258 might reasonably pose a risk to the appropriate
259 use of contributed funds;
260 (8) Ensure that scholarships are portable
261 during the school year and can be used at any
262 qualified school that accepts the eligible
263 student or at a different qualified service
227

264 provider for an eligible child according to a
265 parent's wishes. If a student moves to a new
266 qualified school during a school year or to a
267 different qualified service provider for an
268 eligible child, the scholarship amount may be
269 prorated;
270 (9) Demonstrate its financial
271 accountability by:
272 (a) Submitting a financial information
273 report for the organization that complies with
274 uniform financial accounting standards
275 established by the department and conducted by a
276 certified public accountant; and
277 (b) Having the auditor certify that the
278 report is free of material misstatements;
279 (10) Demonstrate its financial viability,
280 if the organization is to receive donations of
281 fifty thousand dollars or more during the school
282 year, by filing with the department before the
283 start of the school year:
284 (a) A surety bond payable to the state in
285 an amount equal to the aggregate amount of
286 contributions expected to be received during the
287 school year; or
288 (b) Financial information that
289 demonstrates the financial viability of the
290 scholarship granting organization.
291 9. Each scholarship granting organization
292 shall ensure that each participating school or
293 service provider that accepts its scholarship
294 students or children shall:
295 (1) Comply with all health and safety laws
296 or codes that apply to nonpublic schools or
297 service providers;
298 (2) Hold a valid occupancy permit if
299 required by its municipality;
300 (3) Certify that it will comply with 42
301 U.S.C. Section 1981, as amended;
302 (4) Provide academic accountability to
303 parents of the students or children in the
304 program by regularly reporting to the parent on
305 the student's or child's progress;
306 (5) Certify that in providing any
307 educational services or behavior strategies to a
308 scholarship recipient with a medical or clinical
309 diagnosis of or an individualized education
228

310 program based upon autism spectrum disorder it
311 will:
312 (a) Adhere to the best practices
313 recommendations of the Missouri Autism
314 Guidelines Initiative or document why it is
315 varying from the guidelines;
316 (b) Not use any evidence-based
317 interventions that have been found ineffective
318 by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
319 Services as described in the Missouri Autism
320 Guidelines Initiative guide to evidence-based
321 interventions; and
322 (c) Provide documentation in the student's
323 or child's record of the rationale for the use
324 of any intervention that is categorized as
325 unestablished, insufficient evidence, or level 3
326 by the Missouri Autism Guidelines Initiative
327 guide to evidence-based interventions; and
328 (6) Certify that in providing any
329 educational services or behavior strategies to a
330 scholarship recipient with a medical or clinical
331 diagnosis of, or an individualized family
332 services program based upon Down Syndrome,
333 Angelman Syndrome, cerebral palsy, or dyslexia,
334 it will use student, teacher, teaching, and
335 school influences that rank in the zone of
336 desired effects in the meta-analysis of John
337 Hattie, or equivalent analyses as determined by
338 the department, or document why it is using a
339 method that has not been determined by analysis
340 to rank in the zone of desired effects.
341 10. Scholarship granting organizations
342 shall not provide educational scholarships for
343 students to attend any school or children to
344 receive services from any qualified service
345 provider with paid staff or board members who
346 are relatives within the first degree of
347 consanguinity or affinity.
348 11. A scholarship granting organization
349 shall publicly report to the department, by June
350 first of each year, the following information
351 prepared by a certified public accountant
352 regarding its grants in the previous calendar
353 year:
354 (1) The name and address of the
355 scholarship granting organization;
229

356 (2) The total number and total dollar
357 amount of contributions received during the
358 previous calendar year; and
359 (3) The total number and total dollar
360 amount of educational scholarships awarded
361 during the previous calendar year, including the
362 category of each scholarship, and the total
363 number and total dollar amount of educational
364 scholarships awarded during the previous year to
365 students eligible for free and reduced lunch.
366 12. The department shall adopt rules and
367 regulations consistent with this section as
368 necessary to implement the program.
369 13. The department shall provide a
370 standardized format for a receipt to be issued
371 by a scholarship granting organization to a
372 donor to indicate the value of a contribution
373 received.
374 14. The department shall provide a
375 standardized format for scholarship granting
376 organizations to report the information in this
377 section.
378 15. The department may conduct either a
379 financial review or audit of a scholarship
380 granting organization.
381 16. If the department believes that a
382 scholarship granting organization has
383 intentionally and substantially failed to comply
384 with the requirements of this section, the
385 department may hold a hearing before the
386 director or the director's designee to bar a
387 scholarship granting organization from
388 participating in the program. The director or
389 the director's designee shall issue a decision
390 within thirty days. A scholarship granting
391 organization may appeal the director's decision
392 to the administrative hearing commission for a
393 hearing in accordance with the provisions of
394 chapter 621.
395 17. If the scholarship granting
396 organization is barred from participating in the
397 program, the department shall notify affected
398 scholarship students or children and their
399 parents of this decision within fifteen days.
400 18. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
401 term is defined in section 536.010, that is
230

402 created under the authority delegated in this
403 section shall become effective only if it
404 complies with and is subject to all of the
405 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
406 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
407 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
408 with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
409 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
410 to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
411 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
412 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
413 adopted after August 28, 2013, shall be invalid
414 and void.
415 19. The department shall conduct a study
416 of the program with funds other than state
417 funds. The department may contract with one or
418 more qualified researchers who have previous
419 experience evaluating similar programs. The
420 department may accept grants to assist in
421 funding this study.
422 20. The study shall assess:
423 (1) The level of participating students'
424 and children's satisfaction with the program in
425 a manner suitable to the student or child;
426 (2) The level of parental satisfaction
427 with the program;
428 (3) The percentage of participating
429 students who were bullied or harassed because of
430 their special needs status at their resident
431 school district compared to the percentage so
432 bullied or harassed at their qualified school;
433 (4) The percentage of participating
434 students who exhibited behavioral problems at
435 their resident school district compared to the
436 percentage exhibiting behavioral problems at
437 their qualified school;
438 (5) The class size experienced by
439 participating students at their resident school
440 district and at their qualified school; and
441 (6) The fiscal impact to the state and
442 resident school districts of the program.
443 21. The study shall be completed using
444 appropriate analytical and behavioral sciences
445 methodologies to ensure public confidence in the
446 study.
231

447 22. The department shall provide the
448 general assembly with a final copy of the
449 evaluation of the program by December 31, 2016.
450 23. The public and nonpublic participating
451 schools and service providers from which
452 students transfer to participate in the program
453 shall cooperate with the research effort by
454 providing student or child assessment instrument
455 scores and any other data necessary to complete
456 this study.
457 24. The general assembly may require
458 periodic updates on the status of the study from
459 the department. The individuals completing the
460 study shall make their data and methodology
461 available for public review while complying with
462 the requirements of the Family Educational
463 Rights and Privacy Act, as amended.
464 25. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
465 sunset act:
466 (1) The provisions of the new program
467 authorized under this section shall sunset
468 automatically on December 31, 2019, unless
469 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
470 and
471 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
472 program authorized under this section shall
473 sunset automatically on December 31, 2031; and
474 (3) This section shall terminate on
475 December thirty-first of the calendar year
476 immediately following the calendar year in which
477 the program authorized under this section is
478 sunset.]
[161.1055. 1. Subject to appropriations,
the department of elementary and secondary
education shall establish the "Trauma-Informed
Schools Pilot Program".
2. Under the trauma-informed schools pilot
program, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall choose five schools to
receive intensive training on the trauma-
informed approach.
3. The five schools chosen for the pilot
program shall be located in the following areas:
(1) One public school located in a
metropolitan school district;
232

(2) One public school located in a home
rule city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(3) One public school located in a school
district that has most or all of its land area
located in a county with a charter form of
government and with more than nine hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants;
(4) One public school located in a school
district that has most or all of its land area
located in a county with a charter form of
government and with more than six hundred
thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand
inhabitants; and
(5) One public school located in any one
of the following counties:
(a) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than forty-one thousand but fewer than
forty-five thousand inhabitants;
(b) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than six thousand but fewer than seven
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the
fourth classification with more than eight
hundred but fewer than nine hundred inhabitants
as the county seat;
(c) A county of the third classification
with a township form of government and with more
than thirty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-
five thousand inhabitants;
(d) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than fourteen thousand but fewer than
sixteen thousand inhabitants and with a city of
the third classification with more than five
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
as the county seat;
(e) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city of
the fourth classification with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand seven
hundred inhabitants as the county seat;
233

(f) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city of
the third classification with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(g) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than fourteen thousand but fewer than
sixteen thousand inhabitants and with a city of
the fourth classification with more than one
thousand nine hundred but fewer than two
thousand one hundred inhabitants as the county
seat;
(h) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than thirty-seven thousand but fewer than
forty-one thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the fourth classification with more than
eight hundred but fewer than nine hundred
inhabitants as the county seat;
(i) A county of the third classification
with a township form of government and with more
than twenty-eight thousand but fewer than thirty-
one thousand inhabitants; or
(j) A county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than twelve thousand but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a city of
the fourth classification with more than five
hundred but fewer than five hundred fifty
inhabitants as the county seat.
4. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall:
(1) Train the teachers and administrators
of the five schools chosen for the pilot program
regarding the trauma-informed approach and how
to become trauma-informed schools;
(2) Provide the five schools with funds to
implement the trauma-informed approach; and
100 (3) Closely monitor the progress of the
101 five schools in becoming trauma-informed schools
102 and provide further assistance if necessary.
103 5. The department of elementary and
104 secondary education shall terminate the trauma-
234

105 informed schools pilot program on August 28,
106 2019. Before December 31, 2019, the department
107 of elementary and secondary education shall
108 submit a report to the general assembly that
109 contains the results of the pilot program,
110 including any benefits experienced by the five
111 schools chosen for the program.
112 6. (1) There is hereby created in the
113 state treasury the "Trauma-Informed Schools
114 Pilot Program Fund". The fund shall consist of
115 any appropriations to such fund. The state
116 treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
117 accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
118 state treasurer may approve disbursements of
119 public moneys in accordance with distribution
120 requirements and procedures developed by the
121 department of elementary and secondary
122 education. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
123 and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund
124 shall be used solely for the administration of
125 this section.
126 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of
127 section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
128 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium
129 shall not revert to the credit of the general
130 revenue fund.
131 (3) The state treasurer shall invest
132 moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
133 funds are invested. Any interest and moneys
134 earned on such investments shall be credited to
135 the fund.
136 7. For purposes of this section, the
137 following terms mean:
138 (1) "Trauma-informed approach", an
139 approach that involves understanding and
140 responding to the symptoms of chronic
141 interpersonal trauma and traumatic stress across
142 the lifespan;
143 (2) "Trauma-informed school", a school
144 that:
145 (a) Realizes the widespread impact of
146 trauma and understands potential paths for
147 recovery;
148 (b) Recognizes the signs and symptoms of
149 trauma in students, teachers, and staff;
235

150 (c) Responds by fully integrating
151 knowledge about trauma into its policies,
152 procedures, and practices; and
153 (d) Seeks to actively resist
154 retraumatization.
155 8. The provisions of this section shall
156 expire December 31, 2019.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be
appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by the joint committee on
education;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(5) Two education professionals giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in
accredited school districts, appointed by the
joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
(6) Two secondary education professionals
from accredited school districts, appointed by
the joint committee on education from names
submitted by statewide education employee
organizations;
236

(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;
(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education
organization;
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;
(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) Two school counselors from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the state
technical college, appointed by the state
technical college;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
237

(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section
shall elect a chair from among the membership of
the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as
described in subsection 6 of this section.
Members of the task force shall serve without
compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any
education employee member to use personal leave
or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
100 the task force.
101 3. The task force shall hold at least
102 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
103 to receive public testimony including, but not
104 limited to, testimony from educators, local
105 school boards, parents, representatives from
106 business and industry, labor and community
107 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
108 the general public.
109 4. The department of elementary and
110 secondary education shall provide such legal,
111 research, clerical, and technical services as
112 the task force may require in the performance of
113 its duties.
114 5. The task force established under
115 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
116 course that:
117 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
118 explore various career and educational
119 opportunities by:
120 (a) Administering career surveys to
121 students and helping students use Missouri
122 Connections to determine their career interests
123 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
124 (b) Explaining the differences between
125 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
126 year colleges and noting the availability of
127 registered apprenticeship programs as
128 alternatives to college for students;
238

129 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
130 by colleges;
131 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
132 experiences offered at community colleges;
133 (e) Describing the various certificates
134 and credentials available to earn at the school
135 or other schools including, but not limited to,
136 career and technical education certificates
137 described under section 170.029 and industry-
138 recognized certificates and credentials;
139 (f) Advising students of any advanced
140 placement courses that they may take at the
141 school;
142 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
143 school for dual enrollment;
144 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
145 the Way courses offered at the school and
146 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
147 students learn valuable skills;
148 (i) Informing students of the availability
149 of funding for postsecondary education through
150 the A+ schools program described under section
151 160.545;
152 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
153 courses;
154 (k) Describing the types of skills and
155 occupations most in demand in the current job
156 market and those skills and occupations likely
157 to be in high demand in future years;
158 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
159 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
160 for advancement in various occupations;
161 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
162 available in careers involving science,
163 technology, engineering, and math;
164 (n) Advising students of the resources
165 offered by workforce or job centers;
166 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
167 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
168 required for the National Career Readiness
169 Certificate;
170 (p) Administering a practice ACT
171 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate to students;
239

174 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
175 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
176 Aptitude Battery;
177 (r) Administering a basic math test to
178 students so that they can assess their math
179 skills;
180 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
181 students so that they can assess their writing
182 skills;
183 (t) Helping each student prepare a
184 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence
185 of courses and experiences that concludes with
186 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
187 goals; and
188 (u) Explaining how to complete college
189 applications and the Free Application for
190 Federal Student Aid;
191 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
192 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
193 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
194 and creativity;
195 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
196 four-year college is not the only pathway to
197 success by describing to students at least
198 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
199 including guest visitors who represent each
200 pathway described. In exploring how these
201 pathways could be covered in the course, the
202 task force shall consider how instructors for
203 the course may be able to rely on assistance
204 from Missouri's career pathways within the
205 department of elementary and secondary education;
206 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
207 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
208 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
209 established under subsection 1 of this section
210 shall present its findings and recommendations
211 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
212 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
213 joint committee on education, and the state
214 board of education. Upon presenting the
215 findings and recommendations as described in
216 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established
the "Career Readiness Course Task Force" to
240

explore the possibility of a course covering the
topics described in this section being offered
in the public schools to students in eighth
grade or ninth grade. Task force members shall
be chosen to represent the geographic diversity
of the state. All task force members shall be
appointed before October 31, 2018. The task
force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending
elementary school, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(2) A parent of a student attending a
grade not lower than the sixth nor higher than
the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of parents and teachers;
(3) A parent of a student attending high
school, appointed by a statewide association of
parents and teachers;
(4) An elementary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(5) An education professional giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in an
accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(6) A secondary education professional
from an accredited school district, appointed by
agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education
Association, and the American Federation of
Teachers of Missouri;
(7) A career and technical education
professional who has experience serving as an
advisor to a statewide career and technical
education organization, appointed by a statewide
career and technical education organization;
(8) An education professional from an
accredited technical high school, appointed by a
241

statewide career and technical education
organization;
(9) A public school board member,
appointed by a statewide association of school
boards;
(10) A secondary school principal,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not lower than
the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade,
appointed by a statewide association of
secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(13) A school counselor from a school
giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth
grade, appointed by a statewide association of
school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor,
appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college
counselor, appointed by a statewide association
of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional,
appointed by the division of workforce
development of the department of economic
development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project
Lead the Way, appointed by the statewide Project
Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the State
Technical College of Missouri, appointed by the
State Technical College of Missouri;
(19) A representative of a public
community college, appointed by a statewide
organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-
year institution of higher education, appointed
by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force
established under subsection 1 of this section
shall elect a chair from among the membership of
242

the task force. The task force shall meet as
needed to complete its consideration of the
course described in subsection 5 of this section
and provide its findings and recommendations as
described in subsection 6 of this section.
Members of the task force shall serve without
100 compensation. No school district policy or
101 administrative action shall require any
102 education employee member to use personal leave
103 or incur a reduction in pay for participating on
104 the task force.
105 3. The task force shall hold at least
106 three public hearings to provide an opportunity
107 to receive public testimony including, but not
108 limited to, testimony from educators, local
109 school boards, parents, representatives from
110 business and industry, labor and community
111 leaders, members of the general assembly, and
112 the general public.
113 4. The department of elementary and
114 secondary education shall provide such legal,
115 research, clerical, and technical services as
116 the task force may require in the performance of
117 its duties.
118 5. The task force established under
119 subsection 1 of this section shall consider a
120 course that:
121 (1) Gives students an opportunity to
122 explore various career and educational
123 opportunities by:
124 (a) Administering career surveys to
125 students and helping students use Missouri
126 Connections to determine their career interests
127 and develop plans to meet their career goals;
128 (b) Explaining the differences between
129 types of colleges, including two-year and four-
130 year colleges, and noting the availability of
131 registered apprenticeship programs as
132 alternatives to college for students;
133 (c) Describing technical degrees offered
134 by colleges;
135 (d) Explaining the courses and educational
136 experiences offered at community colleges;
137 (e) Describing the various certificates
138 and credentials available to earn at the school
139 or other schools including, but not limited to,
243

140 career and technical education certificates
141 described under section 170.029 and industry-
142 recognized certificates and credentials;
143 (f) Advising students of any advanced
144 placement courses that they may take at the
145 school;
146 (g) Describing any opportunities at the
147 school for dual enrollment;
148 (h) Advising students of any Project Lead
149 the Way courses offered at the school and
150 explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help
151 students learn valuable skills;
152 (i) Informing students of the availability
153 of funding for postsecondary education through
154 the A+ schools program described under section
155 160.545;
156 (j) Describing the availability of virtual
157 courses;
158 (k) Describing the types of skills and
159 occupations most in demand in the current job
160 market and those skills and occupations likely
161 to be in high demand in future years;
162 (l) Describing the typical salaries for
163 occupations, salary trends, and opportunities
164 for advancement in various occupations;
165 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities
166 available in careers involving science,
167 technology, engineering, and math;
168 (n) Advising students of the resources
169 offered by workforce or job centers;
170 (o) Preparing students for the ACT
171 assessment or the ACT WorkKeys assessments
172 required for the National Career Readiness
173 Certificate;
174 (p) Administering a practice ACT
175 assessment or practice ACT WorkKeys assessments
176 required for the National Career Readiness
177 Certificate to students;
178 (q) Advising students of opportunities to
179 take the SAT and the Armed Services Vocational
180 Aptitude Battery;
181 (r) Administering a basic math test to
182 students so that they can assess their math
183 skills;
244

184 (s) Administering a basic writing test to
185 students so that they can assess their writing
186 skills;
187 (t) Helping each student prepare a
188 personal plan of study that outlines a sequence
189 of courses and experiences that concludes with
190 the student reaching his or her postsecondary
191 goals; and
192 (u) Explaining how to complete college
193 applications and the Free Application for
194 Federal Student Aid;
195 (2) Focuses on career readiness and
196 emphasizes the importance of work ethic,
197 communication, collaboration, critical thinking,
198 and creativity;
199 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a
200 four-year college is not the only pathway to
201 success by describing to students at least
202 sixteen pathways to success in detail and
203 including guest visitors who represent each
204 pathway described. In exploring how these
205 pathways could be covered in the course, the
206 task force shall consider how instructors for
207 the course may be able to rely on assistance
208 from Missouri Career Pathways within the
209 department of elementary and secondary education;
210 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
211 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
212 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force
213 established under subsection 1 of this section
214 shall present its findings and recommendations
215 to the speaker of the house of representatives,
216 the president pro tempore of the senate, the
217 joint committee on education, and the state
218 board of education. Upon presenting the
219 findings and recommendations as described in
220 this subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[171.034. Any school district that is
eligible to reduce its requirement to make up
days pursuant to subsection 3 of section 171.033
may provide food service on a summer school food
service basis if it resumes school with double
sessions.]
[172.287. 1. The University of Missouri
shall annually request an appropriation under
245

capital improvements, subject to availability of
funds, for a program of grants established for
the engineering colleges of the University of
Missouri for the purpose of assisting such
colleges in the purchase of teaching and
research laboratory equipment exclusive of
laboratory or classroom furniture. The amount
granted for each engineering college may not
exceed the lesser of an amount equal to one
thousand two hundred dollars per each such
bachelor's degree awarded in the previous fiscal
year in all engineering programs currently
accredited by the accreditation board for
engineering and technology, or the dollar value
of new funds for equipment purchase which such
colleges may obtain from sources other than
state appropriations for laboratory equipment.
2. For purposes of this section, the fair
market value of in-kind contributions of
laboratory equipment to the colleges may be
included as funds for equipment purchase from
sources other than state appropriations. In the
event that new funds for laboratory equipment
purchase obtained by any college of engineering
from such nonstate sources exceed the amount
necessary to reach the maximum dollar limits
herein specified, such excess amounts will be
carried over to the following fiscal year and
considered the same as that year's new equipment
funds from nonstate sources.
3. In the event that the appropriations
for this grant program are insufficient to fund
all grants approved for a given fiscal year, all
such grants shall be reduced pro rata as
necessary.
4. The provisions of this section shall
terminate on June 30, 2017.]
[173.196. 1. Any business firm, as
defined in section 32.105, may make a donation
to the "Missouri Higher Education Scholarship
Donation Fund", which is hereby created in the
state treasury. A donating business firm shall
receive a tax credit as provided in this section
equal to fifty percent of the amount of the
donation, except that tax credits shall be
246

awarded each fiscal year in the order donations
are received and the amount of tax credits
authorized shall total no more than two hundred
and fifty thousand dollars for each fiscal year.
2. The department of revenue shall grant
tax credits approved under this section which
shall be applied in the order specified in
subsection 1 of section 32.115 until used. The
tax credits provided under this section shall be
refundable, and any tax credit not used in the
fiscal year in which approved may be carried
over the next five succeeding calendar or fiscal
years until the full credit has been claimed.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any tax credits granted under this section may
be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
conveyed without consent or approval. Such
taxpayer, hereinafter the assignor for purposes
of this section, may sell, assign, exchange, or
otherwise transfer earned tax credits:
(1) For no less than seventy-five percent
of the par value of such credits; and
(2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred
percent of annual earned credits.
3. No tax credit authorized under this
section may be applied against any tax applied
in a tax year beginning prior to January 1, 1995.
4. All revenues credited to the fund shall
be used, subject to appropriations, to provide
scholarships authorized under sections 173.197
to 173.199, and for no other purpose.
5. For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2005, no tax credits shall be
authorized, awarded, or issued to any person or
entity claiming any tax credit under this
section.]
[173.236. 1. As used in this section,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the coordinating board for
higher education;
(2) "Grant", the Vietnam veteran's
survivors grant as established in this section;
247

(3) "Institution of postsecondary
education", any approved public or private
institution as defined in section 173.205;
(4) "Survivor", a child or spouse of a
Vietnam veteran as defined in this section;
(5) "Tuition", any tuition or incidental
fee or both charged by an institution of
postsecondary education, as defined in this
section, for attendance at the institution by a
student as a resident of this state;
(6) "Vietnam veteran", a person who served
in the military in Vietnam or the war zone in
Southeast Asia and to whom the following
criteria shall apply:
(a) The veteran was a Missouri resident
when first entering the military service and at
the time of death;
(b) The veteran's death was attributable
to illness that could possibly be a result of
exposure to toxic chemicals during the Vietnam
Conflict; and
(c) The veteran served in the Vietnam
theater between 1961 and 1972.
2. Within the limits of the amounts
appropriated therefor, the coordinating board
for higher education shall award annually up to
twelve grants to survivors of Vietnam veterans
to attend institutions of postsecondary
education in this state. If the waiting list of
eligible survivors exceeds fifty, the
coordinating board may petition the general
assembly to expand the quota. If the quota is
not expanded the eligibility of survivors on the
waiting list shall be extended.
3. A survivor may receive a grant pursuant
to this section only so long as the survivor is
enrolled in a program leading to a certificate,
or an associate or baccalaureate degree. In no
event shall a survivor receive a grant beyond
the completion of the first baccalaureate
degree, regardless of age. No survivor shall
receive more than one hundred percent of tuition
when combined with similar funds made available
to such survivor.
4. The coordinating board for higher
education shall:
248

(1) Promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the implementation of this
section;
(2) Determine minimum standards of
performance in order for a survivor to remain
eligible to receive a grant under this program;
(3) Make available on behalf of a survivor
an amount toward the survivor's tuition which is
equal to the grant to which the survivor is
entitled under the provisions of this section;
(4) Provide the forms and determine the
procedures necessary for a survivor to apply for
and receive a grant under this program.
5. In order to be eligible to receive a
grant pursuant to this section, a survivor shall
be certified as eligible by a Missouri state
veterans service officer. Such certification
shall be made upon qualified medical
certification by a Veterans Administration
medical authority that exposure to toxic
chemicals contributed to or was the cause of
death of the veteran, as defined in subsection 1
of this section.
6. A survivor who is enrolled or has been
accepted for enrollment as an undergraduate
postsecondary student at an approved institution
of postsecondary education shall receive a grant
in an amount not to exceed the least of the
following:
(1) The actual tuition, as defined in this
section, charged at an approved institution
where the child is enrolled or accepted for
enrollment; or
(2) The average amount of tuition charged
a Missouri resident at the institutions
identified in section 174.020 for attendance as
a full-time student, as defined in section
173.205.
7. A survivor who is a recipient of a
grant may transfer from one approved public or
private institution of postsecondary education
to another without losing his entitlement under
this section. The board shall make necessary
adjustments in the amount of the grant. If a
grant recipient at any time withdraws from the
institution of postsecondary education so that
249

100 under the rules and regulations of that
101 institution he is entitled to a refund of any
102 tuition, fees, or other charges, the institution
103 shall pay the portion of the refund to which he
104 is entitled attributable to the grant for that
105 semester or similar grading period to the board.
106 8. If a survivor is granted financial
107 assistance under any other student aid program,
108 public or private, the full amount of such aid
109 shall be reported to the board by the
110 institution and the eligible survivor.
111 9. Nothing in this section shall be
112 construed as a promise or guarantee that a
113 person will be admitted to an institution of
114 postsecondary education or to a particular
115 institution of postsecondary education, will be
116 allowed to continue to attend an institution of
117 postsecondary education after having been
118 admitted, or will be graduated from an
119 institution of postsecondary education.
120 10. The benefits conferred by this section
121 shall be available to any academically qualified
122 surviving children and spouses of Vietnam
123 veterans as defined in subsection 1 of this
124 section, regardless of the survivor's age, until
125 December 31, 1995. After December 31, 1995, the
126 benefits conferred by this section shall not be
127 available to such persons who are twenty-five
128 years of age or older, except spouses will
129 remain eligible until the fifth anniversary
130 after the death of the veteran.
131 11. This section shall expire on December
132 31, 2015.]
[173.680. 1. The department of higher
education and workforce development shall
conduct a study to identify the information
technology industry certifications most
frequently requested by employers in Missouri.
The department of higher education and workforce
development may conduct the study with the
assistance of other state departments and
agencies, the Missouri mathematics and science
coalition, and the governor's advisory council
on science, technology, engineering, and
mathematical issues.
250

2. The department of higher education and
workforce development shall complete the study
no later than January 31, 2015. The department
shall prepare the findings in a report and
provide it to:
(1) The president pro tempore of the
senate;
(2) The speaker of the house of
representatives;
(3) The joint committee on education;
(4) The governor;
(5) The coordinating board for higher
education; and
(6) The state board of education.]
[184.384. The district and subdistricts
and the officers and employees thereof shall be
subject to the provisions of chapter 296 or any
amendment thereto hereafter enacted.]
[190.450. By December 31, 2017, the
department of public safety shall complete a
study of the number of public safety answering
points necessary to provide the best possible
911 technology and service to all areas of the
state in the most efficient and economical
manner possible, issue a state public safety
answering point consolidation plan based on the
study, and provide such plan to the Missouri 911
service board.]
[191.425. 1. Upon receipt of federal
funding in accordance with subsection 4 of this
section, there is hereby established within the
department of health and senior services the
"Women's Heart Health Program" to provide heart
disease risk screening to uninsured and
underinsured women.
2. The following women shall be eligible
for program services:
(1) Women between the ages of thirty-five
and sixty-four years;
(2) Women who are receiving breast and
cervical cancer screenings under the Missouri
show me healthy women program;
251

(3) Women who are uninsured or whose
insurance does not provide coverage for heart
disease risk screenings; and
(4) Women with a gross family income at or
below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level.
3. The department shall contract with
health care providers who are currently
providing services under the Missouri show me
healthy women program to provide screening
services under the women's heart health
program. Screening shall include but not be
limited to height, weight, and body mass index
(BMI), blood pressure, total cholesterol, HDL,
and blood glucose. Any woman whose screening
indicates an increased risk for heart disease
shall be referred for appropriate follow-up
health care services and be offered lifestyle
education services to reduce her risk for heart
disease.
4. The women's heart health program shall
be subject to receipt of federal funding which
designates such funding for heart disease risk
screening to uninsured and underinsured women.
In the event that federal funds are not
available for such program, the department shall
not be required to establish or implement the
program.
5. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the program
authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset three years after August
28, 2012, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the
program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset three years after the
effective date of the reauthorization of this
section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
252

[191.950. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health
and senior services;
(2) "Economically challenged men", men who
have a gross income up to one hundred fifty
percent of the federal poverty level;
(3) "Program", the prostate cancer pilot
program established in this section;
(4) "Rural area", a rural area which is in
either any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with
more than twenty thousand but fewer than twenty
thousand one hundred inhabitants, any county of
the second classification with more than
nineteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants, or
any county of the third classification with a
township form of government and with more than
thirty-three thousand one hundred but fewer than
thirty-three thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(5) "Uninsured men", men for whom services
provided by the program are not covered by
private insurance, MO HealthNet or Medicare;
(6) "Urban area", an urban area which is
located in a city not within a county.
2. Subject to securing a cooperative
agreement with a nonprofit entity for funding of
the program, there is hereby established within
the department of health and senior services two
"Prostate Cancer Pilot Programs" to fund
prostate cancer screening and treatment services
and to provide education to men residing in this
state. One prostate cancer pilot program shall
be located in an urban area and one prostate
cancer pilot program shall be located in a rural
area. The department may directly contract with
the Missouri Foundation for Health, or a
successor entity, in the delivery of the pilot
program. For purposes of this section, the
contracting process of the department with these
entities need not be governed by the provisions
of chapter 34.
3. The program shall be open to:
253

(1) Uninsured men or economically
challenged men who are at least fifty years old;
and
(2) On the advice of a physician or at the
request of the individual, uninsured men or
economically challenged men who are at least
thirty-five years of age but less than fifty
years of age and who are at high risk for
prostate cancer.
4. The program shall provide:
(1) Prostate cancer screening;
(2) Referral services, including services
necessary for diagnosis;
(3) Treatment services for individuals who
are diagnosed with prostate cancer after being
screened; and
(4) Outreach and education activities to
ensure awareness and utilization of program
services by uninsured men and economically
challenged men.
5. Upon appropriation, the department
shall distribute grants to administer the
program to:
(1) Local health departments; and
(2) Federally qualified health centers.
6. Three years from the date on which the
grants were first administered under this
section, the department shall report to the
governor and general assembly:
(1) The number of individuals screened and
treated under the program, including racial and
ethnic data on the individuals who were screened
and treated; and
(2) To the extent possible, any cost
savings achieved by the program as a result of
early detection of prostate cancer.
7. The department shall promulgate rules
to establish guidelines regarding eligibility
for the program and to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
254

are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2011, shall be invalid
and void.
8. Under and pursuant to section 23.253 of
100 the Missouri sunset act:
101 (1) The provisions of the new program
102 authorized under this section shall
103 automatically sunset six years after August 28,
104 2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the
105 general assembly; and
106 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
107 program authorized under this section shall
108 automatically sunset six years after the
109 effective date of the reauthorization of this
110 section; and
111 (3) This section shall terminate on
112 September first of the calendar year immediately
113 following the calendar year in which the program
114 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[191.1075. As used in sections 191.1075 to
191.1085, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health
and senior services;
(2) "Health care professional", a
physician or other health care practitioner
licensed, accredited, or certified by the state
of Missouri to perform specified health services;
(3) "Hospital":
(a) A place devoted primarily to the
maintenance and operation of facilities for the
diagnosis, treatment, or care of not less than
twenty-four consecutive hours in any week of
three or more nonrelated individuals suffering
from illness, disease, injury, deformity, or
other abnormal physical conditions; or
(b) A place devoted primarily to provide
for not less than twenty-four consecutive hours
in any week medical or nursing care for three or
more unrelated individuals. "Hospital" does not
255

include convalescent, nursing, shelter, or
boarding homes as defined in chapter 198.]
[191.1080. 1. There is hereby created
within the department of health and senior
services the "Missouri Palliative Care and
Quality of Life Interdisciplinary Council",
which shall be a palliative care consumer and
professional information and education program
to improve quality and delivery of patient-
centered and family-focused care in this state.
2. On or before December 1, 2016, the
following members shall be appointed to the
council:
(1) Two members of the senate, appointed
by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(3) Two board-certified hospice and
palliative medicine physicians licensed in this
state, appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate;
(4) Two certified hospice and palliative
nurses licensed in this state, appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate;
(5) A certified hospice and palliative
social worker, appointed by the governor with
the advice and consent of the senate;
(6) A patient and family caregiver
advocate representative, appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate; and
(7) A spiritual professional with
experience in palliative care and health care,
appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate.
3. Council members shall serve for a term
of three years. The members of the council
shall elect a chair and vice chair whose duties
shall be established by the council. The
department shall determine a time and place for
regular meetings of the council, which shall
meet at least biannually.
256

4. Members of the council shall serve
without compensation, but shall, subject to
appropriations, be reimbursed for their actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties as members of the
council.
5. The council shall consult with and
advise the department on matters related to the
establishment, maintenance, operation, and
outcomes evaluation of palliative care
initiatives in this state, including the
palliative care consumer and professional
information and education program established in
section 191.1085.
6. The council shall submit an annual
report to the general assembly, which includes
an assessment of the availability of palliative
care in this state for patients at early stages
of serious disease and an analysis of barriers
to greater access to palliative care.
7. The council authorized under this
section shall automatically expire August 28,
2022.]
[191.1085. 1. There is hereby established
the "Palliative Care Consumer and Professional
Information and Education Program" within the
department of health and senior services.
2. The purpose of the program is to
maximize the effectiveness of palliative care in
this state by ensuring that comprehensive and
accurate information and education about
palliative care is available to the public,
health care providers, and health care
facilities.
3. The department shall publish on its
website information and resources, including
links to external resources, about palliative
care for the public, health care providers, and
health care facilities, including but not
limited to:
(1) Continuing education opportunities for
health care providers;
(2) Information about palliative care
delivery in the home, primary, secondary, and
tertiary environments; and
257

(3) Consumer educational materials and
referral information for palliative care,
including hospice.
4. Each hospital in this state is
encouraged to have a palliative care presence on
its intranet or internet website which provides
links to one or more of the following
organizations: the Institute of Medicine, the
Center to Advance Palliative Care, the
Supportive Care Coalition, the National Hospice
and Palliative Care Organization, the American
Academy of Hospice and Palliative Medicine, and
the National Institute on Aging.
5. Each hospital in this state is
encouraged to have patient education information
about palliative care available for distribution
to patients.
6. The department shall consult with the
palliative care and quality of life
interdisciplinary council established in section
191.1080 in implementing the section.
7. The department may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of sections 191.1075 to
191.1085. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in
sections 191.1075 to 191.1085 shall become
effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
and, if applicable, section 536.028. Sections
191.1075 to 191.1085 and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid
and void.
8. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 23.253 to the contrary, the program
authorized under this section shall
automatically expire on August 28, 2022.]
[192.926. 1. By September 1, 2015, the
department of social services in cooperation
258

with the department of health and senior
services and the department of mental health
shall establish a committee to assess the
continuation of the money follows the person
demonstration program in order to support
Missourians who have disabilities and those who
are aging to transition from nursing facilities
or habilitation centers to quality community
settings. The committee shall study
sustainability of the program beyond the current
demonstration time frame for all transitions to
occur by September 30, 2018. The committee
shall be administered and its members, with the
exception of the members from the house of
representatives and the senate, chosen by the
director of the department of social services.
2. The committee shall:
(1) Review the extent to which the
demonstration program has achieved its purposes;
(2) Assess any possible improvements to
the program;
(3) Investigate program elements and costs
to sustain the program beyond its current
demonstration period;
(4) Explore cost savings achieved through
the demonstration program;
(5) Investigate the possibility and need
to apply for a waiver from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services.
3. The committee shall include fiscal
staff from the department of social services,
the department of health and senior services,
the department of mental health, and the office
of administration's division of budget and
planning. The committee shall also be comprised
of a representative from each of the following:
(1) The division of senior and disability
services within the department of health and
senior services;
(2) The MO HealthNet division within the
department of social services;
(3) The division of developmental
disabilities within the department of mental
health;
259

(4) Centers for independent living and
area agencies on aging currently serving as
money follows the person local contact agencies;
(5) The Missouri assistive technology
council;
(6) The Missouri developmental
disabilities council;
(7) The skilled nursing community
predominately serving MO HealthNet participants;
(8) The Missouri house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(9) The Missouri senate, appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate.
4. The committee may also include other
members or work groups deemed necessary to
accomplish its purposes, including but not
limited to representatives from state agencies,
local advisory groups and community members, and
members of the general assembly with valuable
input regarding the activities of the money
follows the person demonstration program.
5. The department of social services in
cooperation with the department of health and
senior services and the department of mental
health shall make recommendations based on the
findings of the committee and report them to the
general assembly and the governor by July 1,
2016.
6. The provisions of this section shall
expire on January 1, 2017.]
[199.020. 1. The following officers and
their families shall, with the permission of the
department of health and senior services, reside
on the premises or other property of the
center: center director, assistant director,
physicians, and other personnel required for the
center's operation as recommended by the
center's director. Personnel residing at the
center shall pay a monthly rental determined
annually at the lower of cost or fair market
value; except that the center director, with the
approval of the director of the department of
health and senior services, may establish a
260

lower rate as required to fill the center's
personnel needs.
2. This section shall terminate thirty
days following the date notice is provided to
the revisor of statutes that an agreement has
been executed which transfers the Missouri
rehabilitation center from the department of
health and senior services to the board of
curators of the University of Missouri.]
[208.482. 1. The MO HealthNet division
shall not recover disproportionate share
hospital audit recoupments from any tier 1
safety net hospital, excluding department of
mental health state-operated psychiatric
hospitals, for which an intergovernmental
transfer was used for the nonfederal share of
its disproportionate share hospital payments.
General revenue funds shall not be used to
offset any expenditure of funds to pay such
recoupments to the federal government.
2. The provisions of this section shall
expire on September 30, 2022.]
[208.627. 1. The department of social
services shall seek input from the department of
mental health and community-based social service
agencies, which provide case management services
to the elderly, for the purpose of developing a
report outlining areas and strategies by which
the department can deliver case management
services to the elderly by collaboration and
cooperation with community-based social service
agencies, employing licensed personnel. The
report shall include, but not be limited to, the
identification of at-risk elderly,
transportation services, case management
services, nutrition services, health services,
and socialization activities and programs. The
goal of strategies outlined should be to enhance
the quality of life and welfare of Missouri's
elderly population, and specifically Missouri's
at-risk elderly.
2. The report required by subsection 1 of
this section shall be delivered to the governor,
the president pro tem of the senate, and the
speaker of the house not later than January 1,
261

1995. The report shall identify effective and
efficient methods of delivering necessary
services to at-risk elderly.]
[210.154. 1. There is hereby created
within the department of social services the
"Missouri Task Force on the Prevention of Infant
Abuse and Neglect" to study and make
recommendations to the governor and general
assembly concerning the prevention of infant
abuse and neglect in Missouri. The task force
shall consist of the following nine members:
(1) Two members of the senate from
different political parties, appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of
representatives from different political
parties, appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives;
(3) The director of the department of
social services, or his or her designee;
(4) The director of the department of
health and senior services, or his or her
designee;
(5) A SAFE CARE provider as described in
section 334.950;
(6) A representative of a child advocacy
organization specializing in prevention of child
abuse and neglect; and
(7) A representative of a licensed
Missouri hospital or licensed Missouri birthing
center.
Members of the task force, other than the
legislative members and the directors of state
departments, shall be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate by
September 15, 2016.
2. A majority vote of a quorum of the task
force is required for any action.
3. The task force shall elect a chair and
vice chair at its first meeting, which shall be
convened by the director of the department of
social services, or his or her designee, no
later than October 1, 2016. Meetings may be
held by telephone or video conference at the
discretion of the chair.
262

4. Members shall serve on the task force
without compensation but may, subject to
appropriations, be reimbursed for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance
of their official duties as members of the task
force.
5. On or before December 31, 2016, the
task force shall submit a report on its findings
and recommendations to the governor and general
assembly.
6. The task shall develop recommendations
to reduce infant abuse and neglect, including
but not limited to:
(1) Sharing information between the
children's division and hospitals and birthing
centers for the purpose of identifying newborn
infants who may be at risk of abuse and neglect;
and
(2) Training division employees and
medical providers to recognize the signs of
infant child abuse and neglect.
The recommendations may include proposals for
specific statutory and regulatory changes and
methods to foster cooperation between state and
local governmental bodies, medical providers,
and child welfare agencies.
7. The task force shall expire on January
1, 2017, or upon submission of a report as
provided for under subsection 5 of this section.]
[210.1030. 1. There is hereby created the
"Trauma-Informed Care for Children and Families
Task Force". The mission of the task force
shall be to promote the healthy development of
children and their families living in Missouri
communities by promoting comprehensive trauma-
informed children and family support systems and
interagency cooperation.
2. The task force shall consist of the
following members:
(1) The directors, or their designees, of
the departments of elementary and secondary
education, health and senior services, mental
health, social services, public safety, and
corrections;
263

(2) The director, or his or her designee,
of the office of child advocate;
(3) Six members from the private sector
with knowledge of trauma-informed care methods,
two of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives, one of whom shall
be appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives, two of whom shall be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate, and one of whom shall be appointed by
the minority leader of the senate;
(4) Two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives and one member of the
house of representatives appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives;
(5) Two members of the senate appointed by
the president pro tempore of the senate and one
member of the senate appointed by the minority
leader of the senate; and
(6) The executive director, or his or her
designee, of the Missouri Juvenile Justice
Association.
3. The task force shall incorporate
evidence-based and evidence-informed best
practices including, but not limited to, the
Missouri Model: A Developmental Framework for
Trauma-Informed, with respect to:
(1) Early identification of children and
youth and their families, as appropriate, who
have experienced or are at risk of experiencing
trauma;
(2) The expeditious referral of such
children and youth and their families, as
appropriate, who require specialized services to
the appropriate trauma-informed support
services, including treatment, in accordance
with applicable privacy laws; and
(3) The implementation of trauma-informed
approaches and interventions in child and youth-
serving schools, organizations, homes, and other
settings to foster safe, stable, and nurturing
environments and relationships that prevent and
mitigate the effects of trauma.
4. The department of social services shall
provide such research, clerical, technical, and
264

other services as the task force may require in
the performance of its duties.
5. The task force, its members, and any
staff assigned to the task force shall receive
reimbursement for their actual and necessary
expenses incurred in attending meetings of the
task force or any subcommittee thereof.
6. The task force shall meet within two
months of August 28, 2018.
7. The task force shall report a summary
of its activities and any recommendations for
legislation to the general assembly and to the
joint committee on child abuse and neglect under
section 21.771 by January 1, 2019.
8. The task force shall terminate on
January 1, 2019.]
[215.263. 1. For purposes of sections
215.261 to 215.263, the term "affordable
housing" means all residential structures newly
constructed or rehabilitated, which a person
earning one hundred fifteen percent or less of
the median income for the person's county, as
determined by the United States Census Bureau's
American Community Survey, based on the most
recent of five-year period estimate data in
which the final year of the estimate ends in
either zero or five, could afford if spending
twenty-nine percent of that person's gross
income annually on such housing.
2. Clerical, research and general
administrative support staff for the commission
shall be provided by the Missouri department of
economic development.]
[217.147. 1. There is hereby created the
"Sentencing and Corrections Oversight
Commission". The commission shall be composed
of thirteen members as follows:
(1) A circuit court judge to be appointed
by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme
court;
(2) Three members to be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the
senate, one of whom shall be a victim's
advocate, one of whom shall be a representative
from the Missouri Sheriffs' Association, and one
265

of whom shall be a representative of the
Missouri Association of Counties;
(3) The following shall be ex officio,
voting members:
(a) The chair of the senate judiciary
committee, or any successor committee that
reviews legislation involving crime and criminal
procedure, who shall serve as co-chair of the
commission and the ranking minority member of
such senate committee;
(b) The chair of the appropriations-public
safety and corrections committee of the house of
representatives, or any successor committee that
reviews similar legislation, who shall serve as
co-chair and the ranking minority member of such
house committee;
(c) The director of the Missouri state
public defender system, or his or her designee
who is a practicing public defender;
(d) The executive director of the Missouri
office of prosecution services, or his or her
designee who is a practicing prosecutor;
(e) The director of the department of
corrections, or his or her designee;
(f) The chairman of the board of probation
and parole, or his or her designee;
(g) The chief justice of the Missouri
supreme court, or his or her designee.
2. Beginning with the appointments made
after August 28, 2012, the circuit court judge
member shall be appointed for four years, two of
the members appointed by the governor shall be
appointed for three years, and one member
appointed by the governor shall be appointed for
two years. Thereafter, the members shall be
appointed to serve four-year terms and shall
serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy
in the office of a member shall be filled by
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
3. The co-chairs are responsible for
establishing and enforcing attendance and voting
rules, bylaws, and the frequency, location, and
time of meetings, and distributing meeting
notices, except that the commission's first
meeting shall occur by February 28, 2013, and
266

the commission shall meet at least twice each
calendar year.
4. The duties of the commission shall
include:
(1) Monitoring and assisting the
implementation of sections 217.703, 217.718, and
subsection 4 of section 559.036, and evaluating
recidivism reductions, cost savings, and other
effects resulting from the implementation;
(2) Determining ways to reinvest any cost
savings to pay for the continued implementation
of the sections listed in subdivision (1) of
this subsection and other evidence-based
practices for reducing recidivism; and
(3) Examining the issue of restitution for
crime victims, including the amount ordered and
collected annually, methods and costs of
collection, and restitution's order of priority
in official procedures and documents.
5. The department, board, and office of
state courts administrator shall collect and
report any data requested by the commission in a
timely fashion.
6. The commission shall issue a report to
the speaker of the house of representatives,
senate president pro tempore, chief justice of
the Missouri supreme court, and governor on
December 31, 2013, and annually thereafter,
detailing the effects of the sections listed in
subdivision (1) of subsection 4 and providing
the data and analysis demonstrating those
effects. The report may also recommend ways to
reinvest any cost savings into evidence-based
practices to reduce recidivism and possible
changes to sentencing and corrections policies
and statutes.
7. The department of corrections shall
provide administrative support to the commission
to carry out the duties of this section.
8. No member shall receive any
compensation for the performance of official
100 duties, but the members who are not otherwise
101 reimbursed by their agency shall be reimbursed
102 for travel and other expenses actually and
103 necessarily incurred in the performance of their
104 duties.
267

105 9. The provisions of this section shall
106 automatically expire on August 28, 2018.]
[227.817. The portion of U.S. Highway 169
from State Highway VV continuing to State
Highway DD in Clinton and Clay counties shall be
designated the "Championship Way". The
department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by private
donations. This designation shall expire on
December 31, 2022.]
[252.300. 1. Sections 252.300 to 252.333
shall be known and may be cited as "The Missouri
Economic Diversification and Afforestation Act
of 1990".
2. It is the intent of sections 252.300 to
252.333 to address environmental, economic, and
social programs with a long-term, integrated
strategy that will result in soil conservation,
improved water and air quality, enhanced
wildlife habitat, increased job opportunities,
and reduced social problems, to the benefit of
all citizens of the state of Missouri.]
[252.303. The department may develop and
implement, in cooperation with the University of
Missouri college of agriculture, the University
of Missouri center for agroforestry, the
University of Missouri extension service, the
Missouri department of natural resources,
private industry councils and the Missouri
department of agriculture, an agroforestry
program. The program shall be designed to
encourage the development of a state program of
agroforestry, and shall encourage soil
conservation and diversifications of the state's
agricultural base through the use of trees
planted in an agroforestry configuration to
accommodate alley cropping, forested-riparian
buffers, silvopasture and windbreaks.]
[252.306. As used in sections 252.300 to
252.333, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Alley cropping", planting rows of
trees at wide spacings and cropping the
alleyways;
268

(2) "Conservation reserve program", the
conservation reserve program authorized by the
Federal Food Security Act of 1985, as amended,
(Title XII, P.L. 99-198), or its successor
program;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department
of conservation;
(4) "Director", the director of the
Missouri department of conservation;
(5) "Eligible land", agricultural land
which is susceptible to soil erosion that has a
recent cropping history, marginal pastureland,
land surrounding livestock enclosures and
riparian zones;
(6) "Eligible practices", single or
multiple rows of trees, alone or combined with
other plants such as grass, conventional row
crops or horticulture crops, and animals located
at intervals of distance within or around
fields, around livestock enclosures, and along
streams and rivers, specifically designed to
provide production and environmental enhancement
benefits in accordance with the practices
identified in section 252.303;
(7) "Enhancement phase", the period of
time, not to exceed ten years, immediately
following the establishment phase, during which
payments are made by the state of Missouri to
landowners who use their eligible land for
agroforestry purposes as required by the
department;
(8) "Establishment phase", the period of
time during which eligible land is being
prepared for planting trees and developing
agroforestry practices, as determined by the
director of the department;
(9) "Forested-riparian buffers", a
combination of trees and other vegetation
established parallel to streams and rivers;
(10) "Silvopasture", combining trees with
forage and livestock;
(11) "Windbreaks", planting single or
multiple rows of trees for protection and
enhanced production of crops and animals.]
269

[252.309. 1. The director may enter into
agreements with individual landowners to make
incentive payments during the enhancement phase
to landowners. Recipients of such payments
shall utilize the land for which such payment is
made for agroforestry purposes as required by
the director pursuant to sections 252.300 to
252.333.
2. The amount of state incentive payment
made to a landowner per acre of eligible land
shall be an amount which, when added to any cash
or in-kind net income produced by crops raised
on the land, is substantially equal to the
amount per acre previously paid or which would
have been paid to the landowner under the
federal conservation reserve program.
3. If an application made pursuant to
section 252.315 is approved by the director, the
director shall develop a schedule of annual
payments to be made by the state.
4. The state shall not make any payment to
a landowner to maintain the use of eligible land
during the enhancement phase for agroforestry
purposes after ten years have elapsed since the
first such incentive payment is made.]
[252.312. The state payments provided for
in sections 252.309, 252.330, and 252.333 may be
made from funds available to the department of
conservation, soil conservation funds made
available by the department of natural resources
from the tax imposed by Sections 47(a), 47(b)
and 47(c) of Article IV of the Constitution of
Missouri, funds appropriated by the general
assembly for that purpose, grants, bequests or
gifts, or any combination thereof.]
[252.315. 1. To participate in the
program, the landowner shall make application to
the director in writing. The written
application shall show the number of acres to be
placed in the program and that the land which is
to be placed in the agroforestry program meets
the eligibility requirements of this section.
The application shall also contain a detailed
plan of the landowner's proposal to meet the
requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333,
270

including the type and number of trees to be
planted, established, or managed, the type of
compatible grass, other crops and such other
information as may be deemed necessary. The
number of trees required to satisfy eligibility
may vary with agroforestry practice, but in each
case shall be a sufficient number to guarantee
the success of the practice and shall be
consistent with standards established for each
practice.
2. The director shall review each
application. In reviewing the application the
director shall determine the type or types of
soil located in the area of the land proposed to
be included in the agroforestry program and
shall apply the land capability classification
system to determine the potential or limitations
of the land for inclusion in the program.
Before the director acts upon the application,
an on-site inspection shall be made by a
representative of the department of conservation
or its approved agent. The inspecting
representative shall attest to the efficacy of
the agroforestry plan to be used, the number of
acres to be placed under agroforestry
management, the species and number of trees to
be planted, established, or managed, and other
crop components of the proposed program. After
the report of the on-site inspector and the
review by the director, the director shall
determine the landowner's eligibility to
participate in the agroforestry program and
shall determine the amount of cost sharing,
including in-kind and labor components, for the
landowner. If the director fails to approve an
application, the aggrieved landowner may request
a hearing before the conservation commission or
its authorized representative within thirty days
of notice to the landowner of the failure of the
conservation department to approve the
application, or the landowner may proceed under
the provisions of section 536.150 as if the act
of the conservation department was one not
subject to administrative review. If an action
is brought pursuant to section 536.150, venue
shall be in Cole County.]
271

[252.318. 1. All land participating in
the agroforestry program shall be inspected
annually by a representative of the director, to
ensure that the land continues to comply with
the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333
and that practice specifications are being
maintained in accordance with applicable rules
and regulations.
2. If the annual inspection determines
that the land is no longer in compliance with
the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333 or
with the rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of sections 252.300
to 252.333, the director shall notify the
landowner of that fact and shall detail the
specifics in which the land fails to meet the
requirements. The landowner may respond to the
notice within thirty days of receipt, either by
contesting the inspection report or by providing
the director with a proposal to correct the
problems which form the basis of the notice. If
the landowner contests the findings of the
annual inspection, the aggrieved landowner may
request a hearing before the conservation
commission or its authorized representative or
the landowner may proceed under the provisions
of section 536.150, as if the act of the
conservation department was one not subject to
administrative review. If an action is brought
pursuant to section 536.150, venue shall be in
Cole County. If the landowner provides the
director with a proposal to correct the problems
which form the basis of the notice, the director
shall review the proposal and, if the director
finds such proposal acceptable, shall allow the
landowner to implement the proposal to correct
the alleged problems and shall not suspend the
annual payment to the landowner under the
provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. If
the landowner is unable or unwilling to correct
the alleged problems in a manner acceptable to
the director, the landowner shall not receive
the subsequent payments due under the provisions
of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
272

[252.321. The University of Missouri
center for agroforestry and extension service,
in consultation with the director, shall
establish agroforestry demonstration areas, and
develop and deliver the educational components
of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.324. 1. The director may promulgate
rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333.
Before promulgating any such rule, the director
shall seek the advice and comments of the
University of Missouri college of agriculture,
the University of Missouri center for
agroforestry, the University of Missouri
extension service, the Missouri department of
natural resources, private industry councils,
the Missouri department of economic development
and the Missouri department of agriculture. The
director may seek advice and comments before
promulgating rules and regulations from the
United States Department of Agriculture and any
other entities deemed advisable by the
director. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of this chapter
shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 536.
2. The Missouri department of conservation
may contract with the division of soil and water
conservation of the Missouri department of
natural resources for any administrative
functions required under the provisions of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.327. 1. The department of
conservation and the department of economic
development and the University of Missouri
college of agriculture shall, by each of the
dates specified in subsection 2 of this section,
jointly produce a report on the agroforestry
program which:
(1) Provides a status report on the
afforestation aspects of the agroforestry
program by presenting a forecast of anticipated
economic developments from the afforestation in
273

the state as a result of the agroforestry
program;
(2) Suggests public or private sector
initiatives that will potentially serve to
maximize the economic benefits for related new
development and expansion of existing businesses
resulting from the agroforestry program;
(3) Suggests methods to promote the
development of wood and other forestry related
products;
(4) Suggests public or private sector
initiatives or methods which will result in
significant increases in job opportunities and
employment.
2. The report shall be submitted to the
governor and to the general assembly by January
thirty-first of each of the following years:
1996, 2001, 2006, 2011, 2016, 2021, and 2026.]
[252.330. During the establishment phase,
the director may pay for the planting of trees
on eligible land which is used for agroforestry
pursuant to sections 252.300 to 252.333. Such
payment shall be limited to expenses which are
determined to be reasonable and necessary by the
director, but shall not exceed seventy-five
percent of the cost of establishment.]
[252.333. The director may make incentive
payments for agroforestry purposes of land
enrolled in this program. The duration of such
payments shall not exceed ten years. The
director may also expend funds to plant trees on
such land. Such expenditures may include both
planting and associated practices as determined
by the director.]
[260.900. As used in sections 260.900 to
260.960, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abandoned dry-cleaning facility", any
real property premises or individual leasehold
space in which a dry-cleaning facility formerly
operated;
(2) "Active dry-cleaning facility", any
real property premises or individual leasehold
274

space in which a dry-cleaning facility currently
operates;
(3) "Chlorinated dry-cleaning solvent",
any dry-cleaning solvent which contains a
compound which has a molecular structure
containing the element chlorine;
(4) "Commission", the hazardous waste
management commission created in section 260.365;
(5) "Corrective action", those activities
described in subsection 1 of section 260.925;
(6) "Corrective action plan", a plan
approved by the director to perform corrective
action at a dry-cleaning facility;
(7) "Department", the Missouri department
of natural resources;
(8) "Director", the director of the
Missouri department of natural resources;
(9) "Dry-cleaning facility", a commercial
establishment that operates, or has operated in
the past in whole or in part for the purpose of
cleaning garments or other fabrics on site
utilizing a process that involves any use of dry-
cleaning solvents. Dry-cleaning facility
includes all contiguous land, structures and
other appurtenances and improvements on the land
used in connection with a dry-cleaning facility
but does not include prisons, governmental
entities, hotels, motels or industrial
laundries. Dry-cleaning facility does include
coin-operated dry-cleaning facilities;
(10) "Dry-cleaning solvent", any and all
nonaqueous solvents used or to be used in the
cleaning of garments and other fabrics at a dry-
cleaning facility and includes but is not
limited to perchloroethylene, also known as
tetrachloroethylene, chlorinated dry-cleaning,
and the products into which such solvents
degrade;
(11) "Dry-cleaning unit", a machine or
device which utilizes dry-cleaning solvents to
clean garments and other fabrics and includes
any associated piping and ancillary equipment
and any containment system;
(12) "Environmental response surcharge",
either the active dry-cleaning facility
275

registration surcharge or the dry-cleaning
solvent surcharge;
(13) "Fund", the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund created in
section 260.920;
(14) "Immediate response to a release",
containment and control of a known release in
excess of a reportable quantity and notification
to the department of any known release in excess
of a reportable quantity;
(15) "Operator", any person who is or has
been responsible for the operation of dry-
cleaning operations at a dry-cleaning facility;
(16) "Owner", any person who owns the real
property where a dry-cleaning facility is or has
operated;
(17) "Person", an individual, trust, firm,
joint venture, consortium, joint-stock company,
corporation, partnership, association or limited
liability company. Person does not include any
governmental organization;
(18) "Release", any spill, leak, emission,
discharge, escape, leak or disposal of dry-
cleaning solvent from a dry-cleaning facility
into the soils or waters of the state;
(19) "Reportable quantity", a known
release of a dry-cleaning solvent deemed
reportable by applicable federal or state law or
regulation.]
[260.905. 1. The commission shall
promulgate and adopt such initial rules and
regulations, effective no later than July 1,
2007, as shall be necessary to carry out the
purposes and provisions of sections 260.900 to
260.960. Prior to the promulgation of such
rules, the commission shall meet with
representatives of the dry-cleaning industry and
other interested parties. The commission,
thereafter, shall promulgate and adopt
additional rules and regulations or change
existing rules and regulations when necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of
sections 260.900 to 260.960.
2. Any rule or regulation adopted pursuant
to sections 260.900 to 260.960 shall be
276

reasonably necessary to protect human health, to
preserve, protect and maintain the water and
other natural resources of this state and to
provide for prompt corrective action of releases
from dry-cleaning facilities. Consistent with
these purposes, the commission shall adopt rules
and regulations, effective no later than July 1,
2007:
(1) Establishing requirements that owners
who close dry-cleaning facilities remove dry-
cleaning solvents and wastes from such
facilities in order to prevent any future
releases;
(2) Establishing criteria to prioritize
the expenditure of funds from the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund. The criteria
shall include consideration of:
(a) The benefit to be derived from
corrective action compared to the cost of
conducting such corrective action;
(b) The degree to which human health and
the environment are actually affected by
exposure to contamination;
(c) The present and future use of an
affected aquifer or surface water;
(d) The effect that interim or immediate
remedial measures will have on future costs; and
(e) Such additional factors as the
commission considers relevant;
(3) Establishing criteria under which a
determination may be made by the department of
the level at which corrective action shall be
deemed completed. Criteria for determining
completion of corrective action shall be based
on the factors set forth in subdivision (2) of
this subsection and:
(a) Individual site characteristics
including natural remediation processes;
(b) Applicable state water quality
standards;
(c) Whether deviation from state water
quality standards or from established criteria
is appropriate, based on the degree to which the
desired remediation level is achievable and may
be reasonably and cost effectively implemented,
subject to the limitation that where a state
277

water quality standard is applicable, a
deviation may not result in the application of
standards more stringent than that standard; and
(d) Such additional factors as the
commission considers relevant.]
[260.910. 1. No person shall:
(1) Operate an active dry-cleaning
facility in violation of sections 260.900 to
260.960, rules and regulations adopted pursuant
to sections 260.900 to 260.960 or orders of the
director pursuant to sections 260.900 to
260.960, or operate an active dry-cleaning
facility in violation of any other applicable
federal or state environmental statutes, rules
or regulations;
(2) Prevent or hinder a properly
identified officer or employee of the department
or other authorized agent of the director from
entering, inspecting, sampling or responding to
a release at reasonable times and with
reasonable advance notice to the operator as
authorized by sections 260.900 to 260.960;
(3) Knowingly make any false material
statement or representation in any record,
report or other document filed, maintained or
used for the purpose of compliance with sections
260.900 to 260.960;
(4) Knowingly destroy, alter or conceal
any record required to be maintained by sections
260.900 to 260.960 or rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960;
(5) Willfully allow a release in excess of
a reportable quantity or knowingly fail to make
an immediate response to a release in accordance
with sections 260.900 to 260.960 and rules and
regulations pursuant to sections 260.900 to
260.960.
2. The director may bring a civil damages
action against any person who violates any
provisions of subsection 1 of this section.
Such civil damages may be assessed in an amount
not to exceed five hundred dollars for each
violation and are in addition to any other
penalty assessed by law.
278

3. In assessing any civil damages pursuant
to this section, a court of competent
jurisdiction shall consider, when applicable,
the following factors:
(1) The extent to which the violation
presents a hazard to human health;
(2) The extent to which the violation has
or may have an adverse effect on the environment;
(3) The amount of the reasonable costs
incurred by the state in detection and
investigation of the violation; and
(4) The economic savings realized by the
person in not complying with the provision for
which a violation is charged.]
[260.915. Each operator of an active dry-
cleaning facility shall register with the
department on a form provided by the department
according to procedures established by the
department by rule.]
[260.920. 1. There is hereby created
within the state treasury a fund to be known as
the "Dry-cleaning Environmental Response Trust
Fund". All moneys received from the
environmental response surcharges, fees, gifts,
bequests, donations and moneys recovered by the
state pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960,
except for any moneys paid under an agreement
with the director or as civil damages, or any
other money so designated shall be deposited in
the state treasury to the credit of the dry-
cleaning environmental response trust fund, and
shall be invested to generate income to the
fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080, the unexpended balance in the dry-
cleaning environmental response trust fund at
the end of each fiscal year shall not be
transferred to the general revenue fund.
2. Moneys in the fund may be expended for
only the following purposes and for no other
governmental purpose:
(1) The direct costs of administration and
enforcement of sections 260.900 to 260.960; and
(2) The costs of corrective action as
provided in section 260.925.
279

3. The state treasurer is authorized to
deposit all of the moneys in the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund in any of the
qualified depositories of the state. All such
deposits shall be secured in such a manner and
shall be made upon such terms and conditions as
are now or may hereafter be provided by law
relative to state deposits. Interest received
on such deposits shall be credited to the dry-
cleaning environmental response trust fund.
4. Any funds received pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960 and deposited in the dry-
cleaning environmental response trust fund shall
not be considered a part of "total state
revenue" as provided in Sections 17 and 18 of
Article X of the Missouri Constitution.]
[260.925. 1. On and after July 1, 2002,
moneys in the fund shall be utilized to address
contamination resulting from releases of dry-
cleaning solvents as provided in sections
260.900 to 260.960. Whenever a release poses a
threat to human health or the environment, the
department, consistent with rules and
regulations adopted by the commission pursuant
to subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 2 of
section 260.905, shall expend moneys available
in the fund to provide for:
(1) Investigation and assessment of a
release from a dry-cleaning facility, including
costs of investigations and assessments of
contamination which may have moved off of the
dry-cleaning facility;
(2) Necessary or appropriate emergency
action, including but not limited to treatment,
restoration or replacement of drinking water
supplies, to assure that the human health or
safety is not threatened by a release or
potential release;
(3) Remediation of releases from dry-
cleaning facilities, including contamination
which may have moved off of the dry-cleaning
facility, which remediation shall consist of the
preparation of a corrective action plan and the
cleanup of affected soil, groundwater and
surface waters, using an alternative that is
280

cost-effective, technologically feasible and
reliable, provides adequate protection of human
health and environment and to the extent
practicable minimizes environmental damage;
(4) Operation and maintenance of
corrective action;
(5) Monitoring of releases from dry-
cleaning facilities including contamination
which may have moved off of the dry-cleaning
facility;
(6) Payment of reasonable costs incurred
by the director in providing field and
laboratory services;
(7) Reasonable costs of restoring property
as nearly as practicable to the condition that
existed prior to activities associated with the
investigation of a release or cleanup or
remediation activities;
(8) Removal and proper disposal of wastes
generated by a release of a dry-cleaning
solvent; and
(9) Payment of costs of corrective action
conducted by the department or by entities other
than the department but approved by the
department, whether or not such corrective
action is set out in a corrective action plan;
except that, there shall be no reimbursement for
corrective action costs incurred before August
28, 2000.
2. Nothing in subsection 1 of this section
shall be construed to authorize the department
to obligate moneys in the fund for payment of
costs that are not integral to corrective action
for a release of dry-cleaning solvents from a
dry-cleaning facility. Moneys from the fund
shall not be used:
(1) For corrective action at sites that
are contaminated by solvents normally used in
dry-cleaning operations where the contamination
did not result from the operation of a dry-
cleaning facility;
(2) For corrective action at sites, other
than dry-cleaning facilities, that are
contaminated by dry-cleaning solvents which were
released while being transported to or from a
dry-cleaning facility;
281

(3) To pay any fine or penalty brought
against a dry-cleaning facility operator under
state or federal law;
(4) To pay any costs related to corrective
action at a dry-cleaning facility that has been
included by the United States Environmental
Protection Agency on the national priorities
list;
(5) For corrective action at sites with
active dry-cleaning facilities where the owner
or operator is not in compliance with sections
260.900 to 260.960, rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960,
orders of the director pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960, or any other applicable
federal or state environmental statutes, rules
or regulations; or
(6) For corrective action at sites with
abandoned dry-cleaning facilities that have been
taken out of operation prior to July 1, 2009,
and not documented by or reported to the
department by July 1, 2009. Any person
reporting such a site to the department shall
include any available evidence that the site
100 once contained a dry-cleaning facility.
101 3. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960
102 shall be construed to restrict the department
103 from temporarily postponing completion of
104 corrective action for which moneys from the fund
105 are being expended whenever such postponement is
106 deemed necessary in order to protect public
107 health and the environment.
108 4. At any multisource site, the department
109 shall utilize the moneys in the fund to pay for
110 the proportionate share of the liability for
111 corrective action costs which is attributable to
112 a release from one or more dry-cleaning
113 facilities and for that proportionate share of
114 the liability only.
115 5. At any multisource site, the director
116 is authorized to make a determination of the
117 relative liability of the fund for costs of
118 corrective action, expressed as a percentage of
119 the total cost of corrective action at a site,
120 whether known or unknown. The director shall
121 issue an order establishing such percentage of
282

122 liability. Such order shall be binding and
123 shall control the obligation of the fund until
124 or unless amended by the director. In the event
125 of an appeal from such order, such percentage of
126 liability shall be controlling for costs
127 incurred during the pendency of the appeal.
128 6. Any authorized officer, employee or
129 agent of the department, or any person under
130 order or contract with the department, may enter
131 onto any property or premises, at reasonable
132 times and with reasonable advance notice to the
133 operator, to take corrective action where the
134 director determines that such action is
135 necessary to protect the public health or
136 environment. If consent is not granted by the
137 operator regarding any request made by any
138 officer, employee or agent of the department, or
139 any person under order or contract with the
140 department, under the provisions of this
141 section, the director may issue an order
142 directing compliance with the request. The
143 order may be issued after such notice and
144 opportunity for consultation as is reasonably
145 appropriate under the circumstances.
146 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of
147 sections 260.900 to 260.960, in the discretion
148 of the director, an operator may be responsible
149 for up to one hundred percent of the costs of
150 corrective action attributable to such operator
151 if the director finds, after notice and an
152 opportunity for a hearing in accordance with
153 chapter 536 that:
154 (1) Requiring the operator to bear such
155 responsibility will not prejudice another owner,
156 operator or person who is eligible, pursuant to
157 the provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960,
158 to have corrective action costs paid by the
159 fund; and
160 (2) The operator:
161 (a) Caused a release in excess of a
162 reportable quantity by willful or wanton actions
163 and such release was caused by operating
164 practices in violation of existing laws and
165 regulations at the time of the release; or
283

166 (b) Is in arrears for moneys owed pursuant
167 to sections 260.900 to 260.960, after notice and
168 an opportunity to correct the arrearage; or
169 (c) Materially obstructs the efforts of
170 the department to carry out its obligations
171 pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960; except
172 that, the exercise of legal rights shall not
173 constitute a substantial obstruction; or
174 (d) Caused or allowed a release in excess
175 of a reportable quantity because of a willful
176 material violation of sections 260.900 to
177 260.960 or the rules and regulations adopted by
178 the commission pursuant to sections 260.900 to
179 260.960.
180 8. For purposes of subsection 7 of this
181 section, unless a transfer is made to take
182 advantage of the provisions of subsection 7 of
183 this section, purchasers of stock or other
184 indicia of ownership and other successors in
185 interest shall not be considered to be the same
186 owner or operator as the seller or transferor of
187 such stock or indicia of ownership even though
188 there may be no change in the legal identity of
189 the owner or operator. To the extent that an
190 owner or operator is responsible for corrective
191 action costs pursuant to subsection 7 of this
192 section, such owner or operator shall not be
193 entitled to the exemption provided in subsection
194 5 of section 260.930.
195 9. The fund shall not be liable for the
196 payment of costs in excess of one million
197 dollars at any one contaminated dry-cleaning
198 site. Additionally, the fund shall not be
199 liable for the payment of costs for any one site
200 in excess of twenty-five percent of the total
201 moneys in the fund during any fiscal year. For
202 purposes of this subsection, "contaminated dry-
203 cleaning site" means the areal extent of soil or
204 ground water contaminated with dry-cleaning
205 solvents.
206 10. The owner or operator of an active dry-
207 cleaning facility shall be liable for the first
208 twenty-five thousand dollars of corrective
209 action costs incurred because of a release from
210 an active dry-cleaning facility. The owner of
211 an abandoned dry-cleaning facility shall be
284

212 liable for the first twenty-five thousand
213 dollars of corrective action costs incurred
214 because of a release from an abandoned dry-
215 cleaning facility. Nothing in this subsection
216 shall be construed to prohibit the department
217 from taking corrective action because the
218 department cannot obtain the deductible.]
[260.930. 1. Neither the state of
Missouri, the fund, the commission, the director
nor the department or agent or employees thereof
shall be liable for loss of business, damages or
taking of property associated with any
corrective action taken pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960.
2. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960
shall establish or create any liability or
responsibility on the part of the commission,
the director, the department or the state of
Missouri, or agents or employees thereof, to pay
any corrective action costs from any source
other than the fund or to take corrective action
if the moneys in the fund are insufficient to do
so.
3. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960
shall be construed to abrogate or limit any
right, remedy, causes of action, or claim by any
person sustaining personal injury or property
damage as a result of any release from a dry-
cleaning facility, nor shall anything in
sections 260.900 to 260.960 be construed to
abrogate or limit any liability of any person in
any way responsible for any release from a dry-
cleaning facility or any damages for personal
injury or property damages caused by such a
release.
4. Moneys in the fund shall not be used
for compensating third parties for bodily injury
or property damage caused by a release from a
dry-cleaning facility, other than property
damage included in the corrective action plan
approved by the director.
5. To the extent that an operator, owner
or other person is eligible pursuant to the
provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960 to
have corrective action costs paid by the fund,
285

no administrative or judicial claim may be made
under state law against any such operator, owner
or other person by or on behalf of a state or
local government or by any person to either
compel corrective action at the dry-cleaning
facility site or seek recovery of the costs of
corrective action at the dry-cleaning facility
which result from the release of dry-cleaning
solvents from that dry-cleaning facility or to
compel corrective action or seek recovery of the
costs of corrective action which result from the
release of dry-cleaning solvents from a dry-
cleaning facility. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply to any dry-cleaning
facility or dry-cleaning facility site which has
been included in a corrective action plan
approved by the director. The director shall
only approve a corrective action plan after
making a determination that a sufficient balance
in the fund exists to implement the plan. No
administrative or judicial claim may be made
unless the director has rejected the corrective
action plan submitted pursuant to section
260.925.]
[260.935. 1. Every active dry-cleaning
facility shall pay, in addition to any other
environmental response surcharges, an annual dry-
cleaning facility registration surcharge as
follows:
(1) Five hundred dollars for facilities
which use no more than one hundred forty gallons
of chlorinated solvents;
(2) One thousand dollars for facilities
which use more than one hundred forty gallons of
chlorinated solvents and less than three hundred
sixty gallons of chlorinated solvents per year;
and
(3) Fifteen hundred dollars for facilities
which use at least three hundred sixty gallons
of chlorinated solvents per year.
2. The active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by this section
shall be reported and paid to the department on
an annual basis. The commission shall prescribe
286

by administrative rule the procedure for the
report and payment required by this section.
3. The department shall provide each
person who pays a dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge pursuant to this section
with a receipt. The receipt or the copy of the
receipt shall be produced for inspection at the
request of any authorized representative of the
department.
4. All moneys collected or received by the
department pursuant to this section shall be
transmitted to the department of revenue for
deposit in the state treasury to the credit of
the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund created in section 260.920. Following each
annual reporting date, the state treasurer shall
certify the amount deposited in the fund to the
department.
5. If any person does not pay the active
dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge or
any portion of the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by this section
by the date prescribed for such payment, the
department shall impose and such person shall
pay, in addition to the active dry-cleaning
facility registration surcharge owed by such
person, a penalty of fifteen percent of the
active dry-cleaning facility registration
surcharge. Such penalty shall be deposited in
the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund.
6. If any person does not pay the active
dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge or
any portion of the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by this section
by the date prescribed for such payment, the
department shall also impose interest upon the
unpaid amount at the rate of ten percent per
annum from the date prescribed for the payment
of such surcharge and penalties until payment is
actually made. Such interest shall be deposited
in the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund.]
[260.940. 1. Every seller or provider of
dry-cleaning solvent for use in this state shall
287

pay, in addition to any other environmental
response surcharges, a dry-cleaning solvent
surcharge on the sale or provision of dry-
cleaning solvent.
2. The amount of the dry-cleaning solvent
surcharge imposed by this section on each gallon
of dry-cleaning solvent shall be an amount equal
to the product of the solvent factor for the dry-
cleaning solvent and the rate of eight dollars
per gallon.
3. The solvent factor for each dry-
cleaning solvent is as follows:
(1) For perchloroethylene, the solvent
factor is 1.00;
(2) For 1,1,1-trichloroethane, the solvent
factor is 1.00; and
(3) For other chlorinated dry-cleaning
solvents, the solvent factor is 1.00.
4. In the case of a fraction of a gallon,
the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by
this section shall be the same fraction of the
fee imposed on a whole gallon.
5. The dry-cleaning solvent surcharge
required in this section shall be paid to the
department by the seller or provider of the dry-
cleaning solvent, regardless of the location of
such seller or provider.
6. The dry-cleaning solvent surcharge
required in this section shall be paid by the
seller or provider on a quarterly basis and
shall be paid to the department for the previous
quarter. The commission shall prescribe by
administrative rule the procedure for the
payment required by this section.
7. The department shall provide each
person who pays a dry-cleaning solvent surcharge
pursuant to this section with a receipt. The
receipt or the copy of the receipt shall be
produced for inspection at the request of any
authorized representative of the department.
8. All moneys collected or received by the
department pursuant to this section shall be
transmitted to the department of revenue for
deposit in the state treasury to the credit of
the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund created in section 260.920. Following each
288

annual or quarterly reporting date, the state
treasurer shall certify the amount deposited to
the department.
9. If any seller or provider of dry-
cleaning solvent fails or refuses to pay the dry-
cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by this
section, the department shall impose and such
seller or provider shall pay, in addition to the
dry-cleaning solvent surcharge owed by the
seller or provider, a penalty of fifteen percent
of the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge. Such
penalty shall be deposited in the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund.
10. If any person does not pay the dry-
cleaning solvent surcharge or any portion of the
dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by this
section by the date prescribed for such payment,
the department shall impose and such person
shall pay interest upon the unpaid amount at the
rate of ten percent per annum from the date
prescribed for the payment of such surcharge and
penalties until payment is actually made. Such
interest shall be deposited in the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund.
11. An operator of a dry-cleaning facility
shall not purchase or obtain solvent from a
seller or provider who does not pay the dry-
cleaning solvent charge, as provided in this
section. Any operator of a dry-cleaning
facility who fails to obey the provisions of
this section shall be required to pay the dry-
cleaning solvent surcharge as provided in
subsections 2, 3 and 4 of this section for any
dry-cleaning solvent purchased or obtained from
a seller or provider who fails to pay the proper
dry-cleaning solvent surcharge as determined by
the department. Any operator of a dry-cleaning
facility who fails to follow the provisions of
this subsection shall also be charged a penalty
of fifteen percent of the dry-cleaning solvent
surcharge owed. Any operator of a dry-cleaning
facility who fails to obey the provisions of
this subsection shall also be subject to the
interest provisions of subsection 10 of this
section. If a seller or provider of dry-
cleaning solvent charges the operator of a dry-
289

cleaning facility the dry-cleaning solvent
surcharge provided for in this section when the
solvent is purchased or obtained by the operator
and the operator can prove that the operator
made full payment of the surcharge to the seller
100 or provider but the seller or provider fails to
101 pay the surcharge to the department as required
102 by this section, then the operator shall not be
103 liable pursuant to this subsection for interest,
104 penalties or the seller's or provider's unpaid
105 surcharge. Such surcharges, penalties and
106 interest shall be collected by the department,
107 and all moneys collected pursuant to this
108 subsection shall be deposited in the dry-
109 cleaning environmental response trust fund.]
[260.945. 1. If the unobligated principal
of the fund equals or exceeds five million
dollars on April first of any year, the active
dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge
imposed by section 260.935 and the dry-cleaning
solvent surcharge imposed by section 260.940
shall not be collected on or after the next July
first until such time as on April first of any
year thereafter the unobligated principal
balance of the fund equals two million dollars
or less, then the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by section
260.935 and the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge
imposed by section 260.940 shall again be
collected on and after the next July first.
2. Not later than April fifth of each
year, the state treasurer shall notify the
department of the amount of the unobligated
balance of the fund on April first of such
year. Upon receipt of the notice, the
department shall notify the public if the active
dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge
imposed by section 260.935 and the dry-cleaning
solvent surcharge imposed by section 260.940
will terminate or be payable on the following
July first.
3. Moneys in the fund shall not be
expended pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960
prior to July 1, 2002.]
290

[260.950. 1. All final orders and
determinations of the commission or the
department made pursuant to the provisions of
sections 260.900 to 260.960 are subject to
judicial review pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 536. All final orders and
determinations shall be deemed administrative
decisions as that term is defined in chapter
536; provided that, no judicial review shall be
available, unless all administrative remedies
are exhausted.
2. In any suit filed pursuant to section
536.050 concerning the validity of the
commission's or department's standards, rules or
regulations, the court shall review the record
made before the commission or department to
determine the validity and such reasonableness
of such standards, rules or regulations and may
hear such additional evidence as it deems
necessary.]
[260.955. The department shall annually
transmit a report to the general assembly and
the governor regarding:
(1) Receipts of the fund during the
preceding calendar year and the sources of the
receipts;
(2) Disbursements from the fund during the
preceding calendar year and the purposes of the
disbursements;
(3) The extent of corrective action taken
pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960 during
the preceding calendar year; and
(4) The prioritization of sites for
expenditures from the fund.]
[260.960. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
291

held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after the effective date of this act
shall be invalid and void.]
[260.965. The provisions of sections
260.900 to 260.965 shall expire August 28, 2017.]
[301.213. 1. Notwithstanding the
provisions of sections 301.200 and 301.210, any
person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer under
sections 301.550 to 301.580 that has provided to
the director of revenue a surety bond or
irrevocable letter of credit in an amount not
less than one hundred thousand dollars in a form
which complies with the requirements of section
301.560 and in lieu of the fifty thousand dollar
bond otherwise required for licensure as a motor
vehicle dealer shall be authorized to purchase
or accept in trade any motor vehicle for which
there has been issued a certificate of
ownership, and to receive such vehicle subject
to any existing liens thereon created and
perfected under sections 301.600 to 301.660
provided the licensed dealer receives the
following:
(1) A signed written contract between the
licensed dealer and the owner of the vehicle
outlining the terms of the sale or acceptance in
trade of such motor vehicle without transfer of
the certificate of ownership; and
(2) Physical delivery of the vehicle to
the licensed dealer; and
(3) A power of attorney from the owner to
the licensed dealer, in accordance with
subsection 4 of section 301.300, authorizing the
licensed dealer to obtain a duplicate or
replacement title in the owner's name and sign
any title assignments on the owner's behalf.
2. If the dealer complies with the
requirements of subsection 1 of this section,
the sale or trade of the vehicle to the dealer
shall be considered final, subject to any
existing liens created and perfected under
sections 301.600 to 301.660. Once the prior
owner of the motor vehicle has physically
delivered the motor vehicle to the licensed
292

dealer, the prior owners' insurable interest in
such vehicle shall cease to exist.
3. If a licensed dealer complies with the
requirements of subsection 1 of this section,
and such dealer has provided to the director of
revenue a surety bond or irrevocable letter of
credit in amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars in a form which complies with
the requirements of section 301.560 and in lieu
of the fifty thousand dollar bond otherwise
required for licensure as a motor vehicle
dealer, such dealer may sell such vehicle prior
to receiving and assigning to the purchaser the
certificate of ownership, provided such dealer
complies with the following:
(1) All outstanding liens created on the
vehicle pursuant to sections 301.600 to 301.660
have been paid in full, and the dealer provides
a copy of proof or other evidence to the
purchaser; and
(2) The dealer has obtained proof or other
evidence from the department of revenue
confirming that no outstanding child support
liens exist upon the vehicle at the time of sale
and provides a copy of said proof or other
evidence to the purchaser; and
(3) The dealer has obtained proof or other
evidence from the department of revenue
confirming that all applicable state sales tax
has been satisfied on the sale of the vehicle to
the previous owner and provides a copy of said
proof or other evidence to the purchaser; and
(4) The dealer has signed an application
for duplicate or replacement title for the
vehicle under subsection 4 of section 301.300
and provides a copy of the application to the
purchaser, along with a copy of the power of
attorney required by subsection 1 of this
section, and the dealer has prepared and
delivered to the purchaser an application for
title for the vehicle in the purchaser's name;
and
(5) The dealer and the purchaser have
entered into a written agreement for the
subsequent assignment and delivery of such
certificate of ownership, on a form prescribed
293

by the director of revenue, to take place at a
time, not to exceed sixty calendar days, after
the time of delivery of the motor vehicle to the
purchaser. Such agreement shall require the
purchaser to provide to the dealer proof of
financial responsibility in accordance with
chapter 303 and proof of comprehensive and
collision coverage on the motor vehicle. Such
dealer shall maintain the original or an
electronic copy of the signed agreement and
deliver a copy of the signed agreement to the
purchaser. Such dealer shall also complete and
deliver to the director of revenue such form as
the director shall prescribe demonstrating that
100 the purchaser has purchased the vehicle without
101 contemporaneous delivery of the title.
102 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
103 contrary, completion of the requirements of this
104 subsection shall constitute prima facie evidence
105 of an ownership interest vested in the purchaser
106 of the vehicle for all purposes other than for a
107 subsequent transfer of ownership of the vehicle
108 by the purchaser, subject to the rights of any
109 secured lienholder of record; however, the
110 purchaser may use the dealer-supplied copy of
111 the agreement to transfer his or her ownership
112 of the vehicle to an insurance company in
113 situations where the vehicle has been declared
114 salvage or a total loss by the insurance company
115 as a result of a settlement of a claim. Such
116 insurance company may apply for a salvage
117 certificate of title or junking certificate
118 pursuant to the provisions of subsection 3 of
119 section 301.193 in order to transfer its
120 interest in such vehicle. The purchaser may
121 also use the dealer-supplied copy of the
122 agreement on the form prescribed by the director
123 of revenue as proof of ownership interest. Any
124 lender or insurance company may rely upon a copy
125 of the signed written agreement on the form
126 prescribed by the director of revenue as proof
127 of ownership interest. Any lien placed upon a
128 vehicle based upon such signed written agreement
129 shall be valid and enforceable, notwithstanding
130 the absence of a certificate of ownership.
294

131 4. Following a sale or other transaction
132 in which a certificate of ownership has not been
133 assigned from the owner to the licensed dealer,
134 the dealer shall, within ten business days,
135 apply for a duplicate or replacement certificate
136 of ownership. Upon receipt of a duplicate or
137 replacement certificate of ownership applied for
138 under subsection 4 of section 301.300, the
139 dealer shall assign and deliver said certificate
140 of ownership to the purchaser of the vehicle
141 within five business days. The dealer shall
142 maintain proof of the assignment and delivery of
143 the certificate of ownership to the purchaser.
144 For purposes of this subsection, a dealer shall
145 be deemed to have delivered the certificate of
146 ownership to the purchaser upon either:
147 (1) Physical delivery of the certificate
148 of ownership to any of the purchasers identified
149 in the contract with such dealer; or
150 (2) Mailing of the certificate, postage
151 prepaid, return receipt requested, to any of the
152 purchasers at any of their addresses identified
153 in the contract with such dealer.
154 5. If a licensed dealer fails to comply
155 with subsection 3 of this section, and the
156 purchaser of the vehicle is thereby damaged,
157 then the dealer shall be liable to the purchaser
158 of the vehicle for actual damages, plus court
159 costs and reasonable attorney fees.
160 6. If a licensed dealer fails or is unable
161 to comply with subsection 4 of this section, and
162 the purchaser of the vehicle is thereby damaged,
163 then the dealer shall be liable to the purchaser
164 of the vehicle for actual damages, plus court
165 costs and reasonable attorney fees. If the
166 dealer cannot be found by the purchaser after
167 making reasonable attempts, or if the dealer
168 fails to assign and deliver the duplicate or
169 replacement certificate of ownership to the
170 purchaser by the date agreed upon by the dealer
171 and the purchaser, as required by subsection 4
172 of this section, then the purchaser may deliver
173 to the director a copy of the contract for sale
174 of the vehicle, a copy of the application for
175 duplicate title provided by the dealer to the
176 purchaser, a copy of the secure power of
295

177 attorney allowing the dealer to assign the
178 duplicate title, and the proof or other evidence
179 obtained by the purchaser from the dealer under
180 subsection 3 of this section. Thereafter, the
181 director shall mail by certified mail, return
182 receipt requested, a notice to the dealer at the
183 last address given to the department by that
184 dealer. That notice shall inform the dealer
185 that the director intends to cancel any prior
186 certificate of title which may have been issued
187 to the dealer on the vehicle and issue to the
188 purchaser a certificate of title in the name of
189 the purchaser, subject to any liens incurred by
190 the purchaser in connection with the purchase of
191 the vehicle, unless the dealer, within ten
192 business days from the date of the director's
193 notice, files with the director a written
194 objection to the director taking such action.
195 If the dealer does file a timely, written
196 objection with the director, then the director
197 shall not take any further action without an
198 order from a court of competent jurisdiction.
199 However, if the dealer does not file a timely,
200 written objection with the director, then the
201 director shall cancel the prior certificate of
202 title issued to the dealer on the vehicle and
203 issue a certificate of title to the purchaser of
204 the vehicle, subject to any liens incurred by
205 the purchaser in connection with the purchase of
206 the vehicle and subject to the purchaser
207 satisfying all applicable taxes and fees
208 associated with registering the vehicle.
209 7. If a seller misrepresents to a dealer
210 that the seller is the owner of a vehicle and
211 the dealer, the owner, any subsequent purchaser,
212 or any prior or subsequent lienholder is thereby
213 damaged, then the seller shall be liable to each
214 such party for actual and punitive damages, plus
215 court costs and reasonable attorney fees.
216 8. When a lienholder is damaged as a
217 result of a licensed dealer's acts, errors,
218 omissions, or violations of this section, then
219 the dealer shall be liable to the lienholder for
220 actual damages, plus court costs and reasonable
221 attorney fees.
296

222 9. No court costs or attorney fees shall
223 be awarded under this section unless, prior to
224 filing any such action, the following conditions
225 have been met:
226 (1) The aggrieved party seeking damages
227 has delivered an itemized written demand of the
228 party's actual damages to the party from whom
229 damages are sought; and
230 (2) The party from whom damages are sought
231 has not satisfied the written demand within
232 thirty days after receipt of the written demand.
233 10. The department of revenue may use a
234 dealer's repeated or intentional violation of
235 this section as a cause to suspend, revoke, or
236 refuse to issue or renew any license required
237 pursuant to sections 301.550 to 301.580, in
238 addition to the causes set forth in section
239 301.562. The hearing process shall be the same
240 as that established in subsection 6 of section
241 301.562.
242 11. No dealer shall enter into a contract
243 under this section after December 31, 2020. Any
244 contract entered into prior to December 31,
245 2020, shall be enforceable as provided in this
246 section. This section shall be repealed
247 effective December 31, 2020.]
[319.140. 1. There is established a task
force of the general assembly to be known as the
"Task Force on the Petroleum Storage Tank
Insurance Fund". Such task force shall be
composed of eight members. Three members shall
be from the house of representatives with two
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one appointed by the
minority floor leader of the house of
representatives. Three members shall be from
the senate with two appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate and one appointed by
the minority floor leader of the senate. Two
members shall be industry stakeholders with one
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate. No more
than two members from either the house of
representatives or the senate shall be from the
297

same political party. A majority of the task
force shall constitute a quorum.
2. The task force shall conduct research
and compile a report for delivery to the general
assembly by December 31, 2018, on the following:
(1) The efficacy of the petroleum storage
tank insurance fund and program;
(2) The sustainability of the petroleum
storage tank insurance fund and program;
(3) The administration of the petroleum
storage tank insurance fund and program;
(4) The availability of private insurance
for above- and below-ground petroleum storage
tanks, and the necessity of insurance subsidies
created through the petroleum storage tank
insurance program;
(5) Compliance with federal programs,
regulations, and advisory reports; and
(6) The comparability of the petroleum
storage tank insurance program to other states'
programs and states without such programs.
3. The task force shall meet within thirty
days after its creation and organize by
selecting a chairperson and vice chairperson,
one of whom shall be a member of the senate and
the other a member of the house of
representatives. Thereafter, the task force may
meet as often as necessary in order to
accomplish the tasks assigned to it.
4. The task force shall be staffed by
legislative staff as necessary to assist the
task force in the performance of its duties.
5. The members of the task force shall
serve without compensation but shall be entitled
to reimbursement for actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their
official duties.
6. This section shall expire on December
31, 2018.]
[320.093. 1. Any person, firm or
corporation who purchases a dry fire hydrant, as
defined in section 320.273, or provides an
acceptable means of water storage for such dry
fire hydrant including a pond, tank or other
storage facility with the primary purpose of
298

fire protection within the state of Missouri,
shall be eligible for a credit on income taxes
otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143, except
sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to
implement safe and efficient fire protection
controls. The tax credit, not to exceed five
thousand dollars, shall be equal to fifty
percent of the cost in actual expenditure for
any new water storage construction, equipment,
development and installation of the dry hydrant,
including pipes, valves, hydrants and labor for
each such installation of a dry hydrant or new
water storage facility. The amount of the tax
credit claimed for in-kind contributions shall
not exceed twenty-five percent of the total
amount of the contribution for which the tax
credit is claimed.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the
tax due shall not be refunded but may be carried
over to any subsequent taxable year, not to
exceed seven years. The person, firm or
corporation may elect to assign to a third party
the approved tax credit. The certificate of
assignment and other appropriate forms shall be
filed with the Missouri department of revenue
and the department of economic development.
3. The person, firm or corporation shall
make application for the credit to the
department of economic development after
receiving approval of the state fire marshal.
The fire marshal shall establish by rule
promulgated pursuant to chapter 536 the
requirements to be met based on the National
Resources Conservation Service's Dry Hydrant
Standard. The state fire marshal or designated
local representative shall review and authorize
the construction and installation of any dry
fire hydrant site. Only approved dry fire
hydrant sites shall be eligible for tax credits
as indicated in this section. Under no
circumstance shall such authority deny any
entity the ability to provide a dry fire hydrant
site when tax credits are not requested.
4. The department of public safety shall
certify to the department of revenue that the
dry hydrant system meets the requirements to
299

obtain a tax credit as specified in subsection 5
of this section.
5. In order to qualify for a tax credit
under this section, a dry hydrant or new water
storage facility shall meet the following
minimum requirements:
(1) Each body of water or water storage
structure shall be able to provide two hundred
fifty gallons per minute for a continuous two-
hour period during a fifty-year drought or
freeze at a vertical lift of eighteen feet;
(2) Each dry hydrant shall be located
within twenty-five feet of an all-weather
roadway and shall be accessible to fire
protection equipment;
(3) Dry hydrants shall be located a
reasonable distance from other dry or
pressurized hydrants; and
(4) The site shall provide a measurable
economic improvement potential for rural
development.
6. New credits shall not be awarded under
this section after August 28, 2010. The total
amount of all tax credits allowed pursuant to
this section is five hundred thousand dollars in
any one fiscal year as approved by the director
of the department of economic development.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be invalid
and void.]
[332.304. The specific duties of the
committee shall include the following:
300

(1) Designing a training program for
dental hygienists which allows coursework to be
completed off-site from the educational
institution, and clinical and didactic training
to be delivered in the office of a dentist
licensed under this chapter, if such offsite
dental office is a part of an accredited dental
hygiene program through the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association
as an extended campus facility or any other
facility approved by the council on dental
accreditation;
(2) Developing suggestions for the
creation of a contract between the department
and an institution of higher education to
establish the training program designed under
subdivision (1) of this section;
(3) Analyzing issues relating to the
curriculum, funding, and administration of the
training program designed under subdivision (1)
of this section; and
(4) On or before November 1, 2005,
delivering to both houses of the general
assembly and the governor a report on the
training program designed under subdivision (1)
of this section and any suggestions developed
and analysis made under subdivisions (2) and (3)
of this section.]
[332.305. The committee shall dissolve
upon delivery of the report required under
subdivision (4) of section 332.304.]
[334.153. 1. No person other than a
physician licensed under this chapter shall
perform the following interventions in the
course of diagnosing or treating pain which is
chronic, persistent and intractable, or occurs
outside of a surgical, obstetrical, or
postoperative course of care:
(1) Ablation of targeted nerves;
(2) Percutaneous precision needle
placement within the spinal column with
placement of drugs, such as local anesthetics,
steroids, and analgesics, in the spinal column
under fluoroscopic guidance. The provisions of
this subdivision shall not apply to interlaminar
301

lumbar epidural injections performed in a
hospital as defined in section 197.020 or an
ambulatory surgery center as defined in section
197.200 if the standard of care for Medicare
reimbursement for interlaminar or translaminar
lumbar epidural injections is changed after
August 28, 2012, to allow reimbursement only
with the use of image guidance; or
(3) Laser or endoscopic discectomy, or the
surgical placement of intrathecal infusion
pumps, and or spinal cord stimulators.
2. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to prohibit or restrict the
performance of surgical or obstetrical
anesthesia services or postoperative pain
control by a certified registered nurse
anesthetist pursuant to subsection 7 of section
334.104 or by an anesthesiologist assistant
licensed pursuant to sections 334.400 to 334.434.
3. The state board of registration for the
healing arts may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section, except that such
authority shall not apply to rulemaking
authority to define or regulate the scope of
practice of certified registered nurse
anesthetists. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or
to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2012, shall be invalid
and void.
4. The provisions of this section shall
automatically expire four years after August 28,
2012, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly.]
302

[334.1135. 1. There is hereby established
a joint task force to be known as the "Joint
Task Force on Radiologic Technologist Licensure".
2. The task force shall be composed of the
following:
(1) Two members of the senate, one of whom
shall be appointed by the president pro tempore
and one by the minority leader of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of
representatives, one of whom shall be appointed
by the speaker and one by the minority leader of
the house of representatives;
(3) A clinic administrator, or his or her
designee, appointed by the Missouri Association
of Rural Health Clinics;
(4) A physician appointed by the Missouri
State Medical Association;
(5) A pain management physician appointed
by the Missouri Society of Anesthesiologists;
(6) A radiologic technologist appointed by
the Missouri Society of Radiologic Technologists;
(7) A nuclear medicine technologist
appointed by the Missouri Valley Chapter of the
Society of Nuclear Medicine and Molecular
Imaging;
(8) An administrator of an ambulatory
surgical center appointed by the Missouri
Ambulatory Surgical Center Association;
(9) A physician appointed by the Missouri
Academy of Family Physicians;
(10) A certified registered nurse
anesthetist appointed by the Missouri
Association of Nurse Anesthetists;
(11) A physician appointed by the Missouri
Radiological Society;
(12) The director of the Missouri state
board of registration for the healing arts, or
his or her designee; and
(13) The director of the Missouri state
board of nursing, or his or her designee.
3. The task force shall review the current
status of licensure of radiologic technologists
in Missouri and shall develop a plan to address
the most appropriate method to protect public
safety when radiologic imaging and radiologic
procedures are utilized. The plan shall include:
303

(1) An analysis of the risks associated if
radiologic technologists are not licensed;
(2) The creation of a Radiologic Imaging
and Radiation Therapy Advisory Commission;
(3) Procedures to address the specific
needs of rural health care and the availability
of licensed radiologic technologists;
(4) Requirements for licensure of
radiographers, radiation therapists, nuclear
medicine technologists, nuclear medicine
advanced associates, radiologist assistants, and
limited x-ray machine operators;
(5) Reasonable exemptions to licensure;
(6) Continuing education and training;
(7) Penalty provisions; and
(8) Other items that the task force deems
relevant for the proper determination of
licensure of radiologic technologists in
Missouri.
4. The task force shall meet within thirty
days of its creation and select a chair and vice
chair. A majority of the task force shall
constitute a quorum, but the concurrence of a
majority of total members shall be required for
the determination of any matter within the task
force's duties.
5. The task force shall be staffed by
legislative personnel as is deemed necessary to
assist the task force in the performance of its
duties.
6. The members of the task force shall
serve without compensation, but may, subject to
appropriation, be entitled to reimbursement for
actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their official duties.
7. The task force shall submit a full
report of its activities, including the plan
developed under subsection 3 of this section, to
the general assembly on or before January 15,
2020. The task force shall send copies of the
report to the director of the division of
professional registration.]
[338.320. 1. There is hereby established
the "Missouri Electronic Prior Authorization
Committee" in order to facilitate, monitor, and
304

report to the general assembly on Missouri-based
efforts to contribute to the establishment of
national electronic prior authorization
standards. Such efforts shall include the
Missouri-based electronic prior authorization
pilot program established under subsection 5 of
this section and the study and dissemination of
information by the committee of the efforts of
the National Council on Prescription Drug
Programs (NCPDP) to develop national electronic
prior authorization standards. The committee
shall advise the general assembly and the
department of commerce and insurance as to
whether there is a need for administrative rules
to be promulgated by the department of commerce
and insurance as soon as practically possible.
2. The Missouri electronic prior
authorization committee shall consist of the
following members:
(1) Two members of the senate, appointed
by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(3) One member from an organization of
licensed physicians in the state;
(4) One member who is a physician licensed
in Missouri pursuant to chapter 334;
(5) One member who is a representative of
a Missouri pharmacy benefit management company;
(6) One member from an organization
representing licensed pharmacists in the state;
(7) One member from the business community
representing businesses on health insurance
issues;
(8) One member from an organization
representing the leading research-based
pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies;
(9) One member from an organization
representing the largest generic pharmaceutical
trade association;
(10) One patient advocate;
(11) One member from an electronic
prescription network that facilitates the secure
electronic exchange of clinical information
between physicians, pharmacies, payers, and
305

pharmacy benefit managers and other health care
providers;
(12) One member from a Missouri-based
electronic health records company;
(13) One member from an organization
representing the largest number of hospitals in
the state;
(14) One member from a health carrier as
such term is defined under section 376.1350;
(15) One member from an organization
representing the largest number of health
carriers in the state, as such term is defined
under section 376.1350;
(16) The director of the department of
social services, or the director's designee;
(17) The director of the department of
commerce and insurance, who shall be chair of
the committee.
3. All of the members, except for the
members from the general assembly, shall be
appointed by the governor no later than
September 1, 2012, with the advice and consent
of the senate. The staff of the department of
commerce and insurance shall provide assistance
to the committee.
4. The duties of the committee shall be as
follows:
(1) Before February 1, 2019, monitor and
report to the general assembly on the Missouri-
based electronic prior authorization pilot
program created under subsection 5 of this
section including a report of the outcomes and
best practices developed as a result of the
pilot program and how such information can be
used to inform the national standard-setting
process;
(2) Obtain specific updates from the NCPDP
and other pharmacy benefit managers and vendors
that are currently engaged in pilot programs
working toward national electronic prior
authorization standards;
(3) Correspond and collaborate with the
NCPDP and other such pilots through the exchange
of information and ideas;
(4) Assist, when asked by the pharmacy
benefit manager, with the development of the
306

pilot program created under subsection 5 of this
section with an understanding of information on
the success and failures of other pilot programs
across the country;
100 (5) Prepare a report at the end of each
101 calendar year to be distributed to the general
102 assembly and governor with a summary of the
103 committee's progress and plans for the next
104 calendar year, including a report on Missouri-
105 based efforts to contribute to the establishment
106 of national electronic prior authorization
107 standards. Such annual report shall continue
108 until such time as the NCPDP has established
109 national electronic prior authorization
110 standards or this section has expired, whichever
111 is sooner. The first report shall be completed
112 before January 1, 2013;
113 (6) Upon the adoption of national
114 electronic prior authorization standards by the
115 NCPDP, prepare a final report to be distributed
116 to the general assembly and governor that
117 identifies the appropriate Missouri
118 administrative regulations, if any, that will
119 need to be promulgated by the department of
120 commerce and insurance, in order to make those
121 standards effective as soon as practically
122 possible, and advise the general assembly and
123 governor if there are any legislative actions
124 necessary to the furtherance of that end.
125 5. The department of commerce and
126 insurance and the Missouri electronic prior
127 authorization committee shall recruit a Missouri-
128 based pharmacy benefits manager doing business
129 nationally to volunteer to conduct an electronic
130 prior authorization pilot program in Missouri.
131 The pharmacy benefits manager conducting the
132 pilot program shall ensure that there are
133 adequate Missouri licensed physicians and an
134 electronic prior authorization vendor capable
135 and willing to participate in a Missouri-based
136 pilot program. Such pilot program established
137 under this section shall be operational by
138 January 1, 2014. The department and the
139 committee may provide advice or assistance to
140 the pharmacy benefit manager conducting the
307

141 pilot program but shall not maintain control or
142 lead with the direction of the pilot program.
143 6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the
144 Missouri sunset act:
145 (1) The provisions of the new program
146 authorized under this section shall sunset
147 automatically six years after August 28, 2012,
148 unless reauthorized by an act of the general
149 assembly; and
150 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
151 program authorized under this section shall
152 sunset automatically twelve years after the
153 effective date of the reauthorization of this
154 section; and
155 (3) This section shall terminate on
156 September first of the calendar year immediately
157 following the calendar year in which the program
158 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[354.215. The provisions of sections
374.261 to 374.269, which relate to the
insurance examiner's sick leave fund, shall
apply to health services corporations certified
to operate in this state in the same manner as
these sections now apply to those domestic
insurers which pay a premium tax and are engaged
in the business of insurance within this state.
The provisions of sections 374.261 to 374.269
shall also apply to examiners of the department
of commerce and insurance conducting
examinations under section 354.190 in the same
manner as these sections now apply to examiners
of the department of commerce and insurance
conducting examinations under section 374.190.]
[374.007. 1. The revisor of statutes
shall change all references in the revised
statutes of Missouri from "department of
insurance", "insurance department" or
"department of insurance, financial and
professional regulation" to "department of
insurance, financial institutions and
professional registration".
2. The revisor of statutes shall change
all references in the revised statutes of
Missouri from "director of insurance" or
"commissioner of insurance" to "director of the
308

department of insurance, financial institutions
and professional registration".]
[375.355. 1. Any insurance company
organized under the laws of this state may
hereafter, with the approval of the director
first obtained,
(1) Organize any subsidiary insurance
company in which it shall own and hold not less
than a majority of the common stock; or
(2) Acquire control of another insurance
company by purchase, merger or otherwise,
regardless of the domicile of any company so
organized or acquired, for the purpose of
operating any such company under a plan of
common control.
2. Whenever any insurance company shall
propose under the provisions of this section to
acquire control of another insurance company by
purchase, merger or otherwise or to dispose of
any stock so purchased or so acquired, it shall
present its petition to the director setting
forth the terms and conditions of the proposed
acquisition or disposition and praying for the
approval of the acquisition or disposition. The
director shall thereupon issue an order of
notice, requiring notice to be given, to the
policyholders of a mutual company and
stockholders of a stock company, of the pendency
of the petition, and the time and place at which
the same will be heard, by publication of the
order of notice in two daily newspapers
designated by the director for at least once a
week for two weeks before the time appointed for
the hearing upon the petition; and any further
notice which the director may require shall be
given by the petitioners. At the time and place
fixed in the notice, or at such time and place
as shall be fixed by adjournment, the director
shall proceed with the hearing, and may make
such examination into the affairs and conditions
of the companies as he may deem proper. For the
purpose of making the examination, or having the
same made, the director may employ the necessary
clerical, actuarial, legal, and other
assistance. The director of the department of
309

commerce and insurance of this state shall have
the same power to summon and compel the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of books and papers at the hearing as
by law granted in examinations of companies.
Any policyholder or stockholder of the company
or companies may appear before the director and
be heard in reference to the petition. The
director, if satisfied that the proposed
acquisition or disposition was properly approved
after notice as required by the articles and
bylaws of the company or companies, and that the
interest of the policyholders of the company or
companies is protected, and that no reasonable
objection exists as to the acquisition or
disposition, and that the acquisition will not
tend to substantially lessen competition or
create a monopoly, shall approve and authorize
the proposed acquisition or disposition. All
expenses and costs incident to the proceedings
under this subsection shall be paid by the
company or companies bringing the petition.
3. The shares of any subsidiary life
insurance company acquired or held under the
provisions of this section by a parent life
insurance company organized under the provisions
of chapter 376 shall be eligible for deposit by
the parent life insurance company as provided in
section 376.170 at a value no greater than the
proportion of the capital and surplus of the
subsidiary company as shown by its last annual
statement filed in the state of its domicile
represented by the shares held by the parent
life insurance company, but only to the extent
that the capital and surplus is represented by
cash or securities of the kind and type eligible
for deposit under the provisions of section
376.170 and other applicable statutes.
4. (1) The provisions of this section
shall not apply to the acquisition or
disposition by purchase, sale or otherwise of
not less than the majority of the stock of any
insurance company domiciled outside of the state
of Missouri, if the consideration involved in
such acquisition or disposition does not exceed
the following threshold:
310

(a) With respect to an insurance holding
company, so long as such consideration does not
exceed the lesser of three percent of its
consolidated assets or twenty percent of its
consolidated stockholders' equity as of the
thirty-first day of December of the preceding
year according to its consolidated balance sheet
prepared in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles and audited by independent
certified accountants in accordance with
100 generally acceptable auditing standards; or
101 (b) With respect to an insurance company
102 organized under the laws of this state, so long
103 as such consideration does not exceed the lesser
104 of three percent of its assets or ten percent of
105 its capital and surplus as of the thirty-first
106 day of December of the preceding year according
107 to its balance sheet prepared in accordance with
108 accounting practices prescribed or permitted by
109 the department of commerce and insurance and in
110 conformity with the practices of the National
111 Association of Insurance Commissioners and
112 audited by independent certified accountants in
113 accordance with generally acceptable auditing
114 standards.
115 (2) In calculating the amount of
116 consideration involved in such acquisition or
117 disposition for the purposes of subdivision (1)
118 of this subsection, there shall be included
119 total net moneys or other consideration
120 expended, and obligations assumed in the
121 acquisition or disposition, including all
122 organizational expenses and contributions to
123 capital and surplus of such insurance company
124 domiciled outside of the state of Missouri,
125 whether represented by the purchase of capital
126 stock or issuance of other securities. For the
127 purposes of this subsection, the term "insurance
128 holding company" means a domestic insurance
129 holding company in which the majority of stock
130 is owned by a domestic insurance company, or a
131 domestic insurance holding company which owns
132 the majority of the stock of a domestic
133 insurance company.]
311

[375.380. 1. It shall not be lawful for
the directors, trustees or managers of any
insurance company to make any dividend, except
from the surplus profits arising from their
business, nor for any company to solicit or do
new business, when its assets are less than
three-fourths of its liabilities.
2. Any company violating the provisions
aforesaid shall be subject to proceedings for
dissolution.
3. Each stockholder in a stock company
receiving any dividend made in violation of the
above provision shall be liable to the creditors
of such company to the extent of the dividend
received, with compound interest on the same
from the date of its receipt, as well as the
costs of collecting the same, and the managers,
trustees or directors assenting to the same, or
any agent soliciting or doing new business,
knowing or having reasonable cause to believe
that such company is impaired as aforesaid,
shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the
provisions of this law, and shall be punished as
by sections 375.010 to 375.920 provided.]
[375.480. 1. When any company, which has
on deposit the securities named in section
376.170 with the director of the department of
commerce and insurance, shall desire to
relinquish and cease its business in this state,
said director shall, upon application of such
company, under the oath of the president or vice
president and secretary or assistant secretary,
give notice of such intention in any newspaper
of general circulation published in the county
or city in which said company is located, if it
is a company of this state, or in some newspaper
published in the city of St. Louis, if it is a
company of another state or government, at least
twice a week for six weeks.
2. After such publication he shall deliver
up and transfer to said company the securities
held by him and belonging to the company; but
before making such transfer, the director shall
be satisfied, by an examination of the books and
papers of such company, to be made by himself or
312

some competent person to be appointed by him, or
by the oath of the acting president and
secretary or assistant secretary of said company
if it be a company organized under the laws of
this state, that all debts and liabilities of
every kind that are due, or may become due, upon
all contracts or agreements made with the
policyholders in said company, or in any company
reinsured by said company, if the deposit is
that of a reinsured company and is held for the
security of the policyholders of said reinsured
company under sections 375.010 to 375.920, are
released, satisfied or extinguished; or if it be
a company not organized under the laws of this
state, that all debts and liabilities of every
kind, whether fixed or contingent, due or that
may become due to this state or to any county or
municipality or citizen thereof, are released,
satisfied or extinguished; and the said director
may, from time to time, authorize the delivery
in the manner aforesaid, to such company or its
assigns, of any portion of such securities, on
being satisfied in the manner and form
aforesaid, that all debts and liabilities of
every kind as aforesaid are less than one-half
the amount of the said securities which are
retained.]
[376.170. All life insurance companies
organized under the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670 shall deposit with the
director of the department of commerce and
insurance, in addition to other amounts required
by law to be deposited by life insurance
companies before such companies are permitted to
engage in the business of issuing policies of
life insurance and annuity bonds, cash or
securities of the kind and type in which life
insurance companies are required to invest their
funds under sections 376.291 to 376.307, as same
now is or as same may be hereafter amended, in
an amount sufficient to equal the net value on
all policies or annuity bonds hereafter issued
by such companies, the amount thereof to be
determined by an evaluation made in accord with
the provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670.]
313

[376.180. 1. After making the deposits
mentioned in section 376.170, the company shall
issue its policies of insurance or annuity bonds
and each policy may have set out in the body
thereof the following: "This policy is
registered and the net reserves secured by a
pledge of bonds, deeds of trust on real estate
and other securities deposited with the
department of commerce and insurance of Missouri
as required by section 376.170, RSMo."
2. The company under the supervision of
the director shall prepare and keep a permanent
register thereof.
3. The provisions of this section
pertaining to the registration of policies shall
not apply to policies issued on the industrial
or prudential plans except when such policies
exceed one thousand dollars in amount, nor shall
the provisions of this section apply to term
policies of seven years or less and in amounts
of ten thousand dollars or less, or to policies
of group insurance or group annuity; except that
nothing contained herein shall be deemed to
prevent any policy from being registered
hereunder, if the company issuing the policy
shall so desire.]
[376.190. The director shall annually
cause the registered policies and annuity bonds
of each company outstanding and in force to be
carefully valued, and whenever the total of the
actual net value of such policies and annuity
bonds exceeds the market value of the securities
on deposit, the company issuing such policies or
annuity bonds shall immediately deposit
sufficient securities of the same kind and type
provided for in sections 376.291 to 376.307 to
equal the net value of such policies and annuity
bonds so that the market value of the securities
deposited shall always be equal to the actual
net value of the registered policies and annuity
bonds issued by such company and still in force.]
[376.210. Whenever the aggregate market
value of the securities deposited by any company
shall exceed the net reserve liability of the
company on all of its registered policies and
314

annuity bonds, the excess may be returned to the
company, or, whenever the liability of such
company on such policies shall cease, the
director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall return the securities deposited.]
[376.220. Should any company depositing
under section 376.170 become the owner of real
estate for its own use and accommodations, or
become temporarily seized and possessed of real
estate in satisfaction of debt for which such
real estate was pledged for security, such
company may execute its own note for the value
of such real estate, payable to the director, as
trustee, and secure the said notes or bonds by
duly recorded deeds of trust of said real
estate; which notes or bonds thus secured may be
deposited with said director as proper security,
under and according to the provisions of
sections 376.010 to 376.670, said value to be
subject to the approval of the director of the
department of commerce and insurance.]
[376.230. Any company shall have the right
at any time to change the securities on deposit
with the director of the department of commerce
and insurance by substituting a like amount of
the character required in the first instance and
to withdraw any excess of securities; and so
long as such company shall remain solvent, and
the amount of its deposits as herein required
are not impaired, it may collect the interest on
the securities deposited as the same accrues.]
[376.240. The securities deposited under
the provisions of section 376.170 shall be
legally transferred to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, and so
large an amount thereof as may be necessary to
equal, at all times, the net value of the
outstanding registered policies and annuity
bonds, less such liens not exceeding such value
as the company may hold against them, shall be
held by him in trust for the purposes of
sections 376.010 to 376.670, until the
obligations of said companies, under said
registered policies and annuity bonds shall, to
315

the satisfaction of the said director, be fully
liquidated, cancelled or annulled.]
[376.250. The securities deposited under
section 376.170 shall be deposited and kept in
the same manner, but separate from other
deposits of the company.]
[376.260. The director of revenue, in
addition to other fees allowed by law, shall be
entitled to collect the following fees,
including seal, from companies depositing under
section 376.170: For issuing certificates of
deposits, which he is hereby required to do, one
dollar; for every other certificate, including
seal, the fee shall be twenty-five cents.]
[376.270. If at any time the affairs of
any life insurance company which has deposited
securities under section 376.170 shall, in the
opinion of the director, appear in such
condition as to render the issuing of additional
policies and annuity bonds by such company
injurious to the public interest, the director
may take the same proceedings against such
company as by law may be taken against other
insolvent companies; and said companies shall,
in all respects, be subject to the provisions of
law affecting other companies.]
[376.752. Any member insurer organized
under the provisions of sections 376.010 to
376.670, or under any general or special laws of
this state and transacting business of the
character designated in section 376.010, shall
be exempt from the provisions of section
376.170, relating to the amount required to be
deposited with the director equal to the net
value of all policies and annuity contracts;
provided, however, that the extent of such
exemption shall be eighty percent of such net
value in the calendar year during which this act
shall become effective, increasing by five
percent for each succeeding calendar year until
such exemption shall be equal to one hundred
percent of such net value.]
316

[377.005. As used in this chapter, unless
otherwise clearly indicated by the context, the
following words mean:
(1) "Department", the department of
commerce and insurance; and
(2) "Director", the director of the
department of commerce and insurance.]
[377.010. Every contract whereby a benefit
is to accrue to a person or persons named
therein, upon the death or physical disability
of a person also named therein, the payment of
which said benefit is in any manner or degree
dependent upon the collection of an assessment
upon persons holding similar contracts, shall be
deemed a contract of insurance upon the
assessment plan, and the business involving the
issuance of such contracts shall be carried on
in this state only by duly organized
corporations which shall be subject to the
provisions and requirements of sections 377.010
to 377.190.]
[377.020. 1. Any number of persons, not
less than seven, being citizens of the state of
Missouri, may upon application to the circuit
court of the county or city in which it is
proposed to locate the chief offices or place of
business, become a body politic or corporate
under the name and style designated in the
application, for the purpose of doing a life or
casualty, or life and casualty insurance
business on the assessment plan; said
application shall in all cases be accompanied by
the articles of association, or agreements,
setting forth specifically the objects and
purposes of the proposed corporation, as well as
the methods and plans by which its business
shall be conducted, and upon a hearing of the
same, the court may grant or reject the
application as it may deem best.
2. If the application is granted it shall
be the duty of the applicant to cause a copy of
said articles, with a copy of the decree of the
court duly certified by the clerk thereof, and
by him endorsed on or attached thereto, to be
recorded in the office of the recorder of deeds
317

in the county in which said corporation is
located and then filed in the office of the
secretary of state.
3. The secretary of state shall thereupon
issue to the applicants aforesaid a certified
copy of the said articles, with the several
certificates thereon, as filed in his office,
which certified copy shall be the charter of
incorporation, and thereupon said applicants,
their associates and successors, shall be
created and be a body politic and corporate by
the corporate name as aforesaid, and such
charter, together with sections 377.010 to
377.190, shall be received in all courts and
places as legal evidence of the incorporation of
the said association, society or company;
provided, that no decree shall be made, and no
certificate of incorporation issued as aforesaid
until the director of the department of commerce
and insurance shall certify that the proposed
name of the corporation is not the same and does
not resemble the name of any other corporations
authorized to do business in this state, to the
extent of misleading the public, and further
that the society, association or company seeking
to be incorporated has secured applications for
not less than one hundred thousand dollars
insurance by not less than one hundred persons,
and that thirty thousand dollars in cash or
securities, approved by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance has been
deposited with the department of commerce and
insurance, which fund shall be held in trust as
a beneficiary fund by the said director of the
department of commerce and insurance. The term
"casualty insurance" as used in sections 377.010
to 377.190, inclusive, shall be construed to
mean only accident, health and hospitalization
insurance.
4. After September 1, 1953, no insurance
company as described herein may be incorporated
to do business on the assessment plan under the
provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190. This
provision, however, shall not be construed as
restricting or abridging in any manner the right
to do business under the provisions of sections
318

377.010 to 377.190 of any insurance company now
incorporated and licensed to do business in this
state under the assessment plan.]
[377.030. 1. On written application by
the board of directors, the director of the
department of commerce and insurance shall
release to said company from the beneficiary
fund the amount herein stated for the purpose of
paying policy beneficiaries as provided later
herein.
2. The board of directors shall certify
the names of the beneficiaries and amounts in
claims to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance and that the money so
released is for no other purpose than to pay the
claims so certified.
3. However, the amount released from this
fund by the said director shall not exceed
twelve thousand dollars, which shall be used
solely for the purpose of paying beneficiaries.
4. Such funds so released shall be
replaced on deposit by the company within twelve
months in four equal installments, in three,
six, nine and twelve months from the date of
release. The director of the department of
commerce and insurance at his own discretion may
extend time of replacement of said funds, if, in
his judgment it is to the best interest of the
policyholders.
5. This section and section 377.020 shall
not apply to companies already incorporated and
existing under the laws of the state of
Missouri. Nothing in sections 377.010 to
377.190 shall prevent any such company or
association from engaging in both life and
casualty insurance and placing both a life and
casualty clause in the same policy.]
[377.040. 1. Any association, society or
company duly incorporated under the laws of this
state, having a bona fide membership of not less
than five hundred persons in good standing, and
who hold policies or certificates of insurance
therein in the aggregate of not less than five
hundred thousand dollars, may either
reincorporate, as herein provided for
319

incorporation, or become entitled to do business
in this state under the provisions of sections
377.010 to 377.190 in the manner following: A
declaration duly authorized by such corporation,
attested by its president and secretary, and
with its corporate seal attached, accompanied by
a copy of its charter, bylaws, rules and
regulations, shall be filed in the office of the
director of the department of commerce and
insurance showing the number of its members in
good standing, the aggregate amount of insurance
held by them, and that it has the amount of one
full assessment upon its members paid in and
deposited to its credit in bank, and that it
accepts fully and unconditionally the provisions
and requirements of sections 377.010 to 377.190,
and will conform to and abide by the same in
good faith.
2. The said director shall thereupon issue
his certificate to such corporation, setting out
the fact that, having complied with the
provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190 in all
respects, it is then permitted and authorized to
do business in this state under the supervision
and control of said department, and subject to
the provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190.]
[377.050. 1. Corporations organized or
doing the business of life insurance under
sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall provide for
the accumulation of an emergency fund, which
shall be not less than the proceeds of one death
assessment on all policy or certificate holders
thereof; corporations organized or doing the
business of casualty insurance under sections
377.010 to 377.190 shall provide in like manner
for the accumulation of an emergency fund, which
shall be equal to the amount of the maximum
policy or certificate which they issue. Said
fund shall be accumulated by existing
corporations within six months from the date of
accepting the provisions of sections 377.010 to
377.190, by all others within six months from
the date of their incorporation; which fund,
together with the income thereon, shall be a
trust fund for the payment of death claims or
320

other benefits provided for in their policies or
certificates, and shall be invested in
securities in which insurance companies are
allowed by law to invest their capital.
2. These securities shall be deposited in
trust with the director of the department of
commerce and insurance of the state, but the
corporation shall at all times have the right to
exchange any part of said securities for others
of a like amount and character.
3. If, in any period of six months, the
death rate of any such corporation shall be in
excess of the annual rate of mortality as shown
by the American life tables, it shall be lawful
for such corporation to draw out any portion of
said securities necessary to meet such excess,
by requisition signed by two-thirds of its
directors, which, upon proper proof of said
facts to the state director of the department of
commerce and insurance, shall also be endorsed
by him setting forth that the same is to be used
for the purposes of said trust.
4. In case the amount so drawn out shall
reduce such fund below the amount so required to
be provided for, it shall be the duty of said
corporation to make up the said deficiency
within six months thereafter; said securities to
be deposited in some safe deposit in the city of
St. Louis, to the joint credit of the director
of the department of commerce and insurance and
the corporation making the deposit.]
[377.060. Every policy or certificate
hereafter issued by any corporation of this
state doing business in conformity with the
provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190, and
promising a payment to be made upon a
contingency of death, sickness, disability or
accident, shall specify the exact sum of money
which it promises to pay upon each contingency
insured against, and the number of days after
satisfactory proof of the happening of such
contingency at which such payment shall be made,
and upon the occurrence of such contingency,
unless the contract shall have been voided for
fraud or breach of its conditions, the
321

corporation shall be obligated to the
beneficiary for such payment at the time and to
the amount specified in the policy or
certificate; and the said indebtedness shall be
a lien upon all the property, effects and bills
receivable of the corporation, with priority
over all indebtedness thereafter incurred,
except as may be provided by the law in case of
the distribution of assets of an insolvent
corporation.]
[377.070. If the corporation refuses or
fails to make such payment for thirty days after
final judgment against said corporation, the
failure to pay the amount of such final judgment
within said period of thirty days shall ipso
facto constitute a forfeiture of the charter of
such corporation, and it shall be the duty of
the director of the department of commerce and
insurance forthwith to cause proceedings by quo
warranto to be instituted against said
corporation for the purpose of ousting it of its
charter; and upon the dissolution of said
corporation, the director of the department of
commerce and insurance shall take charge of its
assets and affairs, and wind up the same, as now
provided by law in the case of life insurance
companies.]
[377.080. 1. No corporation doing
business pursuant to sections 377.010 to 377.190
shall issue a certificate or policy upon the
life of any person who at nearest birthday is
more than sixty years of age, nor upon any life
in which the beneficiary named has no insurable
interest, nor as an endowment to any insured
person while living, and every call for payments
by the policy or certificate holders shall
distinctly state the purposes of the same.
2. Any assignment of a policy or
certificate to a person having no insurable
interest in the insured life shall render such
assignments void and of no effect.
3. A charitable, benevolent, educational
or religious institution qualified pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal
Revenue Code, as amended, shall be deemed to
322

have an insurable interest in the life of an
insured individual if, in the absence of any
fraud or coercion:
(1) The individual has designated the
institution as a beneficiary;
(2) The individual has made a gift or an
assignment of an interest in life insurance on
the life of such insured individual; or
(3) The life insurance is owned by such
charitable, benevolent, educational or religious
institution and such institution has obtained
the consent of the person whose life is being
insured, as required by section 376.531.]
[377.090. The money or other benefit,
charity, relief or aid to be paid, provided or
rendered by any corporation authorized to do
business under sections 377.010 to 377.190,
shall not be liable to attachment or other
process, and shall not be seized, taken,
appropriated or applied by any legal or
equitable process, nor by operation of law, to
pay any debt or liability of a policy or
certificate holder, or any beneficiary named in
a policy or certificate.]
[377.100. Every corporation doing business
under sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall
annually, on or before the first day of
February, return to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, in such
manner and form as he shall prescribe, a
statement of its affairs for the year ending on
the preceding thirty-first day of December, and
the director, in person or by deputy, shall have
the power of visitation of and examination into
the affairs of any such corporation, which is
conferred upon him in the case of life insurance
companies by the laws of this state; and all
companies are hereby declared to be subject to
and required to conform to the provisions of
chapters 374 and 375, and sections 376.291 to
376.330, 376.580, 376.610 and 376.620, and
governed and controlled by all the provisions in
said sections contained; provided, always, that
nothing herein contained shall subject any
corporation doing business under sections
323

377.010 to 377.190 to any other provisions or
requirements of the general insurance laws of
this state, except as distinctly herein set
forth and provided.]
[377.120. No corporation of this state,
organized or doing business under the provisions
of sections 377.010 to 377.190, shall transfer
its risks to or reinsure them in any other
corporation, unless the contract of transfer or
reinsurance is first submitted to and approved
by a two-thirds vote of a meeting of the
insured, called to consider the same, of which
meeting a written or printed notice shall be
mailed to each policy or certificate holder, at
least ten days before the day fixed for said
meeting; and in case said transfer or
reinsurance shall be approved, every policy or
certificate holder of said corporation who shall
file with the secretary thereof, within five
days after said meeting, written notice of his
preference to be transferred to some other
corporation than that named in the contract,
shall be accorded all the rights and privileges
in aid of such transfer as would have been
accorded under the terms of said contract had he
been transferred to the corporation named
therein; but no such transfer shall be valid
until the terms and conditions shall have been
fully submitted to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, and have
been approved by him.]
[377.150. When any other state or country
shall impose any obligations upon such
corporation, the like obligations shall be
imposed and enforced by the department of
commerce and insurance of this state upon
similar corporations and their agents of such
state or country doing business in this state.]
[377.160. Before any foreign insurance
company doing business under the assessment plan
shall be authorized to do business in this
state, it shall deposit, and always keep on
deposit, with the director of the department of
commerce and insurance of this state, the sum of
324

two thousand dollars, or secure the same to the
satisfaction of the director, to indemnify the
state against costs and expense for the
prosecution of the company for violations of the
law, and to pay the costs and expenses of the
examination of the company, which the director
may make or cause to be made.]
[377.170. 1. Any domestic life or
accident insurance corporation, company or
association existing or doing business in this
state under sections 377.010 to 377.190,
providing for insurance on the assessment plan,
may, by a majority vote of its directors or
trustees, accept the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670 and amend its articles of
incorporation and its bylaws to conform to said
sections, the same as if it had originally been
incorporated thereunder, and shall submit a
record of the proceedings of its board of
trustees together with the amended articles to
the attorney general for his examination and
approval of the legal form thereof, and shall
file such amended articles in the office of the
secretary of state, and a certified copy of the
same in the office of the director of the
department of commerce and insurance of the
state of Missouri, and deposit with said
director such securities as may be required of
corporations originally incorporated under
sections 376.010 to 376.670.
2. Insurance corporations, companies and
associations complying with the provisions of
this section shall thereafter enjoy and exercise
all of the rights and privileges accorded by law
to companies originally incorporated under
sections 376.010 to 376.670.
3. Compliance with this section shall in
no wise annul, modify or change any of the
existing contracts or obligations of the
corporation, and any and all such contracts and
liabilities shall continue in force and effect
the same as if such corporation had not
reincorporated under the provisions of this
section, but all contracts and policies made
subsequent to the compliance with the provisions
325

of this section shall be interpreted and
construed under the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670.
4. Compliance with the provisions of this
section shall in no wise prejudice, impede or
impair any pending action, proceeding or rights
previously acquired.]
[377.180. Nothing in sections 377.010 to
377.190 shall be so construed as to impair or in
any manner to interfere with any of the rights
or privileges of any corporation, association or
organization doing a life or casualty insurance
business in this state under the laws as they
now exist; nor as applicable to organizations
which conduct their business as fraternal
societies on the lodge system, and limit their
certificate holders to a particular order or
fraternity, or to fraternal beneficiary
societies which provide for the relief and
benefit of its members or the families, widows,
orphans or other kindred dependents of deceased
members, or assist such as may be sick or
disabled, from the proceeds of assessments upon
members of such society or association, and, to
that end, issue to its members beneficial
certificates, payable at such time and in such
manner as shall be therein provided.]
[377.190. Any solicitor, agent or
examining physician, who shall knowingly or
willfully make any false or fraudulent statement
or misrepresentation in or with reference to any
application for insurance, or for the purpose of
obtaining any money or benefit in any
corporation doing business under sections
377.010 to 377.190, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be
punished by a fine of not less than one hundred
dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or
imprisonment in the county jail for not less
than thirty days nor more than one year, or by
both such fine and imprisonment, at the
discretion of the court; and any person who
shall willfully make a false statement of any
material fact or thing in a sworn statement as
to death or disability of a certificate holder
326

in any such corporation, for the purpose of
procuring payment of a benefit named in the
certificate of such holder, shall be guilty of
perjury, and shall be proceeded against and
punished as provided by the statutes of this
state in relation to the crime of perjury.]
[377.199. From and after the effective
date of this section no stipulated premium plan
life insurance company shall be organized or
incorporated under the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460, but nothing in this section
shall be construed as restricting or abridging
in any manner the right of any stipulated
premium plan life insurance company now
incorporated and licensed to do business in this
state from continuing to do business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460.]
[377.200. Any corporation, company or
association issuing policies or certificates
promising money or other benefits to a member or
policyholder, or upon his decease to his legal
representatives, or to beneficiaries designated
by him, which money or benefit is derived from
stipulated premiums collected in advance from
its members or policyholders, and from interest
and other accumulations and wherein the money or
other benefits so realized is applied to or
accumulated solely for the use and purposes of
the corporation as herein specified, and for the
necessary expenses of the corporation, and the
prosecution and enlargement of its business, and
which shall comply with all the provisions of
sections 377.200 to 377.460, shall be deemed to
be engaged in the business of life insurance
upon the stipulated premium plan and shall be
subject only to the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460, except that the provisions
of chapters 374 and 375, and sections 376.291 to
376.330, 376.675, 376.770 to 376.795, 376.500 to
376.510, and 376.590 to 376.600 shall be
applicable. It shall be unlawful for any
corporation, company or association not having
complied with the provisions of sections 377.200
to 377.460 to use the term "stipulated premium"
327

in its application or contracts, or to print or
write the same in its policies or literature.]
[377.210. Any number of persons, not less
than seven, a majority of whom being citizens
and residents of the state of Missouri, may
associate themselves and form a company, for the
purpose of making insurance on the lives of
individuals, and every insurance pertaining
thereto or connected therewith on the stipulated
premium plan, as defined and regulated herein,
and may provide for indemnity against death or
disability of the insured occasioned by
sickness, accident, old age or otherwise.]
[377.220. 1. The persons mentioned in
section 377.210 shall be designated as
corporators, and such persons shall associate
themselves by articles of agreement, in writing,
duly signed and acknowledged, setting forth:
(1) The corporate name of the proposed
corporation, which shall not be the name of any
corporation heretofore incorporated or doing
business in this state for similar purposes, or
any such imitation of such name calculated to
mislead the public;
(2) The name of the city, town or county
in which the principal office is located;
(3) The amount of the capital stock of the
corporation, provided the same be a stock
company, which shall not be less than fifty
thousand dollars and a surplus of not less than
fifty thousand dollars, the number of shares
into which the capital stock is divided, and the
par value thereof, that the same has been bona
fide subscribed, and actually paid up in lawful
money of the United States, and is in the
custody of the persons named as the first board
of directors; the name and place of the several
shareholders and the number of shares subscribed
by each;
(4) The number of the board of directors
or managers, which shall be not less than seven,
their powers and duties and the names agreed
upon for the first year;
(5) The number of years the corporation is
to continue;
328

(6) A statement that the company is formed
for the purpose of carrying on the business of
insurance under the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460;
(7) Any other provision of this section
notwithstanding, a stipulated premium life
insurance company licensed to do business in
this state on October 13, 1963, may renew its
license for business specified therein until
December 31, 1965, by maintaining in lieu of the
capital and surplus requirements an actual
capital of at least twenty-five thousand dollars.
2. Said articles of agreement shall be
submitted to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance and attorney general, and
if they are found by these officers to comply
with the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460, they shall approve the same.
3. When approved, they shall be filed and
recorded in the office of the secretary of
state, who shall issue a certificate of
incorporation, upon the receipt of which such
persons shall be a body corporate and politic,
under the statutes of this state.]
[377.230. 1. No such corporation, company
or association shall commence the business of
life insurance until at least two hundred
persons, eligible under the proposed plan of
organization, shall have subscribed, in writing,
to be insured therein in the aggregate amount of
at least two hundred and fifty thousand dollars,
and shall have each paid, in cash, the amount of
one annual stipulated net premium for their age
at entry on the amount of insurance severally
subscribed for, and which shall be held in trust
for the benefit of the members of said
corporation or their beneficiaries; nor until
the director of the department of commerce and
insurance and attorney general shall have
further certified that it has complied with the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, and
is authorized to transact the business of
insurance; provided, however, that every
corporation incorporating or reincorporating
under the provisions of sections 377.200 to
329

377.460 shall deposit with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance such
securities as are required by law to be
deposited by insurance companies, the sum of
five thousand dollars, before it shall commence
business.
2. Said five thousand dollars shall be a
part of the insurance fund and an asset of the
corporation.
3. The securities deposited with the
department of commerce and insurance pursuant to
this section shall be held by the director in
trust for the benefit and protection of and as
security for the policyholders of such
corporation, their legal representatives and
beneficiaries.]
[377.240. 1. When any such corporation,
company or association shall desire to
relinquish its business in this state, the
director shall, on application of such
corporation under oath of its president or
principal officer and secretary or actuary, give
notice of such intention at least twice in a
newspaper of general circulation published at
the state capitol.
2. After such publication he shall deliver
up to said corporation the securities, or any
portion thereof, held by him belonging to such
corporation upon being satisfied that all the
debts and liabilities of every kind are paid or
provided for.]
[377.250. 1. Every corporation, company
or association doing business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall
charge a mortuary premium at least equal to that
of yearly term insurance at age of entry
according to the actuaries' or combined
experience mortality table, with interest at
four percent, and such mortuary premium shall be
increased by a loading of not less than twenty
percent for age twenty and all ages under
twenty, and one percent additional for each
additional year of age, renewable term policies
excepted from such loading.
330

2. Said premium may be paid annually,
semiannually, quarterly, bimonthly or monthly in
advance.]
[377.260. 1. After the first policy year
the mortuary premium, according to the terms of
premium payments of each policy, with the
loading of the same as provided in section
377.250, together with all interest and other
accumulations of said fund, except the special
loading for limited payment policies, with
interest thereon as provided in section 377.270,
shall constitute the insurance fund of the
corporation, company, or association from which
all policy obligations shall be paid, and the
amount remaining in said fund not required to
provide for death, disability and other policy
claims, shall be set aside as an emergency fund,
and may be deposited with the department of
commerce and insurance.
2. If by any reason of excessive
mortality, or other cause, the emergency fund as
thus constituted shall become exhausted, then
the director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall require the officers of such
corporation, company or association to notify
all policyholders on or before the first of the
next succeeding month to pay, within thirty days
from the mailing of such notice, an extra
premium, sufficient to meet the amount of the
maximum policy issued apportioned equitably.
3. If any member fails to pay such extra
premium within the time named his policy shall
be commuted proportionately, and the policy as
thus commuted shall be the maximum amount for
which the corporation shall be liable under said
policy. Said thirty days' notice shall clearly
state the proportionate amount due from the
insured, and shall contain the further statement
that in the event of failure to pay the same
within thirty days said policy will be commuted
as aforesaid.]
[377.270. 1. Any corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 may
issue limited payment or any form of investment
331

policies; provided, that the premiums shall not
be less than the net term rate for the kind of
policy issued, increased by such sum as will,
improved at four percent, equal the net single
premium for the attained age, at the end of the
paying term of the policy, according to the
actuaries' or combined experience table of
mortality on which its calculations are based.
2. Said increase of premium shall be
reserved in a separate fund for the purpose of
sustaining such policies after the cessation of
premium payments, and shall be deposited with
the department of commerce and insurance in such
securities as are now required by law.
3. If any such corporation doing business
under the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460 shall fail to state in its limited
payment policies the portion of each of the
premiums to be held by it for the purpose of
sustaining the policy after the years during
which the premiums are to be paid, then all such
limited payment policies or investment policies
that may be issued shall be valued according to
the actuaries' or combined experience table and
interest at four percent.]
[377.280. Any corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, may
allow cash values on its policies or the
equivalent of the cash value in extended or paid-
up insurance to the extent of the unused portion
of the emergency fund equitably apportioned at
the dates of surrender, and may allow fixed cash
values on its limited payment or investment
policies, or the equivalent of the cash value in
extended or paid-up insurance; provided, the
amount to be set apart for such fixed cash value
or its equivalent is plainly stated in the
policy; and provided further, that such fixed
cash value shall not be in excess of the portion
of the premium with interest accretions thereon
collected for that purpose.]
[377.290. Any corporation, company or
association may provide for a return of any
surplus accumulations on its limited payment or
332

investment policies, which may be returned as a
dividend, or in extended, paid-up or increased
insurance.]
[377.300. 1. Every policy hereafter
issued by any corporation, company or
association doing business under the provisions
of sections 377.200 to 377.460 and promising any
payments to be made upon a contingency provided
for in sections 377.200 to 377.460, shall
specify the sum of money which it promises to
pay upon each contingency insured against and
the time or times of payment after satisfactory
proof of the happening of such contingency,
unless the contract shall have been voided by
fraud or breach of its conditions and
warranties, or commuted, as provided for in
section 377.260, the company shall be obligated
to the beneficiaries of the insured for such
payment at the time or times specified and to
the amount due under the policy.
2. If any company fail or refuse to make
such payment for ninety days after final
judgment has been obtained under such claim, the
director or other officer charged with the
supervision of insurance matters shall notify
the company to issue no new policies until such
indebtedness is fully paid, and no officer or
agent of the company shall make, sign or issue
any policy of insurance while such notice is in
force.]
[377.310. 1. No corporation, company or
association transacting business pursuant to
sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall issue a
certificate or policy to any person until the
applicant has been examined by a physician duly
licensed and appointed by the company as its
medical examiner, nor unless the beneficiary
named in the certificate or policy is the
husband, wife, legal representative, relative,
heir, creditor or legatee of the insured, or who
may have an insurable interest in the insured.
2. The beneficiary named in the
certificate or policy may be changed as may be
provided for in the articles of incorporation or
333

bylaws, except that no change shall be made from
a wife to a creditor without her written consent.
3. A charitable, benevolent, educational
or religious institution qualified pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal
Revenue Code, as amended, shall be deemed to
have an insurable interest in the life of an
insured individual if, in the absence of any
fraud or coercion:
(1) The individual has designated the
institution as a beneficiary;
(2) The individual has made a gift or an
assignment of an interest in life insurance on
the life of such insured individual; or
(3) The life insurance is owned by such
charitable, benevolent, educational or religious
institution and such institution has obtained
the consent of the person whose life is being
insured, as required by section 376.531.]
[377.320. In the event of death after any
policy of insurance has been issued by any
corporation, company or association, doing
business under the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460, and after the policy has
been in force for the period of one full year,
then such policy of insurance shall be
incontestable for any cause.]
[377.330. The money or other benefit,
charity, relief or aid to be paid, provided or
rendered by any corporation authorized to do
business under sections 377.200 to 377.460,
shall not be liable to attachment or other
process, and shall not be seized, taken,
appropriated or applied by any legal or
equitable process, nor by operation of law, to
pay any debt or liability of a policy or
certificate holder, or of any beneficiary named
in a policy or certificate.]
[377.340. No representation made in
obtaining or securing a policy of insurance on
the life or lives of any person or persons shall
be deemed material, or render the policy void,
unless the matter misrepresented shall have
actually contributed to the contingency or event
334

on which the policy is to become due and
payable, and if so contributed in any case,
shall be a question for the jury.]
[377.350. Every corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall,
upon the issuance of every policy, attach to
such policy or endorse thereon the substance of
the application upon which such policy was
issued, and which is made a part of the contract
of insurance, or referred to therein, or which
may in any manner affect the validity of such
policy.]
[377.360. 1. No corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall
make any discrimination in favor of holders of
the same kind of policies, or persons of the
same expectation of life, neither in the amount
of premiums charged nor in any return of
premiums, dividends or other advantages.
2. No agent of such corporation shall make
any contract for insurance or agreement as to
such contract, other than that which is plainly
expressed in the policy issued.
3. If it shall appear to the satisfaction
of the director or other official charged with
the supervision of insurance matters, that any
corporation, company or association is issuing
policies or contracts that are in violation of
this section, he shall report the same to the
attorney general, who shall require such
corporation and its officers and agents within
thirty days to refrain from issuing any such
policy or contract.
4. If any corporation or officer or agent
thereof shall fail to comply with the provisions
of this section and with the demand of the
attorney general, that officer shall at once
institute such proceedings at law as may be
necessary to restrain such violation of this
section.]
[377.370. No person shall incur any
personal liabilities for the losses or
335

liabilities of any corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 by
reason of being a member or policyholder in such
corporation.]
[377.380. The annual business of each and
every corporation, company or association
transacting business under the provisions of
sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall close on the
thirty-first day of December of each year, and
it shall, within sixty days thereafter, prepare
and file in the office of the director or other
officer having supervision of insurance matters,
a detailed statement, made upon blanks furnished
by the department of commerce and insurance, and
verified under oath by the president and
secretary of the company or association, giving
all information in detail that the department of
commerce and insurance may require, so that its
true financial condition may be known.]
[377.400. No stipulated premium life
insurance company or association organized under
sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall consolidate
with another company or transfer or reinsure its
risks with any other company or association or
assume or reinstate the whole or any part of the
risks of any other company or association,
except with the approval of a majority of the
policy or stockholders present and voting at a
regular or special meeting duly called;
provided, however, that any such company may
reinsure a fractional part of any single risk,
but no such insurance shall in any manner
release the company or association from its
obligation under contract with the
policyholder. All such reinsurance shall be
reported annually to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance.]
[377.420. When any state, territory or
foreign country shall impose any obligations
upon any such corporation of this state, or
their agents transacting business in such other
state, territory or foreign country, the like
obligations are hereby imposed upon similar
336

corporations of such other state, territory or
foreign country, their agents or representatives
transacting business in this state; and such
corporation, company, association or society of
such other state, territory or foreign country,
and its agents and representatives shall pay all
licenses, fees or penalties to, and make
deposits with the director of insurance imposed
by the laws of such other state, territory or
foreign country upon any corporation of this
state doing business therein; and in case of
failure to pay the same, the director shall
refuse the certificate of authority herein
provided for or cancel such certificate, if one
shall have been previously issued.]
[377.430. 1. No foreign corporation,
company, association or society shall be
authorized to transact any business authorized
by sections 377.200 to 377.460 within this
state, unless it furnish evidence satisfactory
to the director of the department of commerce
and insurance that it has a reserve or emergency
fund equal in amount to that required by
sections 377.200 to 377.460, and the same is
held for the benefit of policyholders only, and
invested as required by the insurance laws of
its home state.
2. Neither shall any foreign corporation,
company, association or society be authorized to
do business in this state under sections 377.200
to 377.460, unless it collects in advance for
the benefit of its policyholders a net premium
equal to at least that provided for by the terms
of sections 377.200 to 377.460; provided, that
all such foreign corporations shall annually pay
a tax on the gross premiums received in this
state on account of business done in the state
at the rate of one percent per annum, which
shall be in lieu of all other taxes as herein
otherwise provided; said tax shall be levied and
collected as is provided for in the collection
of taxes on other insurance companies.]
[377.450. 1. Any domestic life or
accident insurance corporation, company or
association existing or doing business in this
337

state under the stipulated premium plan law,
may, by a majority vote of its directors or
trustees, accept the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670 and amend its articles of
incorporation and its bylaws to conform to said
law, the same as if it had originally been
incorporated thereunder, and shall submit a
record of the proceedings of its board of
trustees, together with the amended articles, to
the attorney general for his examination and
approval of the legal form thereof, and shall
file such amended articles in the office of the
secretary of state and a certified copy of same
in the office of the director of the department
of commerce and insurance, and deposit with said
director such securities as may be required of
corporations originally incorporated under
sections 376.010 to 376.670.
2. Insurance corporations, companies and
associations complying with the provisions of
this section shall thereafter enjoy and exercise
all of the rights and privileges accorded by law
to companies originally incorporated under
sections 376.010 to 376.670.
3. Compliance with this section shall in
no wise annul, modify or change any of the
existing contracts or obligations of the
corporation, and any and all such contracts and
liabilities shall continue in force and effect
the same as if such corporation had not
reincorporated under the provisions of this
section; compliance with the provisions of this
section shall in no way prejudice, impede or
impair any pending action, proceeding or rights
previously acquired.]
[377.460. Any solicitor, agent, examining
physician or other person who shall make a false
or fraudulent statement or misrepresentation in
or with reference to any application for
insurance, or for the purpose of obtaining any
money or benefit in any corporation doing
business under sections 377.200 to 377.460,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon
conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not
less than one hundred dollars nor more than five
338

hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the
county jail for not less than thirty days nor
more than one year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment, at the discretion of the court;
and any person who shall make a false statement
of any material fact or thing in a sworn
statement as to the death or disability of a
certificate holder in any such corporation, for
the purpose of procuring payment of a benefit
named in the certificate of such holder, shall
be guilty of perjury and shall be proceeded
against and punished as provided by the statutes
of this state in relation to the crime of
perjury; and any person who shall make any false
or fraudulent statement or misrepresentation
with reference to any corporation, company or
association transacting business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction,
shall be punished by a fine of not less than one
hundred dollars nor more than five hundred
dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail for
not less than thirty days nor more than one
year, or both such fine and imprisonment, at the
discretion of the court.]
[379.205. A number of persons, not less
than twenty-five, a majority of whom shall be
bona fide residents of this state, by complying
with the provisions of sections 379.205 to
379.310, may become together with others who may
hereafter be associated with them or their
successors, a body corporate for the purpose of
carrying on the business of mutual insurance as
herein provided.]
[379.210. Any persons proposing to form
any such company shall subscribe and acknowledge
articles of incorporation specifying:
(1) The name, the purpose for which
formed, and the location of its principal or
home office, which shall be within this state;
(2) The names and addresses of those
composing the board of directors in which the
management shall be vested until the first
meeting of the members;
339

(3) The names and places of residence of
the incorporators.]
[379.215. No name shall be adopted by such
company which does not contain the word "mutual"
or which is so similar to any name already in
use by any such existing corporation, company or
association, organized or doing business in the
United States, as to be confusing or misleading.]
[379.220. 1. Such articles shall be
submitted to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance, herein called "director".
2. Such publication shall be made as
required by section 379.030, and upon proof of
publication being made and approval of said
articles by the attorney general as required by
section 379.040, such articles shall be recorded
by the director, who shall furnish a certified
copy thereof to the incorporators and shall file
a certified copy thereof with the secretary of
state.
3. The secretary of state shall thereupon
issue to the company a certificate of
incorporation, which shall be its authority to
begin business.
4. Such articles may be amended in the
manner provided for other corporations or as may
be provided in such articles.]
[379.225. 1. The company shall have legal
existence from and after date of such
certificate.
2. The board of directors named in such
articles may thereupon adopt bylaws, accept
applications for insurance, and proceed to
transact the business of such company; provided,
that no insurance shall be put into force until
the company has been licensed to transact
insurance as provided by sections 379.205 to
379.310.
3. Such bylaws and any amendments thereto
shall within thirty days after adoption be filed
with said director.]
[379.230. Any company organized under the
provisions of sections 379.205 to 379.310 is
empowered and authorized to make contracts of
340

insurance or to reinsure or accept reinsurance
on any portion thereof, to the extent specified
in its articles for the kinds of insurance
following:
(1) Liability insurance. Against loss,
expense or liability by reason of bodily injury
or death by accident, disability, sickness or
disease suffered by others for which the insured
may be liable or have assumed liability,
including workers' compensation.
(2) Disability insurance. Against bodily
injury or death by accident and disability by
sickness.
(3) Automobile insurance. Against any or
all loss, expense and liability resulting from
the ownership, maintenance or use of any
automobile or other vehicle; provided, no
policies shall be issued under this subsection
against the hazard of fire alone.
(4) Steam boiler insurance. Against loss
or liability to persons or property resulting
from explosions or accidents to boilers,
containers, pipes, engines, flywheels, elevators
and machinery in connection therewith and
against loss of use and occupancy caused thereby
and to make inspection and issue certificates of
inspection thereon.
(5) Use and occupancy insurance. Against
loss from interruption of trade or business or
loss of rents which may be the result of any
accident or casualty.
(6) Miscellaneous insurance. Against loss
or damage by any hazard upon any risk not
provided for in this section, which is not
prohibited by statute or at common law from
being the subject of insurance, excepting life
insurance and fire insurance.]
[379.235. 1. No such company shall issue
policies or transact any business of insurance
unless it holds a license from the director
authorizing the transaction of such business. A
license shall not be issued unless the company
complies with the following conditions:
(1) It shall hold bona fide applications
for insurance upon which it shall issue
341

simultaneously, or it shall have in force, at
least twenty policies to at least twenty members
for the same kind of insurance upon not less
than two hundred separate risks, each within the
maximum single risk described herein.
(2) The maximum single risk shall not
exceed five percent of the admitted assets or
three times the average risk or one percent of
the insurance in force, whichever is the
greater, any reinsurance taking effect
simultaneously with the policy being deducted in
determining such maximum single risk.
(3) It has collected an annual premium
upon each application, which premium shall be
equal to not less than five times the maximum
single risk assumed nor less than one hundred
thousand dollars; provided, however, that the
total assets of the company shall not be less
than one hundred thousand dollars of paid-in
premiums and a guaranty fund or contributed
surplus of not less than six hundred thousand
dollars which shall be held in cash or
securities in which these insurance companies
are authorized to invest; and provided further,
that any mutual company other than life and fire
licensed to do business on September 28, 1977,
which confines its writings to burglary and
theft, and liability, property damage and
collision other than automobile and workers'
compensation, shall maintain a guaranty fund or
contributed surplus of not less than three
hundred thousand dollars.
(4) For the purpose of transacting
employer's liability and workers' compensation
insurance the applications shall cover not less
than one thousand five hundred employees, each
employee being considered a separate risk for
determining the maximum single risk.
2. Any other provision of law
notwithstanding any mutual company other than
life and fire licensed to do business in this
state on September 28, 1977, may renew its
license for business specified therein until
December 31, 1979, if it maintains assets of not
less than three hundred thousand dollars
consisting of paid-in premiums and a guaranty
342

fund or contributed surplus which shall be held
in cash or securities in which these insurance
companies are authorized to invest.
3. Violation of any of the provisions of
this section by an insurer is grounds for the
revocation of its certificate of authority by
the director.]
[379.240. 1. Any public or private
corporation, board or association in this state
or elsewhere may make applications, enter into
agreements for and hold policies in any such
mutual insurance company.
2. Any officer, stockholder, trustee or
legal representative of any such corporation,
board, association or estate may be recognized
as acting for or on its behalf for the purpose
of such membership, but shall not be personally
liable upon such contract of insurance by reason
of acting in such representative capacity.
3. The right of any corporation organized
under the laws of this state to participate as a
member of any such mutual insurance company is
hereby declared to be incidental to the purpose
for which such corporation is organized and as
much granted as the rights and powers expressly
conferred.]
[379.245. Every member of the company
shall be entitled to one vote, or to a number of
votes based upon the insurance in force, the
number of policies held, or the amount of
premiums paid, as may be provided in the bylaws.]
[379.250. 1. The maximum premium payable
by any member shall be expressed in the policy
or in the application for the insurance.
2. Such maximum premium may be a cash
premium and an additional contingent premium not
less than the cash premium, or may be solely a
cash premium.
3. No policy shall be issued for a cash
premium without an additional contingent premium
unless the company has a surplus of at least one
hundred thousand dollars or a surplus which is
not less in amount than the capital stock
343

required of domestic stock insurance companies
transacting the same kinds of insurance.]
[379.255. No such company shall invest any
of its assets except in accordance with the laws
of this state relating to the investment of the
assets of domestic stock companies transacting
the same kinds of insurance.]
[379.257. Any company organized or doing
business under sections 379.205 to 379.310 shall
comply with the provisions of section 379.098.]
[379.260. Such company shall maintain
unearned premium and other reserves separately
for each kind of insurance, upon the same basis
as that required of domestic stock insurance
companies transacting the same kind of
insurance; provided, that any reserve for losses
or claims based upon the premium income shall be
computed upon the net premium income after
deducting any so-called dividend or premium
returned or credited to the member.]
[379.263. Any company organized under the
provisions of sections 379.205 to 379.310 shall
on the first day of January of each year or
within sixty days thereafter, file with the
director of the department of commerce and
insurance a statement of its affairs in the same
manner and form as provided in section 379.105.]
[379.265. Such company not possessed of
assets at least equal to the unearned premium
reserve and other liabilities shall make an
assessment upon its members liable to assessment
to provide for such deficiency, such assessment
to be against each such member in proportion to
such liability as expressed in his policy;
provided, the director may, by written order,
relieve the company from an assessment or other
proceedings to restore such assets during the
time fixed in such order; and provided, that any
domestic company which shall be deficient in
providing the unearned premium reserve required
hereby may, notwithstanding such deficiency,
come under this law on the condition that it
shall each year thereafter reduce such
deficiency at least fifteen percent of the
344

original amount thereof, and in such case it may
increase its assessments accordingly.]
[379.270. 1. Any director, officer or
member of any such company, or any other person,
may advance to such company any sum or sums of
money necessary for the purpose of its business
or to enable it to comply with any of the
requirements of the law, and such moneys and
such interest thereon as may have been agreed
upon, not exceeding ten percent per annum, shall
be payable only out of the surplus remaining
after providing for all reserves and other
liabilities, and shall not otherwise be a
liability or claim against the company or any of
its assets.
2. No commission or promotion expenses
shall be paid in connection with the advance of
any such money to the company, and the amount of
such advance shall be reported in each annual
statement.]
[379.275. 1. Any law requiring that
policies be countersigned and delivered through
a resident agent shall not apply to any policy
of such mutual company on which no commission
shall be paid to any local agent.
2. Such mutual company may insert in any
form of policy prescribed by the law of this
state any provisions or conditions required by
its plan of insurance which are not inconsistent
or in conflict with any law of this state.]
[379.290. Every mutual insurance company
or association admitted to Missouri under the
provisions of sections 379.205 to 379.310 shall
annually pay to the director of revenue a tax
upon the direct premiums received, whether in
cash or in notes, in this state, for the
insurance of property or risks in this state at
the rate of two percent per annum; provided,
that such companies or associations shall be
credited with cancelled or return premiums
actually paid during the year in this state.]
[379.295. 1. Every such company or
association shall, on or before the first day of
March in each year, make a return, verified by
345

the affidavit of its president and secretary or
other chief officers, to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, in the
form prescribed by him, stating the amount of
all gross direct premiums received, whether in
cash, notes, credits or any other substitute for
money, on contracts covering property, or risks
located or resident in this state, during the
year ending on the thirty-first day of December
next preceding, and all credits to which such
company or association shall be entitled under
the provisions of section 379.290.
2. Upon receipt of such returns, the
director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall verify the same and assess the
tax upon various companies on the basis and at
the rate provided in section 379.290, and make a
schedule thereof, duplicate copies of which,
properly certified by said director, shall be
filed in the office of the director of revenue
on or before the first day of April in each year.
3. Immediately thereafter the director of
revenue shall notify the companies of the amount
of taxes respectively due from them, and such
taxes shall be paid to the director of revenue
on or before the first day of May next ensuing.
4. If not so paid, the director of revenue
shall certify such fact to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, who shall
thereafter suspend such delinquent company or
companies from the further transaction of
business in this state until such taxes shall be
paid.
5. Upon receiving said money, the director
of revenue shall deposit it in the state
treasury and the state treasurer shall receipt
one-half thereof into the general revenue fund
of the state, and he shall place the remainder
of said tax to the credit of the county foreign
insurance tax fund.]
[379.300. If any company or association
shall fail or refuse to make the return required
by sections 379.205 to 379.310, the said
director shall assess the tax against said
company or association at the rate herein
346

provided for on such amount of premiums as he
shall deem just and the proceedings thereon
shall be the same as if the return had been
made.]
[379.700. There shall be maintained at all
times assets in cash or securities authorized by
the laws of the state in which the principal
office of the attorney is located for the
investment of similar funds of insurance
companies doing the same kind of business in an
amount equal to fifty percent of the net annual
advance premiums or deposits collected and
credited to the accounts of subscribers on
policies having one year or less to run and pro
rata on those for longer periods; or, in lieu
thereof, one hundred percent of the net unearned
premiums or deposits collected and credited to
the accounts of subscribers, which assets shall
not be charged as a liability.]
[393.1072. 1. There is hereby established
the "Task Force on Fair, Nondiscriminatory Local
Taxation Concerning Solar Energy Systems", which
shall be composed of the following members:
(1) Three members of the house of
representatives, with not more than two members
from the same political party and each member to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with not
more than two members from the same political
party and each member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(3) Two currently elected county assessors
from Missouri county governments, with one to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(4) Two representatives from the Missouri
state tax commission to be appointed by the
commissioners of the Missouri state tax
commission;
(5) Two representatives from a statewide
agricultural organization, with one to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of
347

representatives and one to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(6) Two representatives from the private
sector with experience in utility-scale solar
energy development and operation, with one to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate; and
(7) One member from an organization that
advocates for policy supporting solar energy
appointed by the chair of the public service
commission.
2. The task force shall conduct public
hearings and research and compile a report for
delivery to the general assembly before December
31, 2022. Such report shall include information
on the following:
(1) The economic benefits and drawbacks of
solar energy systems to local communities and
the state;
(2) The fair, uniform, and standardized
assessment and taxation of solar energy systems
and their connected equipment owned by a retail
or wholesale provider of electricity at the
county level in all counties;
(3) Compliance with existing federal and
state programs and regulations; and
(4) Potential legislation that will
provide a uniform assessment and taxation
methodology for solar energy systems and their
connected equipment owned by a retail or
wholesale provider of electricity that will be
used in every county of Missouri.
3. The task force shall meet within thirty
days after its creation and shall organize by
selecting a chair and vice chair, one of whom
shall be a member of the senate and the other a
member of the house of representatives.
Thereafter, the task force may meet as often as
necessary in order to accomplish the tasks
assigned to it. Meetings may be held by
telephone or video conference at the discretion
of the chair. The chair shall designate a
person to keep the records of the task force. A
majority of the task force shall constitute a
348

quorum, and a majority vote of such quorum shall
be required for any action.
4. The staff of house research and senate
research shall provide necessary clerical,
research, fiscal, and legal services to the task
force as the task force may request.
5. The members of the task force shall
serve without compensation, but any actual and
necessary expenses incurred by the task force,
its members, and any staff assigned to the task
force shall be reimbursed.
6. This section shall expire on December
31, 2022.]
[454.849. The repeal of sections 454.850
to 454.999 shall become effective June 15, 2016.]
[476.1000. All courts that require
mandatory electronic filing shall accept, file,
and docket a notice of entry of appearance filed
by an attorney in a criminal case if such filing
does not exceed one page in length and was sent
by fax or regular mail. The provisions of this
section shall expire on December 31, 2016.]
[559.117. 1. The director of the
department of corrections is authorized to
establish, as a three-year pilot program, a
mental health assessment process.
2. Only upon a motion filed by the
prosecutor in a criminal case, the judge who is
hearing the criminal case in a participating
county may request that an offender be placed in
the department of corrections for one hundred
twenty days for a mental health assessment and
for treatment if it appears that the offender
has a mental disorder or mental illness such
that the offender may qualify for probation
including community psychiatric rehabilitation
(CPR) programs and such probation is appropriate
and not inconsistent with public safety. Before
the judge rules upon the motion, the victim
shall be given notice of such motion and the
opportunity to be heard. Upon recommendation of
the court, the department shall determine the
offender's eligibility for the mental health
assessment process.
349

3. Following this assessment and treatment
period, an assessment report shall be sent to
the sentencing court and the sentencing court
may, if appropriate, release the offender on
probation. The offender shall be supervised on
probation by a state probation and parole
officer, who shall work cooperatively with the
department of mental health to enroll eligible
offenders in community psychiatric
rehabilitation (CPR) programs.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, probation shall not be granted under this
section to offenders who:
(1) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, murder in the second degree under
section 565.021;
(2) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, rape in the first degree under
section 566.030 or forcible rape under section
566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013;
(3) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, statutory rape in the first degree
under section 566.032;
(4) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, sodomy in the first degree under
section 566.060 or forcible sodomy under section
566.060 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013;
(5) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, statutory sodomy in the first degree
under section 566.062;
(6) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, child molestation in the first degree
under section 566.067 when classified as a class
A felony;
(7) Have been found to be a predatory
sexual offender under section 566.125; or
(8) Have been found guilty of, or plead
guilty to, any offense for which there exists a
statutory prohibition against either probation
or parole.
5. At the end of the three-year pilot, the
director of the department of corrections and
the director of the department of mental health
shall jointly submit recommendations to the
governor and to the general assembly by December
350

31, 2015, on whether to expand the process
statewide.]
[595.202. 1. There is hereby created the
"Missouri Rights of Victims of Sexual Assault
Task Force" to consist of the following members:
(1) The following four members of the
general assembly:
(a) Two members of the senate, with no
more than one member from the same political
party and each member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate; and
(b) Two members of the house of
representatives, with no more than one member
from the same political party and each member to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(2) The director of the department of
health and senior services or his or her
designee;
(3) A private citizen appointed by the
governor;
(4) A representative of a statewide
coalition against domestic and sexual violence
appointed by the governor;
(5) A representative of rape crisis
centers appointed by the governor;
(6) The superintendent of the Missouri
highway patrol or his or her designee;
(7) A law enforcement officer appointed by
the governor;
(8) The director of the Missouri highway
patrol crime lab or his or her designee;
(9) An attorney appointed by the governor;
and
(10) A representative of the Missouri
Hospital Association.
2. The task force shall study nationally
recognized best practices and make
recommendations regarding:
(1) The development and implementation of
an effective mechanism for submitting, tracking,
and investigating complaints regarding the
handling of, or response to, a sexual assault
report or investigation by any agency or
organization involved in the response;
351

(2) The development of documentation for
medical providers and law enforcement officers,
in conjunction with the department of public
safety, to provide to survivors informing them
of their rights pursuant to section 595.201;
(3) Whether a need exists for additional
employees or volunteers of a rape crisis center
for victims of sexual assault, and if such a
need does exist, the task force shall:
(a) Create a plan for how the state can
provide, in conjunction with rape crisis
centers, victims' advocates organizations, and
the department of health and senior services,
additional employees or volunteers of a rape
crisis center to meet the needs identified; and
(b) Determine the cost of funding such a
plan;
(4) Whether a need exists to expand the
right to an employee or volunteer of a rape
crisis center beyond the medical examination and
law enforcement interview settings, and if such
a need does exist, the task force shall:
(a) Identify the scope and nature of the
need; and
(b) Make recommendations on how best to
fill that need, whether legislatively or
otherwise;
(5) Whether a need exists to provide for
ongoing evaluation of the implementation of
these rights, and if such a need does exist, the
task force shall:
(a) Identify the scope and nature of the
need; and
(b) Make recommendations on how best to
fill that need, whether legislatively or
otherwise.
3. The task force shall:
(1) Collect data regarding sexual assault
reporting, arrests, prosecution rates, access to
sexual assault victims services, and any other
data important for its deliberations and
recommendations; and
(2) Collect feedback from stakeholders,
practitioners, and leadership throughout the
state and local law enforcement, victim
services, forensic science practitioners, and
352

health care communities to inform development of
future best practices or clinical guidelines
regarding the care and treatment of survivors.
4. The department of public safety shall
provide administrative support to the task force.
5. On or before December 31, 2021, the
task force shall submit a report on its findings
to the governor and general assembly. The
report shall include any dissenting opinions in
addition to any majority opinions.
100 6. The task force shall expire on December
101 31, 2021.]
[620.1910. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Manufacturing Jobs Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by
the department to the qualified manufacturing
company or qualified supplier that states the
benefits that may be provided under this section;
(2) "Capital investment", expenditures
made by a qualified manufacturing company to
retool or reconfigure a manufacturing facility
directly related to the manufacturing of a new
product or the expansion or modification of the
manufacture of an existing product;
(3) "County average wage", the same
meaning as such term is defined in section
620.1878;
(4) "Department", the department of
economic development;
(5) "Facility", a building or buildings
located in Missouri at which the qualified
manufacturing company manufactures a product;
(6) "Full-time job", a job for which a
person is compensated for an average of at least
thirty-five hours per week for a twelve-month
period, and one for which the qualified
manufacturing company or qualified supplier
offers health insurance and pays at least fifty
percent of such insurance premiums;
(7) "NAICS industry classification", the
most recent edition of the North American
Industry Classification System as prepared by
353

the Executive Office of the President, Office of
Management and Budget;
(8) "New job", the same meaning as such
term is defined in section 620.1878;
(9) "New product", a new model or line of
a manufactured good that has not been
manufactured in Missouri by the qualified
manufacturing company at any time prior to the
date of the notice of intent, or an existing
brand, model, or line of a manufactured good
that is redesigned with more than seventy-five
percent new exterior body parts and incorporates
new powertrain options;
(10) "Notice of intent", a form developed
by the department, completed by the qualified
manufacturing company or qualified supplier and
submitted to the department which states the
qualified manufacturing company's or qualified
supplier's intent to create new jobs or retain
current jobs and make additional capital
investment, as applicable, and request benefits
under this section. The notice of intent shall
specify the minimum number of such new or
retained jobs and the minimum amount of such
capital investment;
(11) "Qualified manufacturing company", a
business with a NAICS code of 33611 that:
(a) Manufactures goods at a facility in
Missouri;
(b) In the case of the manufacture of a
new product, commits to make a capital
investment of at least seventy-five thousand
dollars per retained job within no more than two
years of the date the qualified manufacturing
company begins to retain withholding tax under
this section, or in the case of the modification
or expansion of the manufacture of an existing
product, commits to make a capital investment of
at least fifty thousand dollars per retained job
within no more than two years of the date the
qualified manufacturing company begins to retain
withholding tax under this section;
(c) Manufactures a new product or has
commenced making capital improvements to the
facility necessary for the manufacturing of such
new product, or modifies or expands the
354

manufacture of an existing product or has
commenced making capital improvements to the
facility necessary for the modification or
expansion of the manufacture of such existing
product; and
(d) Continues to meet the requirements of
paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision for
the withholding period;
(12) "Qualified supplier", a manufacturing
company that:
(a) Attests to the department that it
derives more than ten percent of the total
annual sales of the company from sales to a
qualified manufacturing company;
(b) Adds five or more new jobs;
(c) Has an average wage, as defined in
section 135.950, for such new jobs that are
equal to or exceed the lower of the county
average wage for Missouri as determined by the
department using NAICS industry classifications,
but not lower than sixty percent of the
100 statewide average wage; and
101 (d) Provides health insurance for all full-
102 time jobs and pays at least fifty percent of the
103 premiums of such insurance;
104 (13) "Retained job", the number of full-
105 time jobs of persons employed by the qualified
106 manufacturing company located at the facility
107 that existed as of the last working day of the
108 month immediately preceding the month in which
109 notice of intent is submitted;
110 (14) "Statewide average wage", an amount
111 equal to the quotient of the sum of the total
112 gross wages paid for the corresponding four
113 calendar quarters divided by the average annual
114 employment for such four calendar quarters,
115 which shall be computed using the Quarterly
116 Census of Employment and Wages Data for All
117 Private Ownership Businesses in Missouri, as
118 published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of
119 the United States Department of Labor;
120 (15) "Withholding period", the seven- or
121 ten-year period in which a qualified
122 manufacturing company may receive benefits under
123 this section;
355

124 (16) "Withholding tax", the same meaning
125 as such term is defined in section 620.1878.
126 3. The department shall respond within
127 thirty days to a qualified manufacturing company
128 or a qualified supplier who provides a notice of
129 intent with either an approval or a rejection of
130 the notice of intent. Failure to respond on
131 behalf of the department shall result in the
132 notice of intent being deemed an approval for
133 the purposes of this section.
134 4. A qualified manufacturing company that
135 manufactures a new product may, upon the
136 department's approval of a notice of intent and
137 the execution of an agreement that meets the
138 requirements of subsection 9 of this section,
139 but no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain one
140 hundred percent of the withholding tax from full-
141 time jobs at the facility for a period of ten
142 years. A qualified manufacturing company that
143 modifies or expands the manufacture of an
144 existing product may, upon the department's
145 approval of a notice of intent and the execution
146 of an agreement that meets the requirements of
147 subsection 9 of this section, but no earlier
148 than January 1, 2012, retain fifty percent of
149 the withholding tax from full-time jobs at the
150 facility for a period of seven years. Except as
151 otherwise allowed under subsection 7 of this
152 section, the commencement of the withholding
153 period may be delayed by no more than twenty-
154 four months after execution of the agreement at
155 the option of the qualified manufacturing
156 company. Such qualified manufacturing company
157 shall be eligible for participation in the
158 Missouri quality jobs program in sections
159 620.1875 to 620.1890 for any new jobs for which
160 it does not retain withholding tax under this
161 section, provided all qualifications for such
162 program are met.
163 5. A qualified supplier may, upon approval
164 of a notice of intent by the department, retain
165 all withholding tax from new jobs for a period
166 of three years from the date of approval of the
167 notice of intent or for a period of five years
168 if the supplier pays wages for the new jobs
169 equal to or greater than one hundred twenty
356

170 percent of county average wage. Notwithstanding
171 any other provision of law to the contrary, a
172 qualified supplier that is awarded benefits
173 under this section shall not receive any tax
174 credit or exemption or be entitled to retain
175 withholding under sections 100.700 to 100.850,
176 sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to
177 135.286, section 135.535, sections 135.900 to
178 135.906, sections 135.950 to 135.970, or section
179 620.1881 for the same jobs.
180 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of
181 law to the contrary, the maximum amount of
182 withholding tax that may be retained by any one
183 qualified manufacturing company under this
184 section shall not exceed ten million dollars per
185 calendar year. The aggregate amount of
186 withholding tax that may be retained by all
187 qualified manufacturing companies under this
188 section shall not exceed fifteen million dollars
189 per calendar year.
190 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of
191 law to the contrary, any qualified manufacturing
192 company that is awarded benefits under this
193 section shall not simultaneously receive tax
194 credits or exemptions under sections 100.700 to
195 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections
196 135.200 to 135.286, section 135.535, or sections
197 135.900 to 135.906 for the jobs created or
198 retained or capital improvement which qualified
199 for benefits under this section. The benefits
200 available to the qualified manufacturing company
201 under any other state programs for which the
202 qualified manufacturing company is eligible and
203 which utilize withholding tax from the jobs at
204 the facility shall first be credited to the
205 other state program before the applicable
206 withholding period for benefits provided under
207 this section shall begin. These other state
208 programs include, but are not limited to, the
209 Missouri works jobs training program under
210 sections 620.800 to 620.809, the real property
211 tax increment allocation redevelopment act under
212 sections 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri
213 downtown and rural economic stimulus act under
214 sections 99.915 to 99.980. If any qualified
215 manufacturing company also participates in the
357

216 Missouri works jobs training program in sections
217 620.800 to 620.809, such qualified manufacturing
218 company shall not retain any withholding tax
219 that has already been allocated for use in the
220 new jobs training program. Any qualified
221 manufacturing company or qualified supplier that
222 is awarded benefits under this program and
223 knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed
224 to work legally in the United States shall
225 immediately forfeit such benefits and shall
226 repay the state an amount equal to any
227 withholding taxes already retained. Subsection
228 5 of section 285.530 shall not apply to
229 qualified manufacturing companies or qualified
230 suppliers which are awarded benefits under this
231 program.
232 8. The department may promulgate rules to
233 implement the provisions of this section. Any
234 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
235 defined in section 536.010, that is created
236 under the authority delegated in this section
237 shall become effective only if it complies with
238 and is subject to all of the provisions of
239 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
240 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
241 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
242 with the general assembly under chapter 536 to
243 review, to delay the effective date, or to
244 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
245 held unconstitutional, then the grant of
246 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
247 adopted after the effective date of this section
248 shall be invalid and void.
249 9. Within six months of completion of a
250 notice of intent required under this section,
251 the qualified manufacturing company shall enter
252 into an agreement with the department that
253 memorializes the content of the notice of
254 intent, the requirements of this section, and
255 the consequences for failing to meet such
256 requirements, which shall include the following:
257 (1) If the amount of capital investment
258 made by the qualified manufacturing company is
259 not made within the two-year period provided for
260 such investment, the qualified manufacturing
261 company shall immediately cease retaining any
358

262 withholding tax with respect to jobs at the
263 facility and it shall forfeit all rights to
264 retain withholding tax for the remainder of the
265 withholding period. In addition, the qualified
266 manufacturing company shall repay any amounts of
267 withholding tax retained plus interest of five
268 percent per annum. However, in the event that
269 such capital investment shortfall is due to
270 economic conditions beyond the control of the
271 qualified manufacturing company, the director
272 may, at the qualified manufacturing company's
273 request, suspend rather than terminate its
274 privilege to retain withholding tax under this
275 section for up to three years. Any such
276 suspension shall extend the withholding period
277 by the same amount of time. No more than one
278 such suspension shall be granted to a qualified
279 manufacturing company;
280 (2) If the qualified manufacturing company
281 discontinues the manufacturing of the new
282 product and does not replace it with a
283 subsequent or additional new product
284 manufactured at the facility at any time during
285 the withholding period, the qualified
286 manufacturing company shall immediately cease
287 retaining any withholding tax with respect to
288 jobs at that facility and it shall forfeit all
289 rights to retain withholding tax for the
290 remainder of the withholding period.
291 10. Prior to March first each year, the
292 department shall provide a report to the general
293 assembly including the names of participating
294 qualified manufacturing companies or qualified
295 suppliers, location of such companies or
296 suppliers, the annual amount of benefits
297 provided, the estimated net state fiscal impact
298 including direct and indirect new state taxes
299 derived, and the number of new jobs created or
300 jobs retained.
301 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
302 sunset act:
303 (1) The provisions of the new program
304 authorized under this section shall
305 automatically sunset October 12, 2016, unless
306 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
307 and
359

308 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
309 program authorized under this section shall
310 automatically sunset twelve years after the
311 effective date of the reauthorization of this
312 section; and
313 (3) This section shall terminate on
314 September first of the calendar year immediately
315 following the calendar year in which the program
316 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[620.2100. 1. There is hereby established
the "Ozark Exploration Bicentennial Commission".
2. The commission shall consist of the
following members:
(1) Two representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(2) Two senators appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(3) One faculty member of Missouri State
University appointed by university leadership;
(4) The director of the division of
tourism or his or her designee;
(5) Two members representing historical
societies within the area of exploration, one
appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(6) Two members of the public appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(7) Two members of the public appointed by
the president pro tempore of the senate.
3. Members of the commission shall be
appointed by October 1, 2017.
4. Members of the commission shall serve
without compensation. The division of tourism
shall provide administrative support for the
commission.
5. There is hereby established in the
state treasury the "Ozark Exploration
Bicentennial Fund" to be held separate and apart
from all other public moneys and funds of the
state. The fund may accept state and federal
appropriations, grants, bequests, gifts, fees,
and awards to be held for use by the Ozark
exploration bicentennial commission.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
360

to the contrary, moneys remaining in the fund at
the end of any biennium shall not revert to
general revenue. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments
shall be credited to the fund.
6. The duties of the commission shall
include, but not be limited to:
(1) Organizing and coordinating efforts
relating to the bicentennial celebration of the
exploration of the Ozarks in 1819; and
(2) Promoting public awareness of the
importance and cultural significance of the
exploration to Missouri history.
7. The commission shall be dissolved and
the provisions of this section shall expire on
June 30, 2019.]
[620.2600. 1. This section shall be known
and may be cited as the "Innovation Campus Tax
Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit
certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department
of economic development;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations
received from a taxpayer by innovation campuses
that are to be used solely for projects that
advance learning in the areas of science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics.
Eligible donations may include cash, publicly
traded stocks and bonds, and real estate that
shall and will be valued and documented
according to the rules promulgated by the
department of economic development;
(4) "Innovation education campus" or
"innovation campus", as defined in section
178.1100, an educational partnership consisting
of at least one of each of the following
entities:
361

(a) A local Missouri high school or K-12
school district;
(b) A Missouri four-year public or private
higher education institution;
(c) A Missouri-based business or
businesses; and
(d) A Missouri two-year public higher
education institution or state technical college
of Missouri;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following
individuals or entities who make an eligible
donation to any innovation campus:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm,
corporation, or a shareholder in an S
corporation doing business in the state of
Missouri and subject to the state income tax
imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual
corporation franchise tax imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual
tax on its gross premium receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying
taxes to the state of Missouri or any political
subdivisions of this state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state
income tax imposed in chapter 143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is
exempt from federal income tax and whose
Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2015, any taxpayer shall be
allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due
under chapters 147, 148, or 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of
the amount of an eligible donation, subject to
the restrictions in this section. The amount of
the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the
amount of the taxpayer's state income tax
liability in the tax year for which the credit
is claimed. Any amount of credit that the
taxpayer is prohibited by this section from
claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable,
362

but may be carried forward to any of the
taxpayer's four subsequent taxable years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this
section, an innovation campus may submit to the
department an application for the tax credit
authorized by this section on behalf of
taxpayers. The department shall verify that the
innovation campus has submitted the following
items:
(1) A valid application in the form and
format required by the department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible
donation received, which shall include the name
and taxpayer identification number of the
individual or taxpayer making the eligible
donation, the amount of the eligible donation,
and the date the eligible donation was received
by the innovation campus; and
(3) Payment from the innovation campus
equal to the value of the tax credit for which
application is made.
If the innovation campus applying for the tax
credit meets all criteria required by this
subsection, the department shall issue a
certificate in the appropriate amount.
5. Tax credits issued under this section
may be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise
conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit
shall have the same rights in the credit as the
taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
100 transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a
101 notarized endorsement shall be filed with the
102 department specifying the name and address of
103 the new owner of the tax credit and the value of
104 the credit.
105 6. The department may promulgate rules to
106 implement the provisions of this section. Any
107 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
108 defined in section 536.010, that is created
109 under the authority delegated in this section
110 shall become effective only if it complies with
111 and is subject to all of the provisions of
112 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
113 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
114 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
115 with the general assembly under and pursuant to
363

116 chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
117 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
118 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
119 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
120 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2014, shall
121 be invalid and void.
122 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri
123 sunset act:
124 (1) The program authorized under this
125 section shall expire six years after August 28,
126 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the
127 general assembly; and
128 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the
129 program authorized under this section shall
130 automatically sunset twelve years after August
131 28, 2014; and
132 (3) This section shall terminate on
133 September first of the calendar year immediately
134 following the calendar year in which the program
135 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[633.420. 1. For the purposes of this
section, the term "dyslexia" means a disorder
that is neurological in origin, characterized by
difficulties with accurate and fluent word
recognition, and poor spelling and decoding
abilities that typically result from a deficit
in the phonological component of language, often
unexpected in relation to other cognitive
abilities and the provision of effective
classroom instruction, and of which secondary
consequences may include problems in reading
comprehension and reduced reading experience
that can impede growth of vocabulary and
background knowledge. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit a district from assessing
students for dyslexia and offering students
specialized reading instruction if a
determination is made that a student suffers
from dyslexia. Unless required by federal law,
nothing in this definition shall require a
student with dyslexia to be automatically
determined eligible as a student with a
disability. Nothing in this definition shall
require a student with dyslexia to obtain an
individualized education program (IEP) unless
364

the student has otherwise met the federal
conditions necessary.
2. There is hereby created the
"Legislative Task Force on Dyslexia". The joint
committee on education shall provide technical
and administrative support as required by the
task force to fulfill its duties; any such
support involving monetary expenses shall first
be approved by the chairman of the joint
committee on education. The task force shall
meet at least quarterly and may hold meetings by
telephone or video conference. The task force
shall advise and make recommendations to the
governor, joint committee on education, and
relevant state agencies regarding matters
concerning individuals with dyslexia, including
education and other adult and adolescent
services.
3. The task force shall be comprised of
twenty-one members consisting of the following:
(1) Two members of the senate appointed by
the president pro tempore of the senate, with
one member appointed from the minority party and
one member appointed from the majority party;
(2) Two members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, with one member
appointed from the minority party and one member
appointed from the majority party;
(3) The commissioner of education, or his
or her designee;
(4) One representative from an institution
of higher education located in this state with
specialized expertise in dyslexia and reading
instruction;
(5) A representative from a state teachers
association or the Missouri National Education
Association;
(6) A representative from the
International Dyslexia Association of Missouri;
(7) A representative from Decoding
Dyslexia of Missouri;
(8) A representative from the Missouri
Association of Elementary School Principals;
(9) A representative from the Missouri
Council of Administrators of Special Education;
365

(10) A professional licensed in the state
of Missouri with experience diagnosing dyslexia
including, but not limited to, a licensed
psychologist, school psychologist, or
neuropsychologist;
(11) A speech-language pathologist with
training and experience in early literacy
development and effective research-based
intervention techniques for dyslexia, including
an Orton-Gillingham remediation program
recommended by the Missouri Speech-Language
Hearing Association;
(12) A certified academic language
therapist recommended by the Academic Language
Therapy Association who is a resident of this
state;
(13) A representative from an independent
private provider or nonprofit organization
serving individuals with dyslexia;
(14) An assistive technology specialist
with expertise in accessible print materials and
assistive technology used by individuals with
dyslexia recommended by the Missouri assistive
technology council;
(15) One private citizen who has a child
who has been diagnosed with dyslexia;
(16) One private citizen who has been
diagnosed with dyslexia;
100 (17) A representative of the Missouri
101 State Council of the International Reading
102 Association;
103 (18) A pediatrician with knowledge of
104 dyslexia; and
105 (19) A member of the Missouri School
106 Boards' Association.
107 4. The members of the task force, other
108 than the members from the general assembly and
109 ex officio members, shall be appointed by the
110 president pro tempore of the senate or the
111 speaker of the house of representatives by
112 September 1, 2016, by alternating appointments
113 beginning with the president pro tempore of the
114 senate. A chairperson shall be selected by the
115 members of the task force. Any vacancy on the
116 task force shall be filled in the same manner as
366

117 the original appointment. Members shall serve
118 on the task force without compensation.
119 5. The task force shall make
120 recommendations for a statewide system for
121 identification, intervention, and delivery of
122 supports for students with dyslexia, including
123 the development of resource materials and
124 professional development activities. These
125 recommendations shall be included in a report to
126 the governor and joint committee on education
127 and shall include findings and proposed
128 legislation and shall be made available no
129 longer than twelve months from the task force's
130 first meeting.
131 6. The recommendations and resource
132 materials developed by the task force shall:
133 (1) Identify valid and reliable screening
134 and evaluation assessments and protocols that
135 can be used and the appropriate personnel to
136 administer such assessments in order to identify
137 children with dyslexia or the characteristics of
138 dyslexia as part of an ongoing reading progress
139 monitoring system, multitiered system of
140 supports, and special education eligibility
141 determinations in schools;
142 (2) Recommend an evidence-based reading
143 instruction, with consideration of the National
144 Reading Panel Report and Orton-Gillingham
145 methodology principles for use in all Missouri
146 schools, and intervention system, including a
147 list of effective dyslexia intervention
148 programs, to address dyslexia or characteristics
149 of dyslexia for use by schools in multitiered
150 systems of support and for services as
151 appropriate for special education eligible
152 students;
153 (3) Develop and implement preservice and
154 in-service professional development activities
155 to address dyslexia identification and
156 intervention, including utilization of
157 accessible print materials and assistive
158 technology, within degree programs such as
159 education, reading, special education, speech-
160 language pathology, and psychology;
367

161 (4) Review teacher certification and
162 professional development requirements as they
163 relate to the needs of students with dyslexia;
164 (5) Examine the barriers to accurate
165 information on the prevalence of students with
166 dyslexia across the state and recommend a
167 process for accurate reporting of demographic
168 data; and
169 (6) Study and evaluate current practices
170 for diagnosing, treating, and educating children
171 in this state and examine how current laws and
172 regulations affect students with dyslexia in
173 order to present recommendations to the governor
174 and the joint committee on education.
175 7. The task force shall hire or contract
176 for hire specialist services to support the work
177 of the task force as necessary with
178 appropriations made by the general assembly to
179 the joint committee on education for that
180 purpose or from other available funding.
181 8. The task force authorized under this
182 section shall expire on August 31, 2018, unless
183 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]
[640.030. The department of natural
resources and the department of conservation
shall develop an interagency plan and execute an
interagency agreement regarding the application
and use of any portion of funds authorized for
the respective departments by provisions of the
Constitution, taking into consideration the
purposes for which the voters approved the funds
and the extent to which expenditures under the
provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333, or
sections 620.552 to 620.574, accomplish such
purposes. Such interagency agreements shall not
be subject to legislative review or oversight
and are not rules within the meaning of any law
providing for review by the general assembly or
any committee thereof.]
368